 <i>translator: baumkuchen</i>  As he leaned against his car, Chi Xiaochi took a puff of his cigarette. In the slowly growing darkness, the little ember gave half of his face a slight glow. When about half the cigarette had been used up, he took a look at his watch. Taking a final breath of smoke, he leaned down and reached into the half-open car window, took out a mostly empty water bottle, and threw the half-finished cigarette inside. He then drew out a stick of chewing gum from his pocket, hastily chewing twice before spitting it out along with the remnants of cigarette ash into a tissue. He’d originally wanted to throw the rubbish away, but when he turned back around, the person he’d been waiting for had arrived. When that person staggered out of the main entrance of the software company, a tired air about him, the first thing he saw was the brand new car parked by the roadside, before spotting Chi Xiaochi. His expression became a little complicated. “...;...;Xiao Cheng.” In this world, Chi Xiaochi was called Cheng Yuan. As his gaze brushed over that face, Chi Xiaochi momentarily froze in place, forgetting to rush forwards. That person stood still, used to waiting for “Cheng Yuan” to walk up to him. Upon noticing that “Cheng Yuan” didn’t plan on moving, his brow furrowed with doubt. In Chi Xiaochi’s mind, a half-human, half-mechanical voice sounded a reminder. Its tone was very businesslike, and hence, it seemed a little cold. The system reminded him: “Mister Chi, the target is calling you.” Ignoring the goodwill level that dropped from 72 to 70 points, Chi Xiaochi regained his composure, commenting: “His looks aren’t bad.” Straightening up, he then sighed to himself: “I’ve really been single for far too long. Even a piece of shit like this can seem handsome.” The system: “...;...;” Pretending to not have been able to see clearly in the darkness of the night, he blinked several times before finally seeming to recognise the person in front of him. His originally stunned and slightly unfocused eyes instantly filled with joy, and the two dimples that formed on his face were sweet enough to make others want to smile along with him. “Old Yang!” The system: “...;...;” It seems like entering acting mode in just a second, is indeed possible. The full name of that “piece of shit” target was Yang Baihua. Actually, that so-called “Old Yang” wasn’t actually old, being older than Cheng Yuan by just four years. He had a clean and neat appearance, cuffs rolled up to an equal height; a refreshing temperament, neat hair and nails, a slight woody scent, as well as a sense of toughness and stability rarely seen in young men. The abs that were contained within the white dress shirt weren’t obvious, but their slight outline was enough to make one’s heart race. As he slowly approached the mission target, Chi Xiaochi quickly looked over the world information he had received once again. In this world was the first mission Chi Xiaochi had received since signing on with the system. According to his system, in order to let hosts adapt quicker, for every host’s first mission, the world setting would be similar to that of their original world, and the difficulty level would also be on easy mode. To put it bluntly, it was a tutorial for newbies. For this tutorial, his target was Yang Baihua, a golden phoenix that had flown out from the remote southwestern mountainous region, a college student produced from the effort of his entire family, studying software engineering. From not even being able to turn on a computer to becoming a successful scholar, close to seven years of studying in the city area had worn away the country bumpkin air of Yang Baihua. At first glance, he seemed like a youth who had spent his whole life in the city. As for Cheng Yuan, it could be summed up in one sentence: His family is rich. As for exactly how rich they were, Cheng Yuan had never cared about that, that was something for his older brother to worry about. Since young, Cheng Yuan loved music to death. He was also truly gifted, after playing for a bit with any musical instrument he could easily grasp it, and he had a beautiful voice that could make any supporting musical instrument sound even better. Whether it was singing, composing, or playing instruments, he could do it all, and had interest in all of it. It was after Cheng Yuan had entered music school and came to find his friend from highschool to play, that he coincidentally met Yang Baihua in his school grounds. At that time, Yang Baihua had just started his fourth year of university, and happened to be at his most attractive, full of youthful daring and energy. That refreshing yet tough atmosphere entranced Cheng Yuan, causing him to blindly follow him around campus. At first, Yang Baihua found him weird, but gradually, the young master who was like a dumpling with soft filling, like a rabbit that with one tug of its ear could be held in the center of your palm moved his heart. In three years, the two people went from mere acquaintances, to friends, to being in a relationship. One day, after Cheng Yuan got drunk, in a moment of impulse, he came out to his family. His parents were unable to accept that their son, who when small had still chased after girls, was attracted to a man. After some investigation into Yang Baihua’s background, his parents were even more against it. The Cheng family elders wasn’t biased against Yang Baihua who had to struggle through every step of life. They themselves had been born from farmers, and had through their own hard work established their family. They understood the hardship of struggle. However, Yang Baihua had four older sisters who were close in age, whose names all shared one similarity: Zhaodi, Pandi, Niandi, Wangdi. In the face of these four names, the two elders of the Cheng family were convinced: Yang Baihua’s parents would absolutely not accept a male who would keep his own surname and break the family line. This hopeless love of theirs would definitely not have a good ending. However, love was blind. After Cheng Yuan sobered up, he absolutely would not listen to his parents’ well-intentioned advice, and was even dead-set on protecting Yang Baihua from them, scared that they would actively cause problems for him. His parents weren’t that underhanded, and wouldn’t have made trouble for a hardworking, self-made child, but Cheng Yuan’s lack of trust in them really hurt their feelings. For Yang Baihua, he fell out with his parents, and moved out of his home to live with Yang Baihua. Being a cheapskate, Yang Baihua’s rented flat was about twenty stops away from the city center, so there were very few restaurants around. On the bright side, it was quiet, and groceries were cheap. Cheng Yuan learned to cook for Yang Baihua. His skills actually weren’t bad. After Yang Baihua praised him a few times, he would even make lunch and bring it to him at work every day. Some of his friends scolded him saying, Xiao Yuan you must be crazy, for this country bumpkin, you’d give up your easy life? Cheng Yuan would just smile and say, he’s very good to me, we already discussed this, we’re eating hotpot tomorrow. Cheng Yuan was indeed a romantic, for every small aspiration, he’d write it into his planner, full of hope for the future, line by line, as if he was writing poems. “Tomorrow morning write songs; at noon make lunch; in the afternoon continue writing songs; at night go out for a walk with Old Yang; buy two cups of Sun Ji soymilk, for Old Yang’s add sugar; at midnight turn on the air conditioning, and sleep under the blankets.” He never recorded bad things, because he truly felt that his life was very fortunate. His big brother’s sneaky offerings were also refused by him. The one time Cheng Yuan accepted his brother’s good intentions, was by accepting a car from his brother, a newly bought BYD, because he got sick on public transport. Every time he took the half-hour trip to send meals to Yang Baihua, he never dared to eat beforehand, in fear of vomiting. However Yang Baihua didn’t like that present, saying his big brother was giving alms, wanting to remind Cheng Yuan of his past good life, and trying to make an opportunity to bring him home. Cheng Yuan thought that that made sense, and obediently returned the car. After taking it he still returned it, this action hurt his big brother’s feelings. Eventually, the short messages sent by his brother asking after him went from once a day, to once a week, to once a month. In the midst of his sadness, Cheng Yuan consoled himself, thinking, his parents and big brother just wanted him to be happy. If he stayed with Yang Baihua, as their days got better and better, they would eventually accept Old Yang. After graduating, Yang Baihua entered a software company as a systems analyst. It was said that he was highly looked upon by his managers. As for Cheng Yuan, his career could also be considered relatively smooth-sailing. In the beginning, Cheng Yuan had never needed to think about making a living, just immersing himself in making music. Even if there was no market for the few experimental songs he wrote, his parents just used their connections to get it published, anyways it was just for some small self-entertainment. But now, Cheng Yuan needed to make a living. In these few years, the record market had shrunk a lot, so Cheng Yuan had to give up on his beloved experimental music. In this respect, Cheng Yuan didn’t have any problems with not writing music for his favourite genre. He liked every genre of music, whether it was classical pop, punk rock-and-roll, it was alright with him. It was just that as an artist, he was rather picky about quality. After three months of hard work, he carefully recorded 3 original pop demos, and sent them out to several record labels. For all record labels, sent-in demos were as numerous as the amount of hair on a cow. Cheng Yuan had already prepared himself for disappointment. However, he was unexpectedly lucky, and very quickly received a response: His rough draft had been picked up by a small company, they were offering five thousand dollars for every song. This small company expressed that they really admired Cheng Yuan’s creative abilities, and offered to sign an artist’s contract with him. Cheng Yuan was so excited that he signed it without even looking over it. Cheng Yuan was jumping for joy. He was so happy that, even though he hadn’t yet received the money, he’d already made plans for how he was going to spend the fifteen thousand dollars, each plan made with Yang Baihua in mind. If he could go back in time, Cheng Yuan would scold the at that time ecstatic Cheng Yuan for being a fool. The small company’s production efficiency was low, and the final products weren’t entirely satisfactory, but seeing his three songs 《Autumn Thoughts》, 《Innermost Feelings》 and 《Love You》 slowly rise up the charts in the music app, Cheng Yuan was incredibly pleased. Every time they rose up a rank, he’d immediately screenshot it to show to Yang Baihua. Until a certain comment appeared: “Does anyone feel like 《Autumn Thoughts》 sounds a lot like Goddess Tang’s revision of 《Common Thoughts》?” Very quickly, someone replied: “Not just 《Autumn Thoughts》, 《Innermost Feelings》 also sounds a lot like Tang Huan’s new song.” ...;...;Tang Huan? Cheng Yuan’s hands slipped, exiting out of the app. As he stared up at the black screen of his phone in a daze, he started sweating profusely, as if a nest of ants had started burrowing into every one of his joints. With a shaking hand, he reopened the music app. The well-known pop singer, Tang Huan smiled back at him from the front page advertisement. That day, Cheng Yuan’s Weibo, which had only a few thousand fans, was drowned with vitriol from Tang Huan’s millions of fans and their water armies. “Motherfucking plagiarising dog! You and your whole family should just die!” “Under that innocent face of yours, how could you be so despicable?” “For information on the causes and consequences of Cheng Yuan’s plagiarism and more details on the incident, visit this link: http://t.cn...;” “I casually picked up some of Cheng Yuan’s prior works, the desire for knowledge made me pick it up, and the desire for life made me drop it.” “Hahaha what kind of “exquisite” singing is this, such ghastly shrieks of yiyiwuwu like this can also be fucking called good singing? Fans really are blind.” “wtf how amazing, they even copied the song name from Goddess Tang’s new album cover, did they just copy the entire set?” Cheng Yuan couldn’t care less about those insults. He placed in his earphones, frantically listening to each one of Tang Huan’s new songs over and over. His eyes turned bloodshot, and his body was covered in cold sweat. ...;...;It’s really the same. They were only different in terms of some minor adjustments. There wasn’t a need for any professional evaluation, as long as you had a pair of working ears, and weren’t absolutely tone-deaf, you would be able to tell it was plagiarised. ...;...;But who actually copied who? Cheng Yuan was sure of his own innocence. He hadn’t listened to a single one of Tang Huan’s songs before today, as he’d heard a critique a poison-tongued musician had made about Tang Huan. Even though it was said in a nasty manner, their criticism still held true: “Tang Huan is best at singing saliva ballads. As expected of saliva ballads, the songs are also very slobbery, when she sings she sounds like she’s choking on a mouthful of saliva.” Tang Huan’s smiling face spun before Cheng Yuan’s eyes, and on the electronic cover of her new album was this line: “The Queen of love songs twirls beautifully, as she sings out your innermost feelings.” ——“wtf how amazing, they even copied the song name from Goddess Tang’s new album cover, did they just copy the entire set?” Cheng Yuan clearly remembered, the name of the song 《Innermost Feelings》 was something he had came up with himself. It was about his own innermost feelings that he wanted to voice out to Yang Baihua. It was about his own restrained and taboo love, but Tang Huan had made it about the sweet love of a little girl. Cheng Yuan could only feel an unprecedented level of insult. The biggest hit he’d ever experienced before this was the failure of his coming out of the closet. He’d never had to suffer such a loss of reputation, or this feeling of being pointed at by thousands of people. As the ringing in his ears drowned out everything around him, the only thought in his mind was of Yang Baihua. He dialed Yang Baihua’s phone number. The moment he heard his voice, his tense emotions immediately burst out. He could only cry out in a teary voice: “Old Yang, Old Yang, please come back.” Like a little kid who had been badly bullied. In dealing with matters involving other people, Cheng Yuan really was just like a little kid. He’d been protected too well by his family. So, when he clutched at Yang Baihua, crying as he told him that his songs had been stolen by someone, and he even had been publicly scolded by millions of people, Cheng Yuan failed to notice the momentary flurry of panic in Yang Baihua’s eyes. But what Cheng Yuan would never have imagined, was that this was only the beginning of his nightmare. However, now, it was Chi Xiaochi, playing as a steel-toothed white rabbit Cheng Yuan, standing in front of Yang Baihua. The former looked up and smiled at the latter with bright eyes. Yang Baihua looked over at the car. He asked, frowning: “Did you buy this car?” Cheng Yuan turned to glance at the car, and boasted in a childish voice: “Isn’t it beautiful?” Yang Baihua asked: “How much did you spend?” Cheng Yuan’s eyes curved in a smile: “Guess?” From start to finish, this conversation was exactly the same as the one in the original host’s memories. Yang Baihua furrowed his brows, and the goodwill value in Chi Xiaochi’s mind dropped another two points. Yang Baihua suppressed his anger, deciding to try talking sense into this young master who didn’t know the value of money: “Xiao Yuan, the two of us are going to stay together for a long, long time. For me, you fell out with your family, and I really appreciate your sincerity. But since young you’ve lived a very fortunate life, you don’t understand how to moderate yourself. If you keep spending so extravagantly...;” These words were very reasonable. According to the original plot, the original host should now bow his head in shame, and admit that he had just been joking, and that the car had been given to him by his older brother, Cheng Jian. Chi Xiaochi aptly let out a wronged expression: “...;This was given to me by my big brother. I get sick easily on public transport.” Yang Baihua gently stroked Chi Xiaochi’s head: “Xiao Cheng, you’ve grown up, you can’t always keep depending on your brother’s support like this. Your brother has his own life, as do you. By doing this, he’s deliberately interfering in your life, pampering you. This will only make you more and more unwilling to leave your golden cage. Don’t you agree?” Chi Xiaochi kept silent, staring at him. Yang Baihua was very confident in himself. In the past, Xiao Cheng had a friend who was strongly opposed to their relationship. After being taught by him like this, Xiao Cheng immediately distanced himself from him. ...;...;Xiao Cheng didn’t know anything. It was for his own good that he needed to obediently listen to him, or else he’d easily be led astray by others. At this time, Chi Xiaochi started to speak. When he spoke, his voice was pleasant to listen to, gentle and soft, just like the voice he had always used to speak to him, to the extent that at first, Yang Baihua didn’t understand what he was saying: “...;If my brother treats me well, does it cost you anything?” The author has something to say: The story of a seemingly gentle, but actually overly controlling phoenix man√ Happy April Fools! And happy birthday to me! (That isn’t a joke, I was born a joke lol) For my birthday present to myself this year, I’m jumping into another pit...; _(:3 」∠)_ I hope you guys enjoy this story, Don’t Pick Up Boyfriends From the Trash Bin~ Anyways, this is an actual project that I’m picking up, but it’s in teasers for now since I’ll be going overseas soon and can’t start regular updates yet orz (CG rules are all official projects must be updated at least once a week) So yeah, the next update might not be here for a while, but I’ll be updating 3 times a week once I get back, so look forward to that! <i>translator: baumkuchen editor: serefina</i>  In front of Chi Xiaochi was a digital display that only he could see. On the display was the original host’s current body temperature, heart rate, blood pressure, surrounding temperature, and so on. Of particular interest was a conspicuous bar divided into two colours, red and blue. The blue bar represented the regret level, while the red bar represented the goodwill level, both with a maximum value of 100 points. The blue bar was currently stuck at 9 points, while the points of the red bar were steadily decreasing due to Chi Xiaochi’s line of “Does it cost you”. Chi Xiaochi sighed, “Why is it that people don’t like to hear the truth?” The system wanted to roast him a little, but held back. Yang Baihua was disappointed, saying, “Xiao Cheng, how could you talk like that?” Chi Xiaochi didn’t panic, and simply replied amicably, “Old Yang, don’t misunderstand. My meaning was that my big brother is just looking out for us. With a car, our lives will be so much easier. I don’t have a need for it, but you could use it to drive to work, right? It’ll give you a lot more face in front of your colleagues too.” His attitude was very pleasant, as if his prior remark that was full of □□ was simply a statement of fact. Seeing the two-point increase in the goodwill level, the system thought, he’s giving him the stick followed by the carrot. His means aren’t bad. Yang Baihua calmed himself down. This child had been spoiled rotten since young and didn’t know the impact of his words. He feared that he completely hadn’t realised just how hurtful his prior words were. Thinking of this, Yang Baihua gathered the patience of a father dealing with their own child, and coaxed him, saying, “Xiao Cheng, cars are consumables. Have you ever thought about how much it costs to own a car? How much it would cost to pay for gasoline each month, how much it would cost to buy a parking lot, have you thought about it? Is this something we afford right now?” “I’ll earn money to provide for you!” Cheng Yuan nonchalantly placed his hands behind his back, his smile sincere and gentle enough to make one’s heart melt. “My demos are almost complete. When they’re done, they’ll earn us some money.” Yang Baihua helplessly replied, “How many times have I told you, this isn’t a proper job.” “But I like music.” “Just because you like it doesn’t mean it can put food on the table...;...; Nevermind, let’s not talk about this.” Yang Baihua generously gave in. “We shouldn’t quarrel.” “Alright, let’s not talk about that.” Cheng Yuan walked forward, closing the gap between him and Yang Baihua. He gently said, “Actually I was also thinking that we can use this car to fetch your mom and dad. Mom, dad, and third sister are coming to visit next week. When they come, you can even drive them over to Xiaoyan’s school to bring her out for a meal. The last time Xiaoyan came over, didn’t she also ask when you were going to buy a car?” Those two matters just so happened to poke at Yang Baihua’s weak spot. He was silent. As he spoke, Cheng Yuan raised his head to look up at Yang Baihua. Upon meeting his burning gaze, Yang Baihua’s heart skipped a beat. It was currently winter. Under the light of the evening streetlamps, Cheng Yuan let out a breath of white fog. In the haze of white mist, his fair and radiant face was enveloped in an exquisite halo of light that could move people’s hearts. The circle of fluffy feathers lining the hood of his white down jacket moved slightly in the evening wind, sticking to his slender, white porcelain neck, gently tickling it. All at once, he felt a squeezing, burning sensation in his heart. Meanwhile, Chi Xiaochi’s attention was on translucent card currently displayed on the operating board in front of him. Its contents were as follows: Name: Beauty Halo (Trial Edition) Duration: 10 minutes Quantity: 1 Quality: Excellent Type: Single use only Points required: 0 (Free trial) Description: Your simple smile is more radiant than the shine of Gold Coating Silver egg fried rice, more warm than a simmering pot of pork broth soup, more tender than the meat bursting out of a freshly snapped crab leg, and more fascinating than the red oil oozing out of the yolk of a salted duck egg. No delicacy can compare to your smile, illuminated by the dim lights. ...;...;Nice metaphor. Chi Xiaochi asked, curious, “Did the person in charge of writing these descriptions come from a family of chefs?” The system was silent for a moment. “...;...;09 is the one of the first-generation AIs. It started out as data, it just likes studying recipes.” Chi Xiaochi found these words to be a little strange. Started out as data? Is there such a thing as turning into data? Before he could ask further, the system butted in with a reminder, “Mister Chi, your task.” Chi Xiaochi: “Oh, oh.” Seeing Chi Xiaochi gather himself once more, the system felt slightly gratified. When he first took on Chi Xiaochi, he’d immediately noticed that this new host was a little more difficult to handle. After receiving and reading the information of this world, Chi Xiaochi pondered to himself for quite a while. His very first question was: “Later when we see him, can I directly run that surnamed Yang over with a car?” The system: “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi said, “Don’t worry, we’re just discussing this.” He paused for a while longer, then continued, “Since Cheng Yuan’s family is so rich, if any accident occurred, they could definitely help cover it up.” The system said, “k2026;k2026;You really want to hit him with the car.” Chi Xiaochi said, “No, no, we’re just discussing a possibility.” The system said, “Mister Chi, you’re dealing with a living, breathing human being here.” Chi Xiaochi made a show of being earnest, “Oh. But it’d be an accident, no? It wouldn’t be intentional.” The system tried to reason with him, “...;...;Mister Chi, the laws of this world aren’t very different from those in your original world. Those who purposefully attempt to harm others will be thrown in jail. Furthermore, if you run your target over, how are you planning on leaving this world?” Leaving the task world depended on the regret level. Only when the regret level reached 100 points, would the host be able to leave the current world, and be sent to the next task world. The system brought up the regret level in order to dissuade Chi Xiaochi from this immoral idea. Who knew that Chi Xiaochi would seriously start to analyse in a reasonable and justified manner, “It’s said that people regret the most in the moment before death.” The system: “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi continued, “Even if he doesn’t die and only becomes disabled, he’ll still have a long life ahead of him to regret.” The system: “...;...;” You can shut up now. Chi Xiaochi understood the system’s silence. He sighed, “Fine. You, this little comrade, really don’t have a sense of humor.” ...;...;However, the system could hear the clear disappointment in Chi Xiaochi’s voice. For this reason, the system could not rest assured, and even thoroughly looked over the information he had on Chi Xiaochi once more. ...;...;Right, Chi Xiaochi definitely was an actor, not some convict with a criminal record. Even though he had enough black material to cover the heavens; bad-tempered, smoked in public places and led teens astray, uncultured and unashamed, on bad terms with his parents, and had dirty py dealings with all kinds of old men, etcetera, his messy matters too numerous to count, most were just rumours, and it was hard to tell the truth from the lies. After simply filtering out the tabloids, the system thought, it should be fine, this host just has a somewhat independent, unconventional personality, with some slight mental issues. With some kindness and gentle guidance, there shouldn’t be any problems. Anyway, Chi Xiaochi had done quite well so far, putting the free skill card to good use. A quick check showed that Yang Baihua’s goodwill level, which had been at a steady decline, already showed signs of rejuvenation. Every new host was liable to twelve free single-use skill cards. These props had numerous different functions, but they could only be used once. If after trying them out, the host found them useful, they could enter the system’s shop and exchange the goodwill points of the host for props to be used in various situations as needed. Like right now. Looking at Cheng Yuan, Yang Baihua lightly swallowed. He’d known that Cheng Yuan was attractive, but no matter how attractive the person, after a while, anyone would get accustomed to it. But just now, when he looked at Cheng Yuan, he’d regained the itchy feeling in his heart from when they’d first started dating. The snow-white rabbit that had been lovingly raised since young raised its round, black eyes, attentively staring at him with eyes full of fascination. Such an outstanding person whole-heartedly relied on him and thought only of him. ...;...;This was only right. Yang Baihua enjoyed this feeling of “being back on track”. Holding back a smile, he asked, “You still remember my cousin’s called Xiaoyan?” Cheng Yuan replied with no small amount of pride, “Of course I remember. If it has to do with you, I remember everything.” In that moment, Yang Baihua felt the urge to kiss him. But out of the corner of his eye, he just happened to catch a glimpse of Xiao Liu from the photocopy room next door on his way out, twirling his keys as he exited from the revolving door of the company and discussing with two other colleagues where they would be going for barbeque tonight. Remaining calm and collected, Yang Baihua angled his body, quietly blocking Cheng Yuan from view. His hand, which originally had been raised halfway to stroke Cheng Yuan’s face, was also lowered and naturally shoved into his pocket, “Next time when you want to add something to our home, don’t forget to discuss it with me first. This home belongs to the two of us, doesn’t it?” Chi Xiaochi sneered internally. This home belongs to the two of us? Discuss? The double bed that could fit your entire family, did you ever discuss it with me? However, “Cheng Yuan” wouldn’t have thought of such things. According to his personality, he would just know that Yang Baihua had silently agreed. They could keep the car. Cheng Yuan’s eyes brightened, and his loving gaze towards Yang Baihua became even more intense. Yang Baihua smiled and offered, “I’ll drive.” Cheng Yuan volunteered, saying, “You’ve worked hard the entire day, I’ll drive.” He pulled open the back door of the car, and playfully bent his knee, “Boss, please get on first. I’ll go throw away some trash.” Yang Baihua laughed, and readily sat inside. As he looked over the car’s interior, he couldn’t quite conceal the envy in his eyes. When would he be able to be like Cheng Jian, able to just casually gift someone a car? Cheng Yuan, carrying a nearly-empty mineral water bottle, ambled over to the trash bin by the side of the road. Yang Baihua spent most of his time facing a computer screen, so his eyesight wasn’t the best. He didn’t see the cigarette butt floating in the water bottle. When Chi Xiaochi tossed the bottle into the recycling bin, the empty bottle collided with the inside of the bin, making a soft noise of crumpling plastic. Chi Xiaochi asked the system, “Do you see it now?” The system: “En.” ——Cheng Yuan majored in vocal music. He had always lovingly protected his vocal cords, staying far away from smoking and drinking. Chi Xiaochi had smoked half a cigarette. Even though he’d used chewing gum to hastily cover it up, the smell of cigarette smoke still lingered in his mouth and on his cuffs. However, his current lover hadn’t noticed any irregularities at all. He hadn’t asked even a single question. Of course, this was just a casual test by Chi Xiaochi and didn’t confirm anything. However, in his opinion, this was just one of the small signs of Cheng Yuan’s tragic fate. Upon returning to the car, as Cheng Yuan was putting on his seatbelt, he said, “When Mom and Dad arrive, let’s go pick them up from the train station together.” Yang Baihua visibly froze for a second. Of course, Cheng Yuan wouldn’t notice anything strange about Yang Baihua, and so continued to speak, “My driving is very steady. When the time comes, we can bring Mom and Dad to fetch Xiaoyan, and then bring them to visit Yunzhi Temple, and go to the suburbs to soak in the hot springs...;...;” Yang Baihua replied uncomfortably, “...;...;Let’s talk about this some other time.” Cheng Yuan, like a little trumpet, enthused, “Then I’ll play my new demo for you. You’ll be my first listener, how about it?” Yang Baihua was very happy he’d changed the subject. He went along with it, replying, “Let’s hear it then.” Cheng Yuan dug out his phone, tapping it a few times. Melodious and pure music drifted out of the loudspeaker, incredibly pleasing to the ear. Yang Baihua had been busy working for the entire day, and the music that flowed into his ears seemed to sooth his tense nerves. Sitting back against the comfortable leather seat, he drifted off to sleep. The system couldn’t help but remind him, “Mister Chi, you don’t need to use skill cards so frequently.” Chi Xiaochi had just used a hypnosis card on Yang Baihua that would last half an hour. Chi Xiaochi himself wasn’t as stingy, “I’m just trying it out. Anyways, it’s not like goodwill points are hard to earn.” ...;...;This judgement wasn’t wrong. A person’s goodwill towards another was naturally always in flux. When couples argued, their goodwill to one another would sink straight to the lowest, to the point that they’d be itching to just strangle the other to death. On the other hand, in their most passionate moments, it would be like blending oil in honey and their goodwill value would naturally steadily increase. Just now Chi Xiaochi’s excellent techniques had brought Yang Baihua’s goodwill level back up to 72 points, exactly the same as where they had started. Chi Xiaochi summarized, “For a car that didn’t cost him anything, his goodwill level directly dropped by 14 points.” The system: “...;...;” Weren’t the last 10 points lost because you went and provoked him. Chi Xiaochi continued his analysis, “With the Beauty Halo card that lasted 10 minutes and a some gentle coaxing, the goodwill level returned to its original value. A Beauty Halo card that lasts this long only costs 5 goodwill points. Looking at it like this, goodwill points really are easy to grind.” The system: “...;...;” Just now, had Chi Xiaochi deliberately provoked Yang Baihua in order to test the extent to which the goodwill points would drop? Also the word “grind” gave the system a bad feeling. Chi Xiaochi said, “Moving forward, as long as Yang Baihua’s goodwill level is passable, it’s fine. We’ve got an extra 12 goodwill points to spare, so help me take a look at the shop. Let’s see what we can buy.” The system was shocked. In order to leave the worlds quickly, his previous hosts had all persistently followed the target’s every whim, first and foremost grinding the goodwill level up to 100 points before doing anything else. After all, no one knew if insufficient goodwill points would have an impact on the progress of the task. This was the first time the system had seen such a reckless warrior who dared to remain at the passing mark right from the start. The system flipped through the store, “The things you can buy with 10 goodwill points would be a 30 minute long ‘Beauty Halo’, a 5 minute long ‘Karate Black Belt Buff’, a 1 hour long ‘Painlessness Buff’, a 5 minute long ‘Heartthrob Halo’...;...;” Chi Xiaochi listened carefully as the system went over it once, “Buy the first one.” After a successful purchase, he asked, “Is there a longer lasting ‘Heartthrob Halo’?” The system said, “There is. The longest lasts 1 hour, and costs 40 goodwill points.” Chi Xiaochi muttered to himself, “Then I’ll have to save up some more.” ...;...;From Chi Xiaochi’s tone, the system got the impression that to him, Yang Baihua was like a meat-producing pig. Today he’d chop off the front legs, the next day he’d chop off some pork belly. After he chopped some meat off, it’d grow back, and when it did, he’d chop it off again, in a cycle without an end. The slightly terrified system said, “The remaining two points can only buy a few small props and adult products.” Chi Xiaochi: “Oho.” The system: “...;...;Mister Chi, we are proper systems.” Chi Xiaochi didn’t say anything, but he was evidently amused. The system was incensed by his amusement, to the point where his data even showed some slight fluctuations, “We don’t provide that kind of service. Adult products refers to small physical props that can enhance relationships, like flower bouquets, river lanterns, fireworks and so on.” Chi Xiaochi said, “Get a firework.” “A firework costs 3 points.” Chi Xiaochi simply said, “Okay, one then.” The system: “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi: “What are you so stunned for? The one who’ll be failing is me.” The system helplessly thought, of course it’s you, who else would it be, me? After a successful purchase, the clear sound of a bell rang out, indicating that the item had been placed in storage. Chi Xiaochi waited for a long time, “Where’s the fireworks?” The system replied, “The target...;...;” Was still lying there like a corpse, dead to the world. “Who said it was for him?” Chi Xiaochi said, “Now, light it up.” The system was a little confused, but did as instructed. An eight-core firework burst into the sky, drifting down like a snowline, falling like a shooting star, dyeing the dark dome of the night sky with a moving tapestry of light. The firework had exploded in the distance. Light travelled faster than sound, so as the light, like a string of pearls, scattered into the night sky, Chi Xiaochi suddenly opened his mouth and said to the system, “...;...;This is for you.” His words hadn’t finished before, with a loud bang, the noise of the firework exploding arrived, late. The system stared at the dissipating stars in slight shock. The rearview mirror of the car reflected Chi Xiaochi’s face. He was smiling. Even though Chi Xiaochi was using Cheng Yuan’s face, his true smile bore no resemblance whatsoever to Cheng Yuan’s innocence. His peach blossom eyes were curved, showing three parts evilness mixed with 7 parts indifference and laziness. It had its own intoxicating charm, an attractiveness that made it impossible to tear one’s eyes away. Chi Xiaochi said to the system, “From today onwards I’ll be troubling you, please take care of me.” The system: “...;...;” Even though he was a little touched, the system inexplicably felt that that sentence wasn’t quite right. It felt a bit like the last meal of a death row inmate before he was sent off to the firing squad. Very quickly, the system realised the problem. “This isn’t the road to Yang Baihua’s house.” Chi Xiaochi replied as if it were the most obvious thing in the world, “Of course not. If not why else would I have hypnotised him?” The system: “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi glanced the the in-built GPS, confirming his destination before continuing, “...;..There’s a place I want to visit.” The author has something to say: The ML is the still-unnamed system√ Not spicy chicken Yang. Posting from my phone is tough orz Anyways, I’m still overseas and can’t post updates regularly yet, but here’s a new chapter to tide you guys over in the meantime~ Also, say hi to the new editor for this story, serefina! o/ Now on to the...; food porn? (is this actually Fantasy Farm lmao) Gold Coating Silver egg fried rice, a simmering pot of pork broth soup, the meat bursting out of a freshly snapped crab leg, the red oil oozing out of the yolk of a salted duck egg, they all can’t compare to your simple smile, illuminated by the dim lights. <del>(ノ▽〃) I got inspired and did some fanart...; but then I got stuck at the sketch phase hahahaha _(:3」∠)_</del> <i>translator: baumkuchen editor: serefina</i>  After 40 minutes, Chi Xiaochi arrived at his destination. Just outside the car, three big words “Beimang Public Cemetery” were clearly visible. As the system took a second look around at the dark, windy surroundings in the moonless night, Chi Xiaochi turned off the headlights, plunging the surroundings into darkness. He asked warily, “What are you planning?” Chi Xiaochi pulled up the handbrake and killed the engine. He looked over at the sleeping form of Yang Baihua reflected in the rearview mirror and laughed menacingly, “Hehehe.” The system: “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi asked, “Excuse me, how much for a razor blade?” The system was expressionless, “A police report is free.” Chi Xiaochi continued, “If there aren’t any razor blades, wires are also fine.” The system: “...;...;?” Chi Xiaochi glanced at the entrance of the cemetery, “Never mind, it’s not necessary anyways.” Chi Xiaochi didn’t actually do anything to Yang Baihua. He got off the car and stood out in the harsh cold wind, facing the cemetery for some time, as if lost in thought. Of course, this place wasn’t the famous “born in Suhang, buried in Beimang” precious feng shui burial ground, it was just an instance of hanging a similar sheep head to sell dog meat. Hung on the gates was a giant, rusty copper lock. Weeds grew abundantly in thick, overgrown patches. Half of the huge copper character “邙” had fallen off, leaving behind a single, lonely right ear. Chi Xiaochi stripped off his down jacket, placing it on the hood of the car. Then he took several large steps back from the gates. After he’d made enough space for acceleration, he rushed straight towards the iron gates. He seemed very familiar with the act of scaling walls. When he was about three steps away from the iron gates, he jumped. One foot landed precisely on the rusty iron flower carved between the iron gate railings. Using his right hand, he smoothly grabbed hold of the copper “北” character to steady himself. He quickly followed up with his other foot, stepping onto the bar just above the iron gate. With a deft leap, he successfully sent himself over to the ground on the other side of the iron gates. After landing, Chi Xiaochi shook out his ankles. The system asked “Are you alright?” Chi Xiaochi furrowed his eyebrows, “It’s a little numb.” The system didn’t say anything. He connected Chi Xiaochi’s neurons, silently reconnecting his tendons and muscles to smooth out the numbness from the impact, relieving the soreness and numbness in an instant. Chi Xiaochi let out an “yi” of surprise. He tested his weight on his foot, thinking it recovered very quickly. He didn’t think any more of it. After he recovered, he stepped into the weeds that were as high as the tombstones. The system asked, “Why have you come here?” He was extremely scared that Chi Xiaochi would say, “I’m here to pick a spot for Yang Baihua’s grave”. Thankfully, Chi Xiaochi’s answer could still be considered normal, “I’m looking for someone.” The system was curious, “Who?” Chi Xiaochi didn’t reply, simply stepping onto a weed that had grown out between a crack in the bricks. In the winter, the grass was very dry. When stepped on it would crack, the sound abnormally loud in the silence of the cemetery. He used his phone flashlight to light the way. Ignoring the rows of gravestones packed tightly together like honeycombs, he directly made his way towards his destination. Very quickly, he stopped. The light from his phone fell on a cheap stone tombstone. The name on the tombstone was Wang Jianguo. He was born in 1949 and died in 1989 at the age of 40. Chi Xiaochi pushed aside the grass and dust clinging to the tombstone, made a quick bow of respect towards it, and then turned to leave the same way he came. The system tentatively asked, “Who was he to you?” Chi Xiaochi replied, “I don’t know him.” The system: “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi then said, “Thankfully I don’t know him.” The system: “??” In order to make scaling the gate easier, Chi Xiaochi had taken off his down jacket. His form-fitting black sweater outlined the beautiful lines of his slender waist and abdomen. His hands were shoved into his pant pockets for warmth, and as he spoke his breath left his mouth as a white cloud, “...;...;You mentioned before, in order to facilitate the completion of the task, the first world will be similar to the world I lived in.” ...;...;The system seemed to have realized something. He remembered that when he was looking over the information of the new host, he saw that Chi Xiaochi’s place of birth had the same name as this city. Chi Xiaochi continued, “k2026;k2026;They’re both called Beimang Public Cemetery, and the layout is also exactly the same. What a coincidence.” ...;...;But the person buried there wasn’t the person he was looking for. Chi Xiaochi drew out a cigarette from his pocket, and fumbled out his lighter. He analysed, “In this world, Lou-ge might still be alive.” The system didn’t know who “Lou-ge” was, but considerately didn’t ask further, “Do you want to go look for him?” The system was a little worried about whether Chi Xiaochi would let his personal affairs distract him from his main task. After all, only in the tutorial would the main system assign the host a world similar to their own for practice. After the tutorial, there would be all kinds of strange worlds in their future. If one wanted to find someone, after this village there wouldn’t be a shop anymore. “No.” Chi Xiaochi’s mind could still be considered clear, replying, “He’s living a good life and he wouldn’t know me, why would I go look for him?” Having said this, Chi Xiaochi didn’t elaborate further. The system also didn’t ask. Chi Xiaochi raised a hand to block the wind as he tried to light the cigarette. But just as the cigarette was about to light, he put his lighter away. The system asked, “Not smoking?” Chi Xiaochi said, “Cheng Yuan has protected his voice for so long. I can’t be the one to destroy it.” The system didn’t speak, simply dialing the warming mode he’d just opened up by another half a notch. When Chi Xiaochi returned to the car, still holding the unlighted cigarette in his mouth. His body hadn’t been frozen by the cold wind and was still warm. He thought, this little young master’s body wasn’t bad, it had a really high cold resistance. As he thought this, Chi Xiaochi bit down on the cigarette filter and started the car. He left the cemetery, slowly driving home. When they passed a soymilk shop, Chi Xiaochi stopped the car and hid the cigarette back in his pocket. Before he drove off to fetch Yang Baihua, Chi Xiaochi had intentionally taken a look at Cheng Yuan’s schedule for today. In particular, he had noted that he needed to stop by the Sun Ji soymilk shop to buy soy milk for his Old Yang. This shop’s handmade soymilk was made by grindstone, giving it a refined taste. Yang Baihua really liked it. After Cheng Yuan and Yang Baihua had become a couple, he’d accompanied him through many breakfast shops and determined his favourite taste of soy milk, gradually forgetting that he himself originally didn’t like drinking soy milk. Chi Xiaochi also didn’t like to drink soy milk and naturally wouldn’t force himself. He bought himself a serving of mungbean porridge, and bought two cups of soymilk for Yang Baihua. As he waited for his order to be packed up, Chi Xiaochi asked the system with a voice full of expectation, “When he drinks these two cups of soymilk, how many goodwill points will I get?” The system: “...;...;” This tone was simply as if he was investigating how to raise pigs scientifically. However, Chi Xiaochi had adjusted his mood quite well, so it seemed like what had happened in the cemetery hadn’t had too big of an impact on him. By the time Chi Xiaochi returned to the car, the effect of the Hypnosis card had worn off and Yang Baihua had woken up. He was sitting in the backseat fiddling with his phone. Cheng Yuan smiled widely, waving the two cups of soymilk in his hands, “I was scared you’d be hungry after waking up so I bought both these cups for you. In a bit, I’ll go buy some steamed buns for you so you can eat your fill.” Whilst Yang Baihua had been sleeping, they’d redeemed 13 of his goodwill points, so originally his attitude towards Cheng Yuan was rather cool, but smelling the fragrance of soy milk, his heart grew warm. When he saw Cheng Yuan’s pure smile, his goodwill value increased by three points, “Good.” Chi Xiaochi said to the system, “See, 62 points. I passed.” The system, “...;...;As a person you should be more ambitious.” He felt like he was an old father, painstakingly advising his idiot son who was already incredibly self-satisfied with his barely passing grades. Chi Xiaochi said, “Let’s set off another firework to celebrate.” The system said, “Don’t fuss.” Chi Xiaochi said, “Fine. Add a little sugar to my mungbean porridge, would you? I forgot to add some just now.” The system despaired slightly, “Mister Chi, what are you taking the target’s goodwill value as?” Chi Xiaochi replied confidently, “As points, of course. I’m cashing them in only because you said I could.” The system: “...;...;” He suddenly felt a little regretful about letting Chi Xiaochi know about the existence of the system shop. The system exchanged 1 goodwill point for half a spoonful of sugar. He placed the spoon into the flexible packaging containing the hot porridge, and even dutifully stirred the sugar in. In the backseat, Yang Baihua was watching Cheng Yuan in the rear-view mirror. He started to speak, before stopping himself, then tried to speak again, before once again stopping himself. Chi Xiaochi let him stew for a while, before putting up a concerned facade. “Old Yang, what’s wrong? Carsick?” Yang Baihua made up his mind. He leaned forward, asking, “Have you been busy lately?” “Yup, I’ve been busy. Very busy.” As he said this, Cheng Yuan’s voice was brimming with vitality, and full of coquettish charm. Yang Baihua asked him, “How’s your song-writing been going?” Originally Cheng Yuan had no shortage of words to say on the subject, but knowing that Yang Baihua was a staunch man of science and technology, who didn’t have much interest in his field, he clamped down on his enthusiasm, “I’m writing lyrics now.” Yang Baihua said, “Xiao Cheng, I’ve been meaning to discuss something with you.” “Go on.” Yang Baihua said, “My mom, dad and third sister will be visiting next week. You’re currently busy composing, and my third sister might even be bringing her kid along, so it won’t be good if they disturb you.” In high spirits, Chi Xiaochi shared his analysis with the system, “See that? He’s trying to chase me away.” The system didn’t reply. Chi Xiaochi’s words weren’t unreasonable. At this time, Yang Baihua hadn’t yet come out to his family. To be precise, even up to when he married a beautiful lady of mixed-blood, except for Yang Baihua’s parents and his cousin Xiaoyan, no one would ever know that Yang Baihua was once gay. In the original timeline, even the big-hearted original host knew that this was just a shallow excuse. They had previously argued because of Cheng Yuan’s older brother sending over a car, so they hadn’t been in the best of moods. Cheng Yuan had complained “Am I that shameful to you?”, leading into a back-and-forth, which then escalated into a fierce argument. That night, Yang Baihua even slept on the sofa. Fortunately (for Yang Baihua), Cheng Yuan was both big hearted and didn’t hold grudges. Early the next morning, he rolled up onto the sofa wrapped in a quilt and took the initiative to make peace with Yang Baihua. Holding his phone, he snuggled up against Yang Baihua’s chest and said, “Look, I can go stay at my classmate’s house next week. So don’t be angry anymore, okay?” After Chi Xiaochi received this world’s information and read over this part, he’d thought, little friend, aren’t you being a little too naive? If you felt dissatisfied, of course you can express it. But expressing it, required careful execution. Cheng Yuan stilled and didn’t respond immediately. Uneasy, Yang Baihua checked Cheng Yuan’s expression in the rearview mirror. Very quickly, Cheng Yuan opened his mouth in a smile, revealing a row of small white teeth. “Alright.” His pinky lightly stroked the leather steering wheel cover. “Mom and dad definitely won’t be willing to stay in a hotel since it’d be too expensive. The guest house near our home is also pretty lousy. After having them travel so far in their old age, making them use a public restroom, which can’t even guarantee 24 hours of hot water, really wouldn’t be very good.” After saying so much at once, he looked up and gave Yang Baihua a slight, reassuring smile in the rearview mirror. Then he lowered his long lashes, warm, yellow streetlight from outside the window sliding across his cheek. “But our home is only a bedroom and a living room, so when the time comes, mom and dad will sleep in the bedroom and you on the sofa. You probably also want to prepare two air mattresses for third sister and her children, right?” Having finished his spiel, he looked up once more, giving Yang Baihua in the the rearview mirror a questioning look. But with that one sentence, the rims of Cheng Yuan’s eyes had turned faintly red. His eyes were misty and shockingly bright in the light of the streetlamps. Discovering he’d lost his composure, Cheng Yuan immediately turned away and coughed, as if trying to hide something. Yang Baihua’s heart skipped a beat. “...;...;Xiao Cheng.” Realising he’d been found out, Cheng Yuan helplessly looked up at Yang Baihua once more. He curled his eyes in a gentle smile, trying to show that he was okay. Upon being stared at by such a pair of eyes, Yang Baihua’s heart melted. ...;...;Cheng Yuan understood his own difficulties, and knew he wasn’t ready to come out to his parents. Even though he was clearly upset, he still tried his best to accommodate him. A thread of guilt wrapped around Yang Baihua’s heart. Yang Baihua said, “Xiao Cheng, I’ll find you a hotel to stay in.” Cheng Yuan didn’t refuse, coquettishly replying with a slightly choked-up voice, “En. I want to stay in a good one, it must be five stars.” Yang Baihua was amused, and went along with him, saying, “Yes, yes, yes, five stars.” The system was amazed. This performance was absolutely perfect. Chi Xiaochi’s every microexpression was amazingly coordinated, and even the changes of in the lights and shadows from outside the window had been used to their fullest effect. If this had been in a movie studio, no matter what angle was used to capture it, his expressions would all be perfect. The system had hastily skimmed through Chi Xiaochi’s information before and knew that before he’d transmigrated, he’d been a model-turned-actor with an endless amount of black powder. 26 years old, started out as a model, and deep in the quagmire of both fans and anti-fans. According to various data analyses, Chi Xiaochi should have been a star that depended on his face to attract fans and not an actor with talent. But that didn’t seem to be the case. The system decided to free up some time to do a thorough check of Chi Xiaochi’s background to get through the adjustment period as soon as possible and improve the efficiency of task completion. Compared to his fellow systems, number 061 had always highly valued efficiency when completing tasks. Chi Xiaochi’s performance this time was incredibly rewarding. Gratified, he said, “System, system, his goodwill level went up by 15 points, and the regret level went up by 6 points.” The system had also received this string of notifications. “En, good work.” Chi Xiaochi, “As per the usual, let’s redeem a card.” The system: “...;...;” Since when did this become the usual. Chi Xiaochi, “What cards can I get with 15 points? ...;...;Nevermind, tonight when we get back just send me the shop information and I’ll flip through it myself.” The system, “...;...;En.” Chi Xiaochi then asked, “Can I bring unused cards along with me to the next world?” The system, “...;...;You can.” Chi Xiaochi was even happier now, “That’s great. How many cards are available in the shop? If I collect a complete set, will there be a reward?” The system couldn’t help but remind him, “Mister Chi, we are serious systems, not a card collecting game.” Chi Xiaochi said, “I like card collecting games. I had a card collecting game on my phone called ‘Summoning Gods and Devils’. Out of the 513 heroes, I just needed 6 more to complete the entire set.” Having said this, Chi Xiaochi then continued bitterly, “...;...;But now that this has happened, I don’t know how much longer it’ll take for that to happen.” To a collector like him, this truly was too cruel. The system ignored him. Chi Xiaochi also shrugged indifferently. They were almost at their destination. There were no free parking spaces in the neighbourhood, so Chi Xiaochi parked the car by the side of the road outside the neighbourhood. When taking out the car keys, Chi Xiaochi turned his head, his gaze falling on Cheng Yuan’s reflection in the car window. The corners of his mouth were naturally tilted slightly upwards, just like a lively little sprout nourished by love. No one would’ve thought that in three years, such a happy and simple youth would commit suicide due to a moderate case of depression, slitting his wrists in a little overseas town facing the water. The author has something to say: Let’s all have a moment of silence for the gong, who turned into a lootbox the moment he spawned qwq I think I can start updates three times a week next week! (crosses fingers) We’ll see~ Rn I’m thinking Fri, Sat, Sun updates. Also please don’t spoil in the comments guys! <i>translator: baumkuchen editor: serefina</i>  The plagiarism incident was only the opening act of Cheng Yuan’s tragic fate. After Yang Baihua returned home and finished listening to Cheng Yuan’s miserable sobs, he placed his hands on his shoulders, saying, “Xiao Cheng, calm down.” Cheng Yuan’s eyes reddened. “Old Yang, believe me, you have to believe me.” Yang Baihua said, “Of course I believe you.” Cheng Yuan tugged at Yang Baihua, repeatedly trying to prove himself to him and asking for help, “You saw me write those songs, right? I even let you listen to them, I even...;...;” Yang Baihua took his hand in his and pressed it to his chest, “I know.” Cheng Yuan trembled as he leaned into that warm and solid chest, like a someone who had finally found a support in the constantly changing world. As he listened to that ever-so-close heartbeat, his ears became hot and numb, and he felt as if this was his only safe harbour in the entire world. Now with reassuring support, Cheng Yuan’s bloodshot eyes filled with fierce flames. He weakly gnashed his teeth, saying, “I can’t just let this go. I want to sue Tang Huan, I want...;” Yang Baihua stilled. He stroked Cheng Yuan’s back. “Xiao Cheng, you’re being too impulsive. You shouldn’t be making decisions right now.” But Cheng Yuan couldn’t care less about that right now. He was suffering from a severe migraine. Before Yang Baihua had come back he’d taken two tablets, but they were slow to take effect. The headache and the anger combined tormented him to the point where his entire body was trembling and he was drenched in cold sweat. “Why? It’s my song, I can’t just let her steal it and frame me for everything.” Yang Baihua furrowed his eyebrows and pushed him away, raising his voice slightly, “Xiao Cheng, calm down and listen to me. You can’t sue her.” Cheng Yuan wordlessly opened and closed his mouth. He stared at him, waiting for an explanation. Yang Baihua sighed deeply, “...;...;This matter is Xiaoyan’s wrong.” Yang Baihua’s younger cousin Yang Xiaoyan had been entrusted to Yang Baihua by his third uncle when she had been admitted into an average normal university half a year ago. She often came over to Yang Baihua’s house for meals. She was the first one in the Yang family to find out her older cousin’s sexual orientation, and often used the excuse of “keeping the secret” to get Yang Baihua to treat her to several large meals. All the members of the Yang family had good appearances. Yang Xiaoyan similarly couldn’t be considered ugly with a white, neat, melon-shaped face. She liked music, and also liked to compose a few small tunes to publish on the internet since the lyrics she added could arouse the sympathy of beautiful and distressed young girls. She’d even accumulated almost ten thousand fans. This made her rather proud of herself, flaunting herself as a woman of talent. But Cheng Yuan actually didn’t really like her. Every time she visited, she’d stick to Cheng Yuan, asking him how much one of his songs could sell for and if he had any connections in the music business. Cheng Yuan didn’t like hearing about such things and would just haphazardly wave it off every time. However, Yang Xiaoyan would never get the hint and would even act spoiled with Yang Baihua, complaining, “Cousin, look, Xiao Cheng-ge’s family has connections but he won’t even help me out a little. I’m so helpless.” Xiaoyan lived in a four-person dorm and her three roommates were all from the city. She refused to lose to them, and would constantly splurge on high quality makeup and branded clothes. Given these spending habits of hers, of course her money was never enough. She could only frequently search out Yang Baihua to borrow more, who really gave it every time she asked. He never refused, not even once. Because of this, there was once when he didn’t even dare to order anything other than plain rice from the company canteen for an entire month. Seeing this, Cheng Yuan’s heart had hurt beyond compare. It was at that time that he’d started learning how to cook. Cheng Yuan stared blankly at Yang Baihua. He asked, confused, “What did you say?” Yang Baihua patiently explained, “Just now, right after we hung up, Xiaoyan called. Do you remember? Last time when mom, dad and third sister came to visit, you’d went elsewhere to stay. Her phone ran out of battery, so she borrowed my phone to look through Taobao. As she was flipping through the stores, she accidentally started playing the demo you wrote. She really liked what she heard and asked me if it was you who wrote it, praising you non-stop.” Cheng Yuan’s eyes widened slightly. Yang Baihua summoned up his courage and continued, “I didn’t think too much of it at the time. I told her you wrote it, and that you liked to write some songs every once in a while. She just hummed in acknowledgement and went back to playing. I never thought that she would...;...;” Cheng Yuan understood. Not daring to believe his own words, he asked, “She stole my songs and sold them? You just let her steal them?” “Don’t put it like that,” Yang Baihua said helplessly, “I didn’t know, and Xiaoyan...;...; she just really likes your songs. She told me that she didn’t have enough money and wanted to earn some herself. However, the songs she wrote weren’t being accepted by any record labels, so she just wanted to try mixing your songs with hers and sending them in as a test. She never thought that once she sent them in they would all be accepted and the six songs would be bought in an instant.《Innermost Feelings》 and 《Autumn Thoughts》...;...; were picked up by Tang Huan.” “She ‘just really likes my songs’?” Cheng Yuan flared up with rage. “She asked me once what I planned on naming my songs. I told her I’d thought up a name for one song in particular and it’d be called 《Innermost Feelings》.” He grabbed his phone, turned it on, and showed Yang Baihua the line from the cover of Tang Huan’s album. “...;...;Old Yang, I ask you, what is this?! Did she even copy the name? This is what you call unintentional?” “...;...;You’ve written so many messy songs and never sent them out. She never thought it would end up like this.” Yang Baihua’s tone had become abnormally heavy. He reached out a hand and grabbed Cheng Yuan’s wrist, “She never thought it’d get so big. When she called me, she was really scared and even cried.” Cheng Yuan thought numbly, who cares that she cried. Yang Baihua painstakingly persuaded, “She already knows she was wrong. But she’s still young, and you should forgive her. If you sue her and the situation gets even bigger, what will it be like for her at school? How would I explain this to my family?” Cheng Yuan felt as if he had been splashed with a bucketful of cold water. He grabbed Yang Baihua and whispered in pain, “k2026;k2026;Then what about me? What do I do? How am I supposed to live after this?” Yang Baihua gently stroked Cheng Yuan’s face. “It will be fine, I believe in you. Those people on the internet don’t know the true story, and are just talking nonsense. As long as you ignore what they are saying online, they can’t hurt you.” Cheng Yuan’s entire life had been smooth-sailing up to this point, and never faced any big crisis. This incident was like a sudden landslide. His mind had become completely muddled, and Yang Baihua’s firm tone swayed him. “...;...;Really?” “Yes,” Yang Baihua patiently guided him, “Think about it, since she was young my parents have treated Xiaoyan like their own child. If our relationship is exposed to them because of Xiaoyan’s matter and Xiaoyan’s reputation is dragged through the mud, then as the main perpetrator, how are they going to accept you?” Cheng Yuan hugged his head, curling up into a ball. “...;...;Why?” Cheng Yuan muttered, “Why...;...;” His life’s desire, his dream of making music, was ruined. Furthermore, his lover was firmly standing on the side of his family. If he didn’t agree to take the responsibility for Xiaoyan, his and Yang Baihua’s future together would be over. His lover or his dream, which one was he supposed to choose? Cheng Yuan had been very obedient since he was young, and other than music, he didn’t have any hobbies. Yang Baihua was the very first person that Cheng Yuan had ever loved like this. To love a person was to carefully place them within your heart, yet fear that your heart wouldn’t be soft enough for them. Yang Baihua was very good and gentle to him. He would coax him when his temper as an artist flared up, he was down-to-earth, diligent, and they were very compatible in bed. Cheng Yuan couldn’t bear to rip open his bloody chest right after experiencing a tempestuous storm that tore his tendons and broke his bones, and forcefully dig out this man who he had loved for three years. He couldn’t do it. Cheng Yuan grabbed hold of Yang Baihua’s shirt and tugged. He asked softly, “With this kind of reputation, how will I write songs? Will there be anyone who still wants me?” Yang Baihua, hearing him give in, unconsciously breathed a big sigh of relief. He pulled Cheng Yuan into his embrace. “I want you.” ...;...;This actually wasn’t the answer Cheng Yuan had wanted. But this was also the best, and only answer he could get at this stage. Cheng Yuan’s company quickly issued a statement severely condemning such vile acts of plagiarism, and even firmly terminated Cheng Yuan’s contract while demanding compensation for this breach of contract. At this critical moment, Cheng Yuan’s older brother Cheng Jian ran over in a rage, pointing at his younger brother’s nose and scolding harshly, “Cheng Yuan, can you endure this? Something this big happened but you still didn’t contact your family? If you don’t consider yourself a part of the Cheng family, you should say so earlier!” Cheng Yuan didn’t respond. His reputation had already rotted. Since he’d already decided to cover up the truth, he had to hide everything from even his family. After scolding him, his brother helped him pay the fine, then spent money to delete the posts online. Still frustrated, he even started to fight online personally with the people scolding him. The netizens, noticing that their comments were being deleted, fought back even harder. The situation became more and more heated. Tang Huan’s company also hadn’t given up on all this free publicity, and started to wantonly buy internet water armies and made marketing posts, boosting the flames from behind the scenes. Amongst them, a particular online singer with over half a million fans was the most fierce. He was a famous Tang Huan fan who sent six to seven Weibo posts a day chasing after Cheng Yuan to ridicule him. A particular post said: “The plagiarising dog probably should be hiding under his bedsheets and trembling in fear now [doge face][doge face][doge face]” Underneath was a mad carnival of Tang Huan fans, their comments full of obscenities horrendous enough to make people feel sick. Cheng Yuan was really scared. He shut off his private messages, shut off his phone, and confined himself in his home. Yang Baihua was patient with him, but he had just started work and didn’t have that much time to accompany him every day. Cheng Yuan thought that after this was over everything would be okay. If he just stuck it out for now, he could still make a comeback. But afterwards, Cheng Yuan found out he could no longer write songs or even touch the piano. The moment he pressed a key he would think of 《Innermost Feelings》, the piano prelude he had so meticulously composed, and his heart would throb so fast his hands would shake with nausea. He couldn’t even play a complete song. After many, many attempts, he suddenly raised both fists and smashed them onto the piano. The piano let out two groans, one high, one low. Cheng Yuan, a genius who had, in college, single-handedly propped up an entire orchestra, couldn’t even play《Ode to Joy》anymore. That day, he collapsed to the floor and cried for a very long time. After Yang Baihua got back, he hugged him and comforted, “If you can’t write, it’s fine. I’ll take care of you.” Yang Baihua remained as gentle as he always was, as if what Cheng Yuan was going through wasn’t anything big and that he would stay with him and stick it out together with him. But Cheng Yuan became more and more abnormal. He would often spend entire days just sitting by the bed not knowing what to do; even a bit of sunshine would frighten him; he spent long periods of time refusing to eat and then overeating; he often forgot where he put his keys and wallet, and the notes on the table had been left without an update for a long time. He knew he was sick, but when he told everything to Yang Baihua, the man just replied, “You’re just in a bad mood, as long as you go out more often you’ll be fine”. After more than three months, the Cheng Jian who’d had a big quarrel with his younger brother couldn’t hold back any longer and sneakily ran over to visit him. Seeing his younger brother who’d thinned to the point of becoming almost unrecognisable, Cheng Jian had a shock and dragged him off to see a psychiatrist. When Cheng Jian took Cheng Yuan’s diagnosis of moderate clinical depression to show to their parents, their mother burst into tears on the spot. Their healthy son had become like this. Their father immediately made an attempt to contact Yang Baihua’s parents, planning on asking what they thought. It wasn’t until they met with the shocked faces of Yang Baihua’s parents did Cheng Yuan’s parents realize, from the beginning till now, Yang Baihua had never mentioned to his family about him being in a relationship with a man for the past three years. Cheng Yuan’s parents’ attitude was very clear: The environment within the country wasn’t good, so they wanted to send Xiao Yuan to a small, quiet town abroad, where there was a hospital that specialized in treating depression, to rest. Given how sick Xiao Yuan had become, he couldn’t leave Yang Baihua, so Yang Baihua was allowed to come along. His work visa or immigration papers would be handled by the Cheng family. That small town was in Europe, where same-sex marriage had been legalised more than ten years ago. From Cheng Yuan’s parents’ actions, it could be said that they made a great concession for their son. Cheng Yuan’s parents originally thought that Yang Baihua’s parents would oppose it and had already prepared a whole string of arguments to persuade them, but after going home to discuss it for a night, Yang Baihua’s parents agreed the very next day. Cheng Yuan and Yang Baihua immigrated over together. In their second year overseas, Cheng Yuan’s illness took a turn for the better. He could play the piano again. When he sat down on the piano bench once more, his smile was just like that of a young child. “Old Yang, what song do you want to listen to? I’ll play it for you.” That year, they got their marriage certificate and had a simple wedding in a church. In the third year, Yang Baihua made great progress with his career. He proposed immigrating his parents over. Cheng Yuan agreed. In the fourth year, Yang Baihua became more and more busy. One day when he came home, Cheng Yuan found that his shirt wasn’t the same one as the one he had worn when he had left yesterday. Cheng Yuan started taking medicine again. He didn’t know how to ask Yang Baihua about it, and more importantly, he didn’t want to know the answer. As for Yang Baihua’s parents, they were always indifferent towards him. Their attitude towards him couldn’t be considered bad, but it couldn’t be considered good either. Even though they were all living under the same roof, they tended to not speak more than two sentences to each other every day. Yang Baihua was too busy, so Cheng Yuan just spent his days at home with two elderly people he couldn’t speak to. He was desperately lonely. However, he didn’t want to let his parents worry about him, so every time his parents called he would always force out his most brilliant smile and say to them, “I’m doing great, you don’t need to worry.” Actually, he wasn’t doing very well. After he relapsed he kept wanting to die, but at the same time he didn’t dare to die. He was scared of wronging his parents and hurting Yang Baihua, so for them, he tried his best to live and tried his best to stand up from the quagmire. He wasn’t afraid of being covered in muddy water himself. He only feared accidentally dirtying the people he cared about. This lasted until one day, Yang Baihua took a day off work. Cheng Yuan had planned on taking the car to the supermarket two kilometers away to buy groceries, but returned because he’d forgot his wallet, and inadvertently overheard the conversation between Yang Baihua and his mother at the kitchen door. Yang Baihua’s mother complained, “You don’t understand, Xiao Cheng is like a gourd that’s had its mouth sawed off, it’s a miracle if he speaks more than five sentences in two days.” Even after so many years, Yang Baihua’s tone was still just as gentle, “Xiao Cheng doesn’t like talking, mom, don’t be angry at him.” Cheng Yuan lowered his head in embarrassment. ...;...;Actually, he used to love talking. As he thought this, he tiptoed over to the table to get his wallet. Just as he turned around to leave, he heard Yang Baihua’s mother say behind him, “We’ve all already gotten our immigration visas ready, when are you going to leave him?” Cheng Yuan: “...;...;” His neck turned stiff. He lowered his head, blankly staring at the floor before his feet, waiting for Yang Baihua’s answer. Yang Baihua was silent. Cheng Yuan felt his silence like a vice around his throat, choking him so hard he couldn’t breathe. Yang Baihua’s mother continued, “Being together with a man, and unable to have a child together isn’t normal. Your father and I have had to lie to our relatives, saying you’re working overseas, and everyone’s praising you for your prospects. Two days ago, your uncle called, asking your father to bring back some western tobacco and wine. He even asked after you, asking if you found a foreign wife and had a foreign kid. Tell me, how am I supposed to respond to that?!” Her words were like knives, stabbing themselves one by one into Cheng Yuan’s body. His entire body started trembling uncontrollably, and his stomach twisted with pain. He bent over slightly, hugging his waist that had already slimmed to the length of a sheet of paper, pressing as hard as possible. “You’d be able to accept a foreign daughter-in-law?” Half a moment later, Yang Baihua’s warm voice resounded once more. “Some time ago, a new woman entered our company, and she’s Chinese. She and I get along really well.” In the midst of her satisfaction, Yang Baihua’s mother thought of another problem. “What are you going to say to Xiao Cheng?” This time, Yang Baihua’s silence lasted even longer. Cheng Yuan didn’t wait to hear Yang Baihua’s answer, but he also didn’t let Yang Baihua be troubled for too long. That night, in the piano room, he slit open his wrists with a utility knife. So, in the beginning when Chi Xiaochi wanted to run Yang Baihua over with the car, he was being entirely sincere. Yang Baihua liked Cheng Yuan, but in the end, it was only like. His goodwill level of 72 points was only 13 points away from the passing mark of indifference. His ‘like’ was ultimately only worth a card, and a firework. Chi Xiaochi returned home with Yang Baihua. The living room table was covered with newspapers. Occasionally, the sound of Yang Baihua on the phone drifted over from the other room. Chi Xiaochi changed into casual clothes. He then went into the kitchen, rolled up his sleeves, and got started on the unwashed dishes that had been piling up for two days. When he was relaxed, Chi Xiaochi usually had an absent-minded expression. He stood in front of the sink clogged with pieces of leftover vegetables, his eyes half-lidded. He let the water slide down his long, slender, white fingers, his posture languid and peaceful, exuding a noble air and perfectly complementing Young Master Cheng’s identity. But his dishwashing technique was abnormally well-practiced, not at all like a person whose ten fingers had never been stained by the sun or touched by spring water. The system asked him, “You know how to wash dishes?” Chi Xiaochi replied, deadly earnest, “I even know how to cook.” The system didn’t believe him. After all, whenever Chi Xiaochi seemed serious, he usually wasn’t. Because in the next second he asked with that same earnest look on his face, “Right, does the shop sell rat poison?” “No,” The system snapped. He now harboured the suspicion that Chi Xiaochi was so enthusiastically doing housework just so he could scout the scene of his future crime. Chi Xiaochi said, “There’s something I want to ask.” The system was expressionless. “...;...;Oh.” Chi Xiaochi suggested, “Could you do an inventory check? Your customer requires it.” The system said, “Cannot.” Chi Xiaochi said, “Rat poison.” The system: “...;...;” Dare I ask if that rat just so happens to weigh one hundred and thirty jin, and also happens to be surnamed Yang? The system wasn’t able to bear it any longer: “Mister Chi, don’t you have any less violent solutions?” “I do have one.” Chi Xiaochi leisurely wiped off the clean dishes with a dry cleaning cloth and placed them back on the shelf. At last, he finally said something normal, “Tomorrow, I’m going to go visit Cheng Yuan’s older brother.” The author has something to say: You see that person? Their mouth says they love me, but they still let me be so upset. ——《The Thirty-Five Years I Waited for You》 This chapter made me so sad T_T I’ve cried every single time I read it (but this time I was crying for a different reason...;. orz) On happier news, I got my first Ko-fi yesterday! Thank you, Somebody~~ <i>translator: baumkuchen editor: serefina</i>  When the dishes were done, Chi Xiaochi didn’t leave the kitchen. He continued to call for the system: “System, system.” The system said, “We don’t sell rat poison.” Chi Xiaochi: “...;...;” The system then continued, “We also don’t sell sleeping pills and weed killer.” Chi Xiaochi comforted him, “Don’t be scared, I was just going to ask about the Hypnosis cards.” The system: “...;...;How long-lasting do you want them to be, and what effect do you want?” Chi Xiaochi: “How long-lasting can they be, and what effects do they have?” The system said, “Like with the other cards, Hypnosis cards are split into three grades: low, medium and high. The difference is in the effect duration. Low-grade ones last 60 minutes, mid-grade ones last 90 minutes, and the high-grade ones’ duration is customisable but cannot exceed 6 hours.” “That works,” Chi Xiaochi said, “Two cards, one high-grade, and one low-grade.” “14 points.” Chi Xiaochi didn’t hesitate, “Done.” The system didn’t immediately make the exchange. “What do you want these Hypnosis cards for?” Chi Xiaochi replied bluntly, “I’m worried about that surnamed Yang going into heat.” The system expressed his understanding. Chi Xiaochi was his eleventh host. Almost everyone had raised similar concerns to system 061 in the first world. After all, in every world, most of the original hosts had some relationship with the target, and the public grain still needed to be dispensed. His first ten task-takers had all circled around the target, basically never breaking away from the original plotline. They would only use the original plotline to avoid pitfalls when appropriate, expressing all kinds of goodwill to the target. When the goodwill level of the target reached 100, they would fake their deaths and leave the world. Most of the time at this point, the regret level of the target would reach its peak. Out of so many task-takers, Chi Xiaochi was the only brave person willing to break away from the original plotline in the very first world. But on the issue of public grain, his attitude was extremely resolute, shockingly stubborn. The system said, “We provide free evacuation services.” At such times, when intimate relations were about to occur, they would extract the host’s consciousness and awareness from the original host’s body, minimizing the discomfort of the task-taker. Leaning against the fridge, Chi Xiaochi lightly pinched the bridge of his nose, “That’s not the problem.” The system thought of a possibility, “...;...;You object to the position?” Chi Xiaochi let out a single scornful laugh, “I object to the person.” The system, “Yang Baihua...;...;” Chi Xiaochi tilted his head, “Don’t make me insult him.” The system understood. He said, “Alright. Then you’ll be using the low-grade Hypnosis card on him today?” “Use both.” Despite saying this, Chi Xiaochi then continued, “First use the low-grade Hypnosis card to put him to sleep. It’s already night anyways, if no accidents occur, he’ll stay asleep for the entire night.” The system asked, “The other card?” Chi Xiaochi answered, “Use it on me.” The system paused. Chi Xiaochi closed his eyes, using Cheng Yuan’s face to let out a smile that was purely Chi Xiaochi’s; frivolous, careless, and containing a little self-mockery. “...;...;Or do you guys have any sleeping pills for sale?” Following Chi Xiaochi’s instructions, the system redeemed two Hypnosis cards, and successfully put them to use. Having sent Yang Baihua to sleep, Chi Xiaochi set himself a 6 hour time limit, and then followed him into a deep sleep. After he fell asleep, the system sent the main system a permission signal, “Number 61-101, requesting permission to log into the main system.” A second later, a mechanical voice sounded, “Number 61-101 has log-in permissions, request approved.” Immediately after that, the originally stable streams of data suddenly started to go out of control, flowing madly like a waterfall, glowing as brilliantly as starlight. The waterfall-like sheets of starlight gradually filtered into brilliant bodies of light, forming physical entities. Under the flowing light curtain, a man in a white shirt and black pants appeared. He stood barefoot in a spacious, tall, domed hall, surrounded by a crowd of people in similar clothing milling around him. A few people recognised him, greeting him familiarly, “061, you’ve come. Did you pick up a new host?” 061 answered, “En.” “Didn’t you only just finish up with one? It’s only been two universal days, why don’t you take ten days or half a month off to reward yourself?” “No time,” 061 replied. The person asking was number 666, a newcomer. Hearing this, he asked, confused, “‘No time?’ What are you rushing for?” 061 didn’t answer. He stared at the ground, slightly perplexed, as if trying his hardest to remember something. Next to them, another young man with an elegant nose and deep eyes seemed to understand. He frowned slightly, then gave 666 a meaningful glance. Changing the subject, he asked 061, “What did you come back here for?” 061 said, “I’m looking for 023.” “He recently moved offices. You should head southwest and look for room 1008.” 061 smiled. 061 had the appearance of a refined and gentle young man. Straight-backed, eyes bright with stars, when he smiled, he was like the early morning sunlight reflecting off snow, looking very approachable. “Thanks.” After saying his goodbyes and walking off a fair distance away, he could still hear 666 complaining, “...;...;Don’t even mention that host of mine to me. What else is good about that guy aside from having a big and lively dick? He holds on with a deathgrip, refusing to let go, and he used up all the condoms in the shop!” The man found the southwestern room 1008 and knocked on the door. Only after a long wait, did he hear a chilly “please come in.” He opened the door and entered. As he pushed open the door, the insides of the room loaded in. The surrounding light dispersed, before gathering together once more, coalescing into a giant, human-brain-shaped quantum computer. On closer inspection, the flowing neurons and peristaltic synapses in the brain were all bytes orbiting in a sea of data. This was the main God’s system’s “brain”, which connected the databases of various worlds. A teenager with snow-white skin sat in front of the giant quantum computer, two long, slender, silvery-white data cables laid out on the table before him. He was playing Tetris on a old-fashioned video game console, his pale fingernails moving like lightning over the red and green controller buttons. He had albinism, so his hair and skin were all the same shade of white. 061 said, “023, it’s me.” 023 didn’t raise his head. He let out a single “oh”, followed by, “You again.” He successfully eliminated a few more lines of blocks, making the console in his hands ring out with consecutive “didi” noises of blocks disappearing. 061 stepped into the room, standing barefoot on the matte ceramic tiles, patiently waiting for him to finish his game. As he played, 023 asked, “What did you come here for?” 061 said, “I want to download a few movies.” 023 held up his console, “Ah.” 061: “...;...;” Operating the game console with a single hand, he picked up the data cables on the table with the other. The thin plug of the data cable morphed in shape as it approached his temple. Cobweb-thin silver filaments extended from the top of the cable, intertwining as they entered his temple, connecting directly to his brain. Soon after, dense strings of binary code flashed across 023’s eyes. 023 shot out, “Serial number?” 061: “...;...;” What damned serial number. He answered, “All the movies Chi Xiaochi has acted in.” Hearing these eight words, the teenager who had been engrossed in his game suddenly looked up, as if he had seen a ghost. His finger flexed involuntarily, activating fast drop. By the time he noticed and tried to salvage the situation in a panic, Game Over had already filled the screen. 023 swore, then tossed the video game console back onto the table. He turned towards 061, arms crossed, “Your new host? What are you downloading all his movies for?” 061 said, “And everything else we have on him.” “What do you want those for?” 061 said, “To deepen my understanding of him, to facilitate faster completion of tasks.” 023’s snow-white brows furrowed tightly, as if discontent, “061, let me remind you, don’t get too close to your hosts. You have no idea how dirty human’s hearts are. If you don’t want to be reformatted again, do as I say. Don’t disobey the rules laid down by the main God.” 061 knew 023 meant well. When he was on his eighth host, he was reported once by his own host and was punished with a reformatting. After being forcibly reformatted, 061 forgot a lot of things, even forgetting the very reason he’d been reported. His database only retained some basic information about past tasks. This didn’t have too much of an impact on 061. He was still the most excellent employee of the year, and his diligence and efficiency still left all the other systems behind in the dust. It was just that even he didn’t remember the reason behind his diligence anymore. He seemed to have been in a hurry to catch an appointment, to find a person. But as to who that person was, their name, or even where to look for them, that information had all become fragmented garbage data. 061 said: “This is the fifteenth time you’ve reminded me.” “If you don’t want to be destroyed, just do your job well,” 023 said, “...;...;It’s the sixteenth time now, I’ve made it an auspicious number. No need to thank me.” 061 good-naturedly rubbed the tip of his nose, “Are you done downloading the movies yet?” 023, “...;...;It’s done. Check your inbox.” “So fast?” 023 knocked on his forehead, falling silent for a moment, “I’ve downloaded it before, it was still saved in the database.” 061 was curious, “En?” “It was someone who’d come from the same world as Chi Xiaochi, they were one of his brainless fans,” 023’s words carried a slight undertone of ‘hating iron for not becoming steel’, “They downloaded every single one of Chi Xiaochi’s movies. Their entire life just revolved around him, really immature.” 061 didn’t think anything of it. He pulled out a cartridge from his chest and tossed it to 023. “Pacman, produced in 1983,” 061 said, “Thanks for your help.” 023 was as if he had gained the most precious treasure. He used his sleeve to give the cartridge a quick clean, trying his best to stop his mouth from grinning and hide his happiness, “I suppose you do have a conscience.” 061 said, “Help me out with another thing.” Having gotten a present, 023 was in a much happier mood, “What?” When 061 said his request, blue veins bloomed on 023’s forehead, “Do you have any idea how troublesome that is?” 061 gave a slight bow, expressing his request. Gazing at the cover of his new game cartridge, 023 casually waved his hand, “Got it, got it. I don’t have any problem with helping, but this is too difficult to locate so I definitely can’t get it to you by today.” “Two days is also fine.” 023 pulled the data cable out of his head and picked up his console once more, “Okay, if there’s nothing else, then let this imperial court session adjourn.” 061 warmly laughed, “As your Majesty orders.” Walking to the door, 061 stopped and turned around to ask, “By the way, 023, does the shop stock rat poison?” 023 raised his eyebrows, “Ha?” 061 coughed lightly, “...;...;Just a casual question.” Chi Xiaochi spent the night sleeping while the system spent it watching movies. When the effects of the Hypnosis card wore off, Chi Xiaochi promptly woke up. The system checked the time, “It’s only 5am, the sun hasn’t risen. You should sleep a little longer.” Chi Xiaochi got up, leaving Yang Baihua alone on the bed. He walked over to the piano bench in the living room and sat down, “After waking up, I can’t fall back asleep.” With this piano, the originally decently-sized living room became rather cramped. Chi Xiaochi ran his hands absently over the piano cover, lost in thought. It was unknown what exactly was on his mind. The system took the initiative to start chatting with him, “The shop doesn’t stock any rat poison.” Chi Xiaochi lifted up the piano lid, “...;...;You actually remembered? I was just kidding.” He silently stroked the black and white piano keys, feeling the raging creative impulse and endless inspiration in his body. It was an unique treasure solely belonging to Cheng Yuan which had been stripped down until there was practically nothing left because of Yang Baihua, who still disparaged it as being superfluous. “A mouthful of rat poison, and that’s the end of it? That’s letting him off too easy,” Chi Xiaochi said, “If he didn’t get to personally experience everything Cheng Yuan had to go through, wouldn’t that be too unfair?” Upon waking up, Yang Baihua wanted to pull Cheng Yuan into his arms and bask in their shared warmth for a while, but he’d woken up somewhat late and didn’t have any more time to rub their heads together. He could only give Cheng Yuan a hurried hug before rushing out the door with his computer. Before heading out, he grabbed the keys of their new car, saying, “I’m going to see a client at noon, so no need to send me lunch today. I’ll buy dinner for us tonight, your favourite braised chicken liver. Right, don’t forget to eat breakfast.” The good thing about Yang Baihua was that he was truly a tender person. He’d never lost his temper at Cheng Yuan before. During those years when Cheng Yuan was suffering from depression, he was still as good-tempered as ever, still indulging and spoiling Cheng Yuan as he always had as if nothing could ever make him truly angry. ——To put it bluntly, as long as Cheng Yuan’s interests didn’t conflict with those of his family, he would have been able to forever continue to treat him so tenderly. Right after Yang Baihua’s foot stepped out the door, Chi Xiaochi followed on his heels. He’d checked the route ahead of time and got on the bus to Cheng Jian’s company. Cheng Yuan really got motion-sickness. The long, bumpy ride made him sick to his stomach. He could only hug the grab pole in a death grip, unable to even speak. The moment the bus reached his stop, he immediately rushed off and found the nearest trash bin. He began to retch incessantly, vomiting till his small face turned pale. The system originally wanted to help him adjust, but suddenly thought of something and held back. Instead, he just helped him by lowering his heart rate to alleviate some of his internal discomfort. Chi Xiaochi easily straightened back up. He wiped away the involuntary tears that had formed in the corners of his eyes and took out his phone. Facing the entire office building occupied by the Cheng family company, he dialed a phone number. His eyes were red and his small face was deathly white as he smiled, “Ge, it’s me. If you’re not busy, come down for a bit.” The author has something to say: Today’s about the main plotline qwq <i>translator: baumkuchen editor: serefina</i>  Ten minutes later, a man wearing a light grey suit appeared at the entrance to the office building. His younger brother, Cheng Yuan, was huddled in a short down jacket. The tip of his nose and his exposed neck were pale, and his eyes were red. He looked very cold. Cheng Jian frowned. Slightly irritable, he reached up with a hand to loosen the wool scarf wrapped around his neck. Soon, Cheng Yuan was enveloped by a warmth that carried a light fragrance of men’s cologne. Cheng Yuan tugged at the scarf around his neck, a little discontent, “Itchy.” Cheng Jian gave him a dirty look, “If you dare take it off I’ll beat you.” Cheng Yuan’s legs shook, his reaction honest. Cheng Jian really would beat people up. At seven or eight years old, usually a time when kids are even disliked by dogs, Cheng Yuan was much more graceful than the other children his age. The reason was that when he was younger, the very moment he started acting up, he would be thoroughly “educated” by his older brother through various violent means, and, just like that, was trained to be obedient and soft. With a tough father and older brother, and a soft mother, it was no wonder that when Cheng Yuan met the gentle and tender Yang Baihua, he quickly fell head-over-heels in love with him and never looked back. Without giving him the chance to pull away, Cheng Jian grasped Cheng Yuan’s hand in a stubborn grip. Feeling the ice-cold hand in his grasp, Cheng Jian’s expression turned even darker. He stripped off both his gloves and threw them into Cheng Yuan’s arms, mocking, “Is he that poor? He can’t even afford gloves?” Cheng Yuan tucked the scarf down, exposing his mouth. He replied defensively, “I just don’t like wearing them.” This actually was the truth. Cheng Yuan didn’t like wearing scarves or gloves, especially scarves. After wearing them for a while, his neck would get unbearably itchy. Cheng Yuan wanted to say a little more, but after meeting Cheng Jian’s fierce gaze, he momentarily fell silent. “Talk, keep talking,” Cheng Jian let out a cold laugh, “The moment I say even one sentence about him, you’ll rebut me with ten more. It’s exactly this that makes you so immature, you’re picking up a...;...; rock and treating it like a treasure.” Chi Xiaochi, who was acting as Cheng Yuan, momentarily broke character to speak to the system, “I think what he actually wanted to say just now was “a piece of shit”.” The system very much agreed. Cheng Jian managed to hold back his words, obviously not wanting to get into a fierce argument right off the bat. He took in Cheng Yuan’s red-rimmed eyes and his eyelashes which were still damp with tears, “...;...;You and him quarrelled?” Cheng Yuan was a lot smaller than Cheng Jian. He could fit both his hands into just one of Cheng Jian’s gloves for warmth. “No, it’s just my stomach doesn’t feel well.” Cheng Jian asked, “You didn’t have breakfast?” Cheng Yuan smiled, “I’m trying to lose weight.” “Lose weight my ass,” Cheng Jian pinched his waist, “You’re practically a stick, is that even attractive?!” Cheng Yuan jumped from the sudden pinch. He whined, “...;...;Ge.” “Ge ge ge, being your brother is really the greatest misfortune of my eight lifetimes,” Cheng Jian shoved his hands into his pockets, “You still don’t drink soy milk right? Then we shouldn’t go to Yonghe, let’s go to that high-end porridge store over there.” As he spoke, he casually looked around and asked, “Where’d you park the car?” Cheng Yuan responded naturally, “He took it to work. I came here by bus.” Cheng Jian was momentarily stunned, his eyes opening wide. Cheng Yuan was immediately on alert, preemptively shielding his head with his arms and retreating back five steps. Cheng Jian really wanted to beat him up to help him remember a little better, but it was still working hours and they were right by the entrance to the company. President Cheng still needed face, so he hurried forward, grabbed Cheng Yuan by the neck, and trapped him in his arms, “What are you running for?” Cheng Yuan thought he was about to be beaten up, and shrunk his neck back in fear, “Ge, there’s people around, people.” Noticing the fear in his younger brother’s eyes, Cheng Jian’s heart softened and the hands on his shoulders relaxed their grip slightly. His mercy was just like this. His mouth was still unforgivingly sharp, and a mouthful of mockery poured out without any hesitation, “Cheng Yuan, you really are capable. Aren’t you quite skilled at keeping your boy toy? You should work harder to buy a house, so clothing, food, shelter and transport can all be provided by you. When that time comes, he’ll take care of your home while you put food on the table, he’ll embroider flowers while you’re busy tending the fields. Like that you two can be happy and harmonious together for a long, long time, wouldn’t that be great?” Cheng Yuan lowered his head, “Ge, don’t say that. He needs to travel to work everyday, while I just spend the whole day lazing around at home. He needs the car more.” Cheng Jian’s insides twisted in anger, but after thinking about how Cheng Yuan had said his stomach didn’t feel well, he still forced himself to calm down. He dragged Cheng Yuan towards the porridge store, “...;...;What kind of porridge do you want? Porridge with lean meat and century eggs? Plain porridge?” “Porridge with lean meat and century eggs.” “Still so picky.” “Thank you, ge.” “Thanks my ass, your century eggs and lean meat is just wishful thinking. Since you don’t feel well, you should just drink millet porridge.” After a few mouthfuls of hot porridge, Cheng Yuan regained some colour in his pale face. Other than his nose, which was still flushed, his cheeks had already regained their powdered lustre, looking incredibly pinchable. Cheng Jian removed his coat, rolled up his shirt cuffs, and helped him pour out some vinegar into a small plate, “Why are you looking for me?” Not waiting for Cheng Yuan to speak, Cheng Jian quickly added, “If he has any issues, then you help him deal with that yourself, don’t bother speaking.” “It’s not him...;...; or well, kind of,” Cheng Yuan picked up a dumpling with crab filling. Hearing Cheng Jian say this, his expression was a little troubled, “...;...;Ge, please don’t tell mom and dad about this, okay?” Cheng Jian was expressionless, “We’ll see.” Cheng Yuan dipped the steamed bun into the vinegar and asked in a small voice, “Ge, do you have a spare house?” Cheng Jian raised his eyebrows, “...;...;What are you planning on doing?” Cheng Yuan hurriedly waved his hand, “I don’t mean that, ge, I want to borrow your house to stay in for a week. It’ll just be me, and no one else.” Cheng Jian, “You two actually quarreled?” Cheng Yuan looked a little lonely. He bit into his steamed bun, vaguely replying, “No, his parents are coming to visit, so he wants me to move out for a bit.” Cheng Jian slammed a fist on the table. A loud bang sounded, causing half of the people in the store to look over at them. Cheng Jian couldn’t care less, “His parents still don’t know about the two of you?!” Cheng Yuan froze before immediately trying to defend Yang Baihua, “No, no. Old Yang’s parents have been frugal for all their lives. They definitely won’t be willing to stay in a hotel, so I’ll be moving out so they can stay...;...;” “Did I ask about that? It’s all motherfucking nonsense!” Cheng Jian didn’t listen to Cheng Yuan’s explanation, “Just tell me, has he let you meet his parents?” Cheng Yuan poked the bottom of his bowl with his spoon. “...;...;He still hasn’t come out?!” “He’s still not ready...;...;” “No, when is he going to ever be ready? Is he going to drag it out until he’s married and has a child or until he dies of old age?” Cheng Yuan didn’t say a word, and for once, didn’t defend the man like usual. Seeing his younger brother’s listless appearance, Cheng Jian’s heart rapidly softened. He raised a hand, wanting to pat him on the head, but paused halfway, forming a fist and swatting the back of his head, not hard but not too soft, making him shrink his neck. Cheng Yuan said, “If that’s not possible, I could also live in your office.” Cheng Jian became impatient, “...;...;Don’t make groundless assumptions. Just eat your food.” Cheng Yuan looked up, “Don’t let mom and dad know...;...;” “You rotten little thing, mom and dad will find out sooner or later,” Cheng Jian said rather bluntly, “You should just try to find your happiness from within.” When he finished, he took out his phone and went to contact the people managing his residences to help Cheng Yuan. Chi Xiaochi quietly lowered his head and took a bite of his steamed crab dumpling. The rich fragrance of the crab juices and the sourness of the aromatic, aged vinegar filled his mouth. It was piping hot and burnt his mouth a little. In his previous life, Cheng Yuan hadn’t sought help from Cheng Jian at all, just casually staying over at a friend’s house for a week. He often felt that his family was far too overprotective of him, but he didn’t know what he lost was a fortress that was willing to shelter him from the wind and the rain forever. When going over the original Cheng Yuan’s memories, Chi Xiaochi had deliberately looked a little further in the timeline and saw that Cheng Jian went overseas to arrange Cheng Yuan’s affairs after his death. His older brother, who had been loathe to leave the house in anything less than a suit even to take out the trash, never forgot to slick back his hair, put on cologne, and meticulously groom himself, seemed to have aged ten years in a single evening. His chin was covered in messy, half-shorn stubble, as a slip of his razor left a long, bloody cut stretching across his lower jaw to his neck, terrifying to look at. He had seen his younger brother’s ice-cold corpse in the hospital. Cheng Yuan had basically cut off half of his wrist. ...;...;Such a deep cut, how could he have made it? As he thought this, Cheng Jian silently got onto a taxi to head back to the Yang family’s house, and halfway there, he got off the taxi and bought a kitchen knife. Afterwards, he nearly hacked down the door to the Yang family’s house with that kitchen knife. Yang Baihua and his parents had sensed something was off and hid in the house in time, not responding to his hysteria, and called the police. Abroad, attacking and disturbing private houses was a very serious offense. The police quickly arrived to the scene, and rushed to subdue Cheng Jian. When he was violently pressed down into the ground, half of Cheng Jian’s face was covered with boiling hot gravel heated by the afternoon sun. He’d already calmed down, yet could only mutter a sentence over and over, his voice wracked with grief. “...;...;My younger brother was only twenty-seven years old, he hadn’t even made it to thirty.” Having finished his phone call, Cheng Jian walked back into the store, pulling out a stool, “You’ll be moving in next week, right?” Chi Xiaochi just looked at him. Quickly, the afterimage of that unkempt, bearded face, messy with gravel and dark blood, disappeared when confronted with Cheng Jian’s current high-spirited face. Shaking himself out of that mood, Chi Xiaochi successfully re-immersed himself in the role of Cheng Yuan. He nodded lovably, “En.” “I’ll send you the address. Later, when you’re finished eating, I’ll call the chauffeur Xiao Yan to send you home. When you need to move over, give me a call. Xiao Yan knows how to keep his mouth shut so he won’t leak it to dad,” Cheng Jian said, “When you get back, don’t tell Yang Baihua you came to visit me. Just say you’ll be staying outside with a friend.” Cheng Jian had always been capable and straightforward when dealing with business-related matters, swift, decisive, and meticulous with forethought, but he rarely put himself in this state in his private life. To Cheng Yuan, he was only a poisonous-tongued, heavy-handed older brother who had a heart softer than his words. In other words, his attitude proved that he realized the seriousness of the problem between Cheng Yuan and Yang Baihua and he took it to heart. Before leaving, Cheng Jian left his scarf and gloves with Cheng Yuan. Shortly after Chi Xiaochi left the company with Xiao Yan, he offered to get off the car. “You should still have other things to do, so go work,” Chi Xiaochi said, “I know the way back. Just tell my brother that I ate too much so I was a little restless and wanted to walk back to help digest.” After getting off the car, Chi Xiaochi barely needed to raise his head before catching sight of the headquarters of Yundu Entertainment. This was the entertainment company supporting Tang Huan. After a serious round of marketing and branding, Tang Huan effortlessly became one of the new rising stars of the mainland music industry and one of Yundu Entertainment’s trump cards in the music market, fully deserving of her title as “Number One Sister”. The system asked, “What did you come here for?” Chi Xiaochi took a look around at his surroundings, “Just casually checking it out.” Now free of any audience to watch his performance, Chi Xiaochi became Chi Xiaochi once more. He loosely wrapped his scarf around his neck and just stood there as he wanted. A heroic air entwined and conflicted with his indolent aura, making him incredibly eye-catching. Regardless of whether one was a celebrity or an actor, they would all have gone through a long period of coaching on one’s conduct and would stand out from ordinary people. Cheng Yuan, as a very clean and handsome youth, wasn’t bad looking, and Chi Xiaochi’s temperament undoubtedly injected some spirit into this slightly tender handsomeness. Just standing by the side of the road, Chi Xiaochi attracted the occasional second glance from passersby. Seeing this, the system suddenly had a thought, “Mister Chi, I have an proposal: How about you try and become an actor?” Just last night, the system had watched Chi Xiaochi’s first movie,《The Cape Murders》. At that time, Chi Xiaochi had only been 18 years old, but his performance as a simple teenager from a fishing village and his portrayal of the short life that ended in degradation and destruction left every viewer shocked and their heart racing. He used the duration of one movie to show everyone the true meaning of talent. One of the emotional climaxes of the movie was the scene where his one and only good friend died. His friend died to protect him. As he died a slow, painful death, the teenager from the fishing village cradled his only friend in his arms and sung the song they would shout together when they went out to sea as a melodious tune for him. He knew his friend’s pain, so he smiled as he sent him off. His eyes and mouth were smiling, but a lone tear leaked out from his smiling eyes. Chi Xiaochi didn’t grab at him crazily or roar in sorrow, acting this scene out very quietly. This sensitive understanding and meticulous portrayal of the character’s emotions was something many actors had been pursuing for a lifetime, but when Chi Xiaochi first debuted he could already use it as he pleased. He was a genius at acting. In this world, the entertainment industry was just as developed, so if he were to become an actor, he would have great potential. After listening to the system’s proposal, Chi Xiaochi’s response was actually rather unenthusiastic, “Good idea.” Chi Xiaochi’s indifferent attitude told the system that he probably had never had such plans. Sure enough, Chi Xiaochi said, “To me, acting is to truly and thoroughly become that person, and only then would I be showing the greatest respect for that person.” He looked up at Yundu Entertainment’s giant office building and continued lightly, “This is Cheng Yuan’s life. I have to live the life Cheng Yuan would want to live.” The system’s heart was slightly shaken. ...;...;Chi Xiaochi didn’t seem to be as capricious or as unaware as he previously thought. The system asked, “So what do you plan on doing from now on?” Without saying a word, Chi Xiaochi stepped forward, walking away from the Yundu Entertainment building. Not far away, on a LED screen, Tang Huan’s endorsement ad of Dafu Jewelry played over and over again on a loop. The Tang Huan incident was a great turning point in Cheng Yuan’s tragic life, yet because of this incident, Tang Huan’s popularity soared, allowing her to successfully achieve her own transformation. For Tang Huan and Cheng Yuan, one was the protagonist, and the other was a supporting character. The purpose of a supporting character was to exert all their effort to contrast their dim light against the protagonist’s own light, allowing the protagonist’s radiance to shine even brighter. But in Chi Xiaochi’s world, he was also someone used to being the protagonist. Chi Xiaochi started speaking to himself, “...;...;Then in this case, who the protagonist actually is will all depend on their ability.” ...;I almost forgot to post a chapter today lmao By the time I realised, I’d already gone to bed <i>translator: baumkuchen editors: serefina, verywronganswer, aroma</i>  A few days later, Chi Xiaochi started packing up in preparation to move into Cheng Jian’s spare apartment. He specifically invited a moving company over to move his beloved piano out of Yang Baihua’s home, using the excuse of “not making Yang Baihua’s parents suspicious”. With the piano gone, the living room looked much more empty. Although they had put pads under the piano legs, the area where the piano had been still retained white marks that stood out from the floorboards around it. Chi Xiaochi prepared a bucket of clean water and started humming as he scrubbed the floor. Yang Baihua was also busy cleaning up in preparation for his parents’ visit. Cheng Yuan was humming the song he played for him that day, shaking his head around, looking incredibly cheerful. Seeing how cheerful he looked made Yang Baihua a little irritated. When Cheng Yuan was still in university, he was fanatically obsessed with something called “Instrument Mimicry”, a pioneering type of music. It was an incredibly neglected branch of the arts and demanded a high professional standard, so Cheng Yuan’s little orchestra had never had more than five members in the four years since it had been founded. Yang Baihua once visited Cheng Yuan’s university to watch them perform. The few university students played the tambourine and violin, singing and dancing in that tiny music room. There were no lyrics, just singing spontaneously, each picking up the melody one after another and harmonizing. After they finished singing, Cheng Yuan ran over to Yang Baihua with pattering steps, guitar in his arms. Yang Baihua twisted the cap off a bottle of water and passed it over to him, “Are you guys going to perform somewhere?” Cheng Yuan hugged the water bottle, “No. We’re just playing around.” He gulped down two mouthfuls of water, “Do you like it?” Yang Baihua laughed, then flipped the question back at him, “Are you happy?” Cheng Yuan smiled, showing off a row of small white teeth, “Happy.” Yang Baihua helped him comb through his hair, “If it makes you happy, then I like it.” At that time, Cheng Yuan was still a young second-year university student who had grown up soaking in a honeypot, so what did he know? His only knowing to play around was only natural. ...;...;But why has he still not grown up even now? Throughout his four years of university, he was only concerned with “playing”. Even now, he didn’t have any skills to support himself with, still hoping to support himself through music. Could it be he was planning on just “playing” for a lifetime? Chi Xiaochi was too lazy to try to guess Yang Baihua’s current complex thoughts, and simply focused on his humming. Yang Baihua placed the clean broom out on the balcony to dry, wiped his hands, and ruffled Chi Xiaochi’s hair. As though helplessly coaxing a child, he said, “Why do I feel like you’re actually very happy about moving out?” Chi Xiaochi was indeed very happy. He even wanted to celebrate with 3 points worth of fireworks. After all, he didn’t want to waste 4 extra points every day protecting his integrity and safety from Yang Baihua. Chi Xiaochi’s mouth ran like a train, “No, no. I haven’t seen my friend in a long time, and since I’m going to stay with him, we can finally have a good chat.” Yang Baihua’s brows furrowed imperceptibly, “What friend?” Chi Xiaochi said, “He’s a childhood friend.” “...;...;What’s his name?” Chi Xiaochi answered lightly, “Lou Ying.” He didn’t know if it was his own misconception, but the instant he mentioned the two words “Lou Ying”, Yang Baihua found that “Cheng Yuan”’s expression and tone turned shockingly gentle, as if to him, those two words were a treasure carefully hidden in the tip of his heart, which couldn’t lightly reveal to others, only willing to occasionally bring it out, carefully clasped in both hands, to clean and polish. Yang Baihua became alert, “Why haven’t I ever heard you mention him before?” Chi Xiaochi rinsed the washcloth in the bucket, then wrung it out with his hands, “He left the country very early on.” Yang Baihua only then realized that he hadn’t yet cleared up a very important question, “You only told me you found a place to stay, not where you’ll be staying.” Chi Xiaochi announced the name of a district, then sat back and enjoyed how Yang Baihua’s expression changed. k2014;k2014;That district’s monthly property fee was an entire level higher than Yang Baihua’s salary. The system said, “Isn’t that Cheng Jian’sk2026;k2026;” Chi Xiaochi said, “Shh, don’t talk. Just focus on this experience.” The system, “k2026;k2026;What experience?” Chi Xiaochi, “The pleasure of stringing someone up and beating them as a rmb warrior.” The system, “k2026;k2026;” Yang Baihua’s consciousness returned, and he asked, “That Lou Yingk2026;k2026; What kind of person is he?” Chi Xiaochi answered, “He’s a really good person. He was my best friend when I was younger.” Yang Baihua’s thin lips flattened, “Xiao Cheng, how long has it been since you two last met?” Chi Xiaochi didn’t have to think before answering, “It’s been more than 12 years now.” Hearing this, Yang Baihua breathed a sigh of relief. He said in a low, tender voice, “12 years, it’s been so long. He’s definitely not the same as he was before.” Chi Xiaochi shrugged, and said, unperturbed, “Probably.” “There’s no telling what’s in a man’s heart. He invited you over to stay with him. Do you have any idea what his intentions are?” Chi Xiaochi looked back with Cheng Yuan’s innocent, rabbit-like eyes, as if he had no idea what Yang Baihua was talking about. There were some people who could spend every moment together with another yet still not understand their heart. Seeing Cheng Yuan not take his indirect advice to heart, Yang Baihua’s mood became even more turbulent. Even though Cheng Yuan had a gentle and soft personality, Yang Baihua would never be on the same level as those in his friend circle. Every time Cheng Yuan’s friends appeared, it would constantly remind Yang Baihua that Cheng Yuan wasn’t someone from the same world as him. Yang Baihua needed to pull him into his own circle. Therefore, through meticulous planning and persuasion, he’d already helped Cheng Yuan draw a clear line between him and many people in his friend circle that he deemed unworthy of knowing. But who knew that now, this Lou Ying would appear? This conversation made the atmosphere between the two people become rather unpleasant. To be exact, it was only Yang Baihua who was feeling unhappy. That night, he texted Cheng Yuan to let him know that his manager had assigned him some last-minute overtime, so he wouldn’t be coming home to sleep tonight. Soon, Cheng Yuan sent a text in reply, “Jiayou.” He even followed it with three hearts. Yang Baihua, “...;...;” After responding to Yang Baihua’s text, Chi Xiaochi laid back down on the big, soft bed in Cheng Jian’s apartment and spoke to the system, “I wonder what kind of face he’ll make when he comes home and finds out that I’ve already moved out.” The system thought, it’ll probably be a face of “-20 goodwill points”. Chi Xiaochi stretched languidly, “His parents will be here the day after tomorrow. When they’re not here yet, he wants me gone, but after I’ve left, he’s still not happy. Men are all big pig trotters. (tn: liars)” The system admired Chi Xiaochi’s calm but still couldn’t resist reminding him, “Mister Chi, please pay attention to the task progression.” For the past few days, Chi Xiaochi had been constantly sounding out the exact passing mark of Yang Baihua’s goodwill level. As for the regret level, the only requirement for completing the task, it had been completely ignored by Chi Xiaochi. Chi Xiaochi asked a question in reply, “Aren’t you tired?” The system, “...;...;En?” Chi Xiaochi said, “You’ve been constantly calling me Mister Chi. It’s been a good few days already, are we still so unfamiliar with each other?” The system didn’t respond. He wasn’t like this in the past, and had always built a good relationship with his previous hosts. He’d continued with that attitude until he was reported by his eighth host. From his ninth host onwards, he began calling his hosts “Mister X”. “If that’s the case, so be it,” Chi Xiaochi quickly discerned the system’s misgivings from his silence and said magnanimously, “It’s best if there’s less feelings between us, otherwise, when I have eventually to leave, I’m afraid that you’ll be sad enough to cry.” The system, “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi, “Because you won’t ever be able to find another amazing host like me, who lets you watch movies in my head in the middle of the night.” The system, “...;...;...;...;” Chi Xiaochi said, “Next time remember to not use broadcasting.” The system said, “...;...;Sorry.” Chi Xiaochi said, “It’s nothing, I haven’t watched those movies in a long time, so it was nice being able to rewatch them along with you.” Other than guilt, the system still harboured some doubts, “Mister Chi, weren’t you using the Hypnosis card?” All the goodwill points he’d earned over the past few days had all been spent on Hypnosis cards. He would first “drug” Yang Baihua unconscious, then “drug” himself, making the system feel like he’d been downgraded from a proper system to a shady drug dealer. “I’m a light sleeper,” Chi Xiaochi said, “Also, it’s a Hypnosis card, not a Dead Pig card.” The system apologised again, “Sorry.” Chi Xiaochi asked, “Aren’t my movies good?” The system, “...;...;They’re good.” Chi Xiaochi said, “Very good. Since you can download my movies, in the future after I’ve finished all the tasks and returned, maybe you’ll still be able to see me.” Hearing Chi Xiaochi say this, the system asked, “Do you want to go back to your original world?” Chi Xiaochi raised an eyebrow, “Of course.” The system laughed bitterly to itself. System 061 served as a “Scum Gong Reconditioning System”, which was just one branch out of many world systems. The hosts carrying out these missions, without exception, had all had a life-threatening accident in their respective worlds. Just as their brain waves were on the verge of dissipating, they were captured by the main system. Then, surveying systems that had extended radio waves to every parallel world would escort them over. The main system would sign a contract with the hosts, assign them to systems, and have them execute certain tasks. After successfully going through ten worlds, the hosts could make one wish. After fulfilling that wish, the contract would automatically be terminated. As for their physical bodies in their original world, the system could only guarantee that their most basic survival needs were fulfilled. From the private chats between systems, 061 knew that almost all their hosts had the desire to “go home” when they first entered. However, the flow of time in the task worlds was the same as that in the host’s reality. What it meant for a person to spend months or even years lying in bed like a corpse didn’t need to be said. This point was enough to make every previous host 061 had accepted change their wish in the later half of their mission. Half of the reason why 061 pursued efficiency like he did, was to send hosts home as fast as possible, but to this day, he had not yet accomplished this even once. ——Without fail, they all chose to stay in one of their task worlds, and left their original bodies behind to die. The reason why he was urging Chi Xiaochi to act quickly was out of the fear that he would stay too long in the task worlds and forget where he came from. In these past few days, 061 had read up on quite a bit about Chi Xiaochi. He’d also seen Chi Xiaochi’s original appearance in his movies. His appearance was even more striking than he had imagined. The expression in his eyes were faint. His face perpetually carried the languidness of having his desires satisfied. A head of thick, mid-length black hair was gathered back in a simple ponytail, making his neck look especially long and slender. His body was strong and lean, with a fine, delicate bone structure and distinct back dimples, yet not lacking muscles. Even when he was just acting as a youth from a fishing village, he brought with him a noble temperament that made him stand out, giving life to the teenager with a heart higher than heaven but an absolutely miserable fate. Unlike what his noble appearance would imply, however, Chi Xiaochi was of a surprisingly mediocre origin. His father was a worker in a toothbrush factory, and his mother was a working woman in a small, local workshop that made foodstuff. His ancestral home was a small, broken-down apartment in a tube-shaped apartment building. He wasn’t on good terms with his parents, and after entering the entertainment circle, he didn’t have any particularly close friends. His relationship experience was zero. However, he was very popular with the elders and the big-shots in the circle, especially with genius scriptwriter Sun Guangren. Considering all the information and data, 061 reckoned that to Chi Xiaochi, his career was probably the most important thing to him in his original world and the main thing he couldn’t bear to part with. It was for this reason that his reminder to Chi Xiaochi was filled with hidden meaning, “You were so successful in your original world, so if you don’t go back, it would be such a pity.” Unexpectedly, Chi Xiaochi said, “That’s not a pity. “I need to go back. Because other than me, there’s no one left to sweep his grave.” The system, “...;...;” He thought of Beimang cemetery, then thought of the “Lou Ying” that Chi Xiaochi had brought up to Yang Baihua, and turned pensive. “Is ‘Lou Ying’ a friend of yours?” Chi Xiaochi didn’t answer. He reached towards the bedside cabinet. That was where he’d put the sleeping pills he’d bought today. This weekend, he was unable to reach Yang Baihua and was unable to grind many goodwill points, so he didn’t want to use up the barely passing goodwill points that he had worked so hard to earn. The key events hadn’t yet been triggered, and if the goodwill level dropped too low, it would be difficult to keep any unexpected events from happening. So he decided to conserve his points, and use sleeping pills like the average person. He tapped out a pill, thought about it, then took another, and without any water, simply swallowed them dry. After taking his pills, only then did Chi Xiaochi answer the system’s question, “He’s my best friend.” ...;...;It was the exact same answer that he’d given Yang Baihua. 061 wanted to ask, “Does your inability to sleep have anything to do with him”, but restrained himself just as the words were about to leave his mouth. This wasn’t something a system should be worrying about. Just like he’d said, one of them was a person and the other was a system, so there was no need for them to get too close to one another. Eventually, there would come a time for them to part. The system decided to be a cold, emotionless system. He should urge him to think more about the task. The sleeping pills gradually started to kick in. After listening to the system’s urging, Chi Xiaochi tightened his grip on the blankets and yawned lazily, “I have three plans on how to break the plot, plan A, plan B and a contingency plan, C.” 061, “...;...;En?” Chi Xiaochi stretched out his hands and put them behind his head, “Do you remember what I asked you to do when we first got here?” 061 obviously did remember, but he didn’t really understand the purpose behind Chi Xiaochi’s instructions. He’d asked 061 to play the original events three times over, and for some events, he’d watched them more than three times. He’d requested to personally experience the despair Cheng Yuan had felt before committing suicide, and even asked 061 for quite a few details. After that, he played around with Cheng Yuan’s phone for a while. Chi Xiaochi closed his eyes, “...;...;9 regret points can be considered his starting price. We can take it slow, there’s no rush.” A fanart of Chi Xiaochi’s true appearance I found on Weibo: (source) sere: finally ML (?) appears or at least his name(?) i hope but damn this man is savage baum: ikr? I love CXC so much lmao anyways let’s all welcome our new editors, verywronganswer and aroma! <i>translator: baumkuchen editors:serefina, verywronganswer, aroma</i>  Under the influence of the sleeping pills, Chi Xiaochi fell asleep. He dreamed of something that happened before he had come here. He was an actor, doing quite well for himself. The year he’d turned 26, he’d won two international Competitive Feature Film Festival awards, one Best Actor award and one Best Supporting Actor award, and three gold awards for domestic movies. He was worshipped as an acting god even before turning 25. However, the entertainment circle was, after all, a circle. Ling Nanguo, a leading cinematographer in the circle, played a big role in the success of Chi Xiaochi’s acting career and was a good friend of the famous scriptwriter Sun Guangren, Elder Sun. The niece of Ling Nanguo’s acquaintance wanted to put on a stage play, and thus found Chi Xiaochi to star in it in such a roundabout way. Chi Xiaochi agreed for three reasons. First, to repay Elder Sun for his affection. Second, the stage play was going to be held in his hometown. Third, he had a free period. When he arrived at the theatre, Chi Xiaochi took off his sunglasses, “This theatre is so old, it’s so dilapidated.” This mouth of Chi Xiaochi’s had brought him no shortage of troubles. His manager, who had long since resigned himself Chi Xiaochi’s propensity to voice his every opinion regardless of whether the situation allowed it, quivered for a moment and skillfully helped Chi Xiaochi gloss over the situation, “Old and stronger for it, old and sturdier for it.” It was clear that it was old, as this was the oldest theatre in the area. It served as both a theatre and a cinema. Chi Xiaochi’s father had even brought his mother here for a movie date when he was young. As for whether it was actually strong and sturdy, Chi Xiaochi should have the most say. During an official performance, it was thanks to this old theatre that Chi Xiaochi was smashed into another world by a chandelier. Chi Xiaochi woke up from his dream. Just now in his dream, the moment he was struck by the chandelier had been stretched infinitely longer. Lying in the debris of the shattered crystal chandelier, Chi Xiaochi felt like a box of smashed open soft drinks . He was covered in blood from head to toe, which was gushing out everywhere to the rhythm of his rapidly slowing heart. Fortunately, it was just a dream, so there was no pain. The spectators in the theatre had probably never expected to see such a rare spectacle when they bought tickets for the performance. They got up from their seats one after the other, some stepping up on stools and digging out their phones to record the event. Lying on the ground, Chi Xiaochi thought, you all just have fun taking your photos, after I die, I’ll inhabit your pictures and climb out at midnight to chat with you about life. If I don’t manage to scare you to death, it’ll be my loss. As he lay there, he twisted the neck he could no longer feel. The old theatre had many problems with its layout. Several support pillars happened to obstruct the view of the audience sitting behind them, making them stretch their necks just to get a clear view of the stage. Therefore, the price of the seats behind the pillars was much cheaper than all the other seats. He saw a pair of siblings, a brother and sister about ten years old, peeking around the pillar in the southeast corner and looking at him curiously. Chi Xiaochi’s eyes widened. The scene before his eyes blurred before coming back into focus. The faces of the two children watching the ruckus morphed into those of two youths, poking their heads beyond the pillar and watching the scene of the unexpected accident in confusion and unease. Chi Xiaochi’s fingers twitched. He mumbled soundlessly, “...;...;Lou-ge.” The girl still wanted to watch, but when her parents behind her called out, the boy reached out a hand from behind her to cover her eyes, and took her away. Chi Xiaochi struggled to speak through ragged breaths, “Lou-ge, don’t go. Don’t go.” In a final burst of strength, he struggled to pull half of his body out from under the shattered chandelier accompanied by the clinking of broken glass. Then, he woke up. After waking up, Chi Xiaochi pulled out a slender cigarette and placed it between his lips, not lighting it but merely holding it in his mouth. The system said, “It’s 3:30am. You’ve only slept for four hours.” Chi Xiaochi said, “Sleep my ass, let’s get up and get HIGH!” The system, “...;...;” It’s over. He didn’t get enough sleep and now he’s gone crazy. Chi Xiaochi suggested, “Let’s put on a movie to watch together.” The system replied helplessly, “You should be sleeping.” Chi Xiaochi hopped off the bed, “As long as I’ve woken up, it’s morning.” The system, “...;...;” Fine. Cheng Jian was really considerate of his younger brother. In the 200 square meter apartment, every amenity was perfect and they even came with many considerate tips. For instance, there was a note left on the wine cabinet, “You can bring friends over for a drink and take anything from the bottom three shelves. The middle two shelves are for you to drink, and the top two shelves hold my collection. If you dare drink them, I’ll break your legs.” Chi Xiaochi laughed. He took down all the notes, put them in a pile, opened up Cheng Yuan’s wallet, and arranged them individually into the wallet, as if to keep them as souvenirs. Noticing his actions, the system was slightly moved. In his original world, 《The Cape Murders》turned Chi Xiaochi into an overnight success, but not more than two months later, Chi Xiaochi fell back into the mire of scandal within a day. ——In an interview with Chi Xiaochi’s parents, they accused him of not being filial. When Chi Xiaochi had become famous, the internet had only just started to flourish. Everyone had just begun to realize the benefit of anonymity on the internet, but they hadn’t understood enough to determine the authenticity of the various sources of information online. Chi Xiaochi was scolded black and blue in all kinds of BBS and forums for his lack of filial piety, enough that for a period of time, he became a frequent guest on various entertainment magazines, during which he would be barraged by all kinds of condemnations and showered in spittle. He could be said to be caught in an absolute bloody shitstorm. At the time, everyone thought that Chi Xiaochi was done for. However, ten months later, Chi Xiaochi became the biggest dark horse of the year by starring as the male protagonist of the movie 《72 Hours of Panic》. Chi Xiaochi, who had been knocked down from his altar, rapidly rose back up, and his originally broken endorsement deals gradually made a revival. In an interview during a talk show he attended after 《72 Hours》became popular, the host asked about the scandal that had occurred earlier in Chi Xiaochi’s career. Chi Xiaochi, who had previously refused to address it on any broadcasting program, unexpectedly spoke up, “Ever since I began earning money, I have transferred money to my parents every month. I even have evidence of my transactions on this bank slip here.” The host was absolutely astonished, “Then they...;...;” “My father gambles,” Chi Xiaochi said, “He gambled away almost all my earnings from《Cape》. I helped him pay off the debt, but he still kept gambling, and even asked me how much I was going to make from 《72 Hours》. I refused them and told them that I would send money monthly from now on, but I guess they...;...; weren’t very satisfied with that.” After saying this Chi Xiaochi paused, giving the host and audience ample time for their imaginations to run wild and for them to ruminate over his words. The host had just casually asked the question. She hadn’t actually thought she would get a reply from Chi Xiaochi, and even more so didn’t expect reality to be this way, “Then earlier...;...; Why didn’t you explain earlier?” “I was busy filming at that time,” Chi Xiaochi smiled, but his expression was unexpectedly cool and calm for someone his age, “Anyways, everyone seemed really happy to see the “dark side” of a star. If I explained then, would anyone have listened?” No wonder the people who hated Chi Xiaochi scolded him for being adept at scheming. Not just anyone could endure ten months of insults and abuse pushing himself to his lowest point, before lightly dropping a bomb that wiped everyone out in one blow. It was also not just anyone who dared to air out the dirty laundry of the parents who had raised him to the public like this, with a hidden implication within a few light words. There was no bitterness, no kindness, just the truth. Even Chi Xiaochi’s parents hadn’t realized that their son was capable of this. After a period of inactivity, his actions were like lightning, rendering defeat with one hit and leaving no possibility of recovery. In the span of one night, public opinion completely reversed. The sharp tongues and judging pens changed their target to attack Chi Xiaochi’s parents. There was no one to advise the 19 year old Chi Xiaochi on how to handle this matter. However, in the span of ten months, he smoothly cut ties with his blood-sucking family. Since then, his parents had neither the face nor the courage to come pester him again. But in this confrontation, there were still many unanswered questions. Six years later, Chi Xiaochi appeared once more on that same talk show program, and the host was still the same host from that year. She asked him, “July, have you ever wondered, with what happened between you and your parents that year, if there had been no 《72 Hours of Panic》, what path your career would have taken? Would it just have died?” July was Chi Xiaochi’s English name. Chi Xiaochi, clothed in a high-necked wool sweater and reclining one elbow on the arm of the sofa, laughed after hearing that question, “No. If there was no 《72 Hours》, there would still have been a 《36 Hours》, or 《24 Hours》.” After six years of maturation, Chi Xiaochi was just like that slightly old-fashioned, high quality wool sweater he was wearing, distant, cold, and bringing a hard to erase yet valuable impression. The female host levelled him with an admiring gaze, “You have so much self-confidence?” Chi Xiaochi answered, “Because it’s me, I have it.” Right before the effects of the two sleeping pills Chi Xiaochi had taken had worn off, 061 had just watched this part of his talk show interview. Through Chi Xiaochi’s witty banter, his composed expression, and sense of propriety, 061 saw the “Cheng Yuan” from a few days ago, sitting in a porridge store, wrapped in a slightly old down jacket and quietly taking a bite of his steamed bun. At that time, the look in his eyes was very gentle, mixed with a bit of soft and helpless vacancy. Thinking of that gaze, 061’s heart felt a soft itch like a prick of a needle. He clearly cared about family, so why is it that when it came to his own family, he had to go to that point? Of course, Chi Xiaochi didn’t owe him any answers. This chapter has been split into part 1 and part 2, since it’s over 5k words in Chinese~ <i>translator: baumkuchen editors: serefina, verywronganswer, aroma</i>  After fiddling with the projector in the living room for a bit, Chi Xiaochi managed to turn it on. He then made himself a cup of vegetable juice and curled up on the sofa. As he fiddled with the remote control, he occasionally sipped his drink. He said, “It’s been a while since another person accompanied me to watch a movie.” Before 061 could respond, Chi Xiaochi continued, “Oh right, you aren’t a person.” 061, “...;...;” You’re not wrong. Chi Xiaochi, “That’s also fine. What do you want to watch?” 061, “Up to you.” Chi Xiaochi laughed, “Aiyo, how considerate. The way you said that sounds like you’re spoiling your girlfriend. You’re probably really popular with the other AIs, aren’t you?” 061, “Somewhat.” 061’s answer wasn’t wrong. He was mild tempered, so other AIs liked to come to him to vent, using him as an “emotional trash bin”. He was indeed popular. He quickly followed up with, “However, the main system didn’t provide AIs intimacy methods. We have only pure friendship between us.” Chi Xiaochi pressed on the buttons of the remote to rapidly flip though movies, “You really don’t have any aspirations. Even if you don’t have any such conditions, you still could create them. Aren’t you guys made of 1s and 0s?” 061, “...;...;” After reacting, he felt as his ears and spirit had been tainted. Chi Xiaochi selected a horror movie and dimmed the lights in the living room in passing. As the movie started playing, 061 reminded him, “Lower the volume a little. Most people are still sleeping now, so don’t disturb your neighbours.” “This place’s soundproofing is really good,” Chi Xiaochi wasn’t at all concerned, “Unless I brought a drill here and started drilling for diamonds or oil, no one will complain.” Although he’d talked big, the moment the horror movie music started, he madly mashed the volume button, immediately lowering the volume from 40 to 20. Two minutes into the movie, Chi Xiaochi’s teeth started to chatter. 061, “...;...;Are you scared?” Chi Xiaochi, “Nonsense.” 061, “...;...;If you’re scared, don’t watch anymore.” Chi Xiaochi covered his eyes with his cup, “I’m watching it because there is someone else to watch it with me.” The system sighed. He didn’t understand his logic of “the more I’m scared, the more I want to watch”. But he still adjusted Chi Xiaochi’s body temperature and regulated his cold sweat so he wouldn’t feel uncomfortable. In next hour and a half, he became Chi Xiaochi’s real-time announcer. “The ghost didn’t come out. Don’t be scared, open your eyes. k2026;k2026;I’m not lying to you.” “Given how the movie’s been going, nothing will happen when the female lead looks behind her. It’s only when she turns around that the ghost will come out, so when that happens, close your eyes.” Like this, with him opening then closing his eyes, closing then opening them, Chi Xiaochi unexpectedly fell asleep curled up on the sofa. 061 quietly urged, “Wake up, go back to sleep on the bed, or else you might catch a cold from sleeping on the sofa.” Chi Xiaochi quietly “hmph”-ed and flipped over, curling up around the thin blanket. 061 sighed, “...;...;Ai.” Shortly, a dark figure appeared in front of the sofa. The tall young man in a white shirt and black pants bent down, taking Chi Xiaochi and his blanket into his arms. Chi Xiaochi’s whole body violently stiffened and he quickly opened his eyes. 061 was a little embarrassed, but after staring at him for a while, Chi Xiaochi closed his eyes once more. Chi Xiaochi thought, I’m dreaming again. This time, it’s a good dream. ...;...;He couldn’t tell Lou-ge he’d noticed him, or else he’d leave again. 061 waited a while longer, waiting until Chi Xiaochi had gone back to sleep before slowly carrying him into the bedroom. While Chi Xiaochi was living a comfortable, cozy life, Yang Baihua’s thoughts were in turmoil. Returning home exhausted only to find that there was no hot soup and rice awaiting him, just a cold pot and cold stove, Yang Baihua was increasingly unhappy. He moved out to that childhood friend’s home already? Was he that eager to move out? He couldn’t even find some time to give him a heads up? Yang Baihua was incredibly exhausted. He felt that recently his passion for Cheng Yuan had gradually died down, and his interest in bedroom matters had even decreased. He frequently felt tired enough to collapse while washing up, where did he have the time to make up with him? He was so busy with work, but Young Master Cheng Yuan had never learned to be considerate. Yang Baihua didn’t look for Cheng Yuan. From prior experience, Cheng Yuan was usually the first to give in. He would soon call and make up with him anyways. However, his parents had already been here for three or four days, but he still hadn’t received an explanation from Cheng Yuan. When he took his parents out for dinner, he spoke very little and couldn’t stop rubbing his finger on the leather case of the steering wheel. His parents were sitting in the backseat, and his younger cousin Yang Xiaoyan was sitting in the passenger seat. Even after sitting in this car for a few days, his parents still hadn’t lost interest in the novelty of the car. His mother was studying the tinted film on the car window, “Child, with this thing stuck on the window, you really can’t see inside from the outside?” Yang Baihua came back to himself. He nodded and smiled, “Yes.” Yang Xiaoyan was wearing bright red nail polish, and her makeup and clothes were all in fashion. Her phone had run out of battery, so she had borrowed Yang Baihua’s phone to play with. Hearing this, she silently pursed her lips. ...;...;Country bumpkin. After scrolling through Weibo for a while and responding to a few messages from fans, she started clicking in and out of various apps on Yang Baihua’s phone. Wanting to find new gossip, she secretly opened up Yang Baihua and Cheng Yuan’s chat history. After flipping through a few pages, she saw the three songs Cheng Yuan had sent over a few days earlier, labelled as demo1, 2, and 3 respectively. Yang Xiaoyan also occasionally wrote some small tunes, so she was naturally very interested in the work of her Xiao Cheng-ge. With a tap of her fingertips, the music started playing. Without any warning, the music started echoing inside the car. Yang Baihua’s scalp broke out in goosebumps. He wanted to snatch back his phone, but he was currently driving. He was also afraid his movements would be too obvious, arousing his parents’ suspicion. He could only worry helplessly, a steady flow of cold sweat seeping out of his palms. On the other side of the car, Yang Xiaoyan was over the moon. She could tell that this wasn’t the finished demo and was just a prototype, but the melody was full of creativity and was made with masterful artistry. It was accompanied by a person’s quiet humming, which tugged at the heartstrings. With a cold look on his face, Yang Baihua said, “Don’t randomly play music, you’re wasting data.” Yang Xiaoyan’s eyes spun. She came up with an idea, “Was this composed by Xiao Cheng-ge?” Yang Baihua’s expression twisted. He shot Yang Xiaoyan a look. Yang Xiaoyan stared at him with bright eyes, pretending to not understand. Yang Baihua scolded her in his heart. This question indeed attracted the attention of Yang Baihua’s parents. His father asked, “Xiao Cheng? Your brother’s friend?” Yang Xiaoyan was quick to answer first, “Yeah, didn’t brother ever mention him to you? He’s older brother’s good friend, a musician.” Yang Baihua was sweating profusely through his palms, making his hands slip slightly on the steering wheel. When she heard the words “good friend”, his mother was a somewhat expectant, but hearing “a musician”, her bottom lip turned down, making a disdainful expression similar to the expression Yang Xiaoyan had made earlier. “Child, listen to Mom, don’t associate yourself with those types of people without a proper job. You’re different from them. You did well in university, are a university graduate who got his degree through hard, steady work, and are a proud son of heaven. Most of those art students are fools. They study the arts because they aren’t good enough to study anything else, and have no future.” Yang Baihua didn’t have the chance to speak before Yang Xiaoyan robbed him of it, “Xiao Cheng-ge’s from a rich family, he can study whatever he wants.” She then turned to Yang Baihua and whined, “Brother, isn’t he?” Embarrassed, his mother looked at Yang Baihua. Yang Baihua followed up on his mother’s words, saying, “He just casually composes and sings a bit, he doesn’t really have much future prospects.” Having found some face, his mother let out a “hoh”, then turned towards Xiaoyan, “You hear that? Only rich people can mess around like this.” Xiaoyan pretended not to hear. She played around with Yang Baihua’s phone, and the more she listened, the more interested she was. She tried to sound out Yang Baihua, asking, “Did Xiao Cheng-ge also just casually write these? Is he not going to sell them like the others he wrote?” Yang Baihua, eager to put an end to the topic, pressed down hard on the car horn and answered in a low voice, “His family’s rich, so he doesn’t usually sell his music. Besides, he doesn’t like relating music with money.” Yang Xiaoyan was relieved. She sneakily picked two out of the three demos, and forwarded them to herself. With another few taps of her finger, she quickly and silently deleted the forwarding history off of Yang Baihua’s phone. sere: can’t believe she doesn’t have a guilty conscience. My anger at this idiot surpasses my excitement from earlier in the chapter Also Trash Yang comes from a TRASH family. I literally hate everyone who appeared so far in his family baum: yeah, every time I have to translate something with her in it, I keep having to take breaks to calm down orz She pisses me off SO MUCH. But 061 was so sweet this chapter~~ Where can I find myself a guy like him omg <i>translator: baumkuchen editors: serefina, verywronganswer, aroma</i>  Taking advantage of his precious time away from Yang Baihua, Chi Xiaochi finished arranging the official demos of 《Innermost Feelings》, 《Love You》, and《Autumn Thoughts》one by one. Cheng Yuan had come up with the song names after much careful deliberation. If he were to distribute them, they had to have, and could only have, these three names. Cheng Yuan’s golden finger was incredibly useful. As long as Chi Xiaochi thought of creating music, innumerable melodies would surface in his mind, thus, such work wasn’t very difficult for him. After he finished recording the last song, Chi Xiaochi laid down in bed and expressed in his user review, “It makes me feel as if I’m an artist.” 061 laughed, “Weren’t you already one before?” Due to the suspension bridge effect after spending a night watching horror movies together, the bond between the two “brothers-in-arms” was strengthened, so their conversations went much smoother. Chi Xiaochi said, “Before, I was a slag student with only high school qualifications, but now in the blink of an eye, I’ve gotten a bachelor’s degree.” 061 said, “...; ...;So a student who was awarded year-long scholarships for three years in a row can be called a slag student.” Chi Xiaochi said faintly, “So you even know my grades. Which one of my interviews did you learn that from?” 061, “...; ...;” It’s become routine. Chi Xiaochi sighed, “Watching my movies and now even searching up my interviews. Brainless fans are really scary.” 061, “...; ...;” I’m not, I didn’t, really, I’m a proper system. In a deathbed struggle, 061 argued, “I just wanted to understand you, to optimise task efficiency.” Chi Xiaochi rolled over onto his back so that he faced the ceiling and didn’t reply. His silence made 061 suddenly feel a little flustered. He realised that he hadn’t phrased his previous words very nicely, and tried to correct himself, “...;...;You’re not just a task to me.” These were words from his heart. Chi Xiaochi was his eleventh host. But to the hosts, in these unfamiliar worlds where they were utterly lost and alone, their system was the only thing they could rely on. Even though he had been reformatted once before, 061 still had a lingering feeling. He knew that every time he had to part from a host was never a very pleasant experience. 061 had wanted to be a cold, unfeeling system, exactly because he didn’t want to feel the sadness of parting anymore. But it seemed like he still couldn’t do it. Chi Xiaochi said, “You don’t need to explain anymore.” 061, “I...;...;” Chi Xiaochi said faintly, “I actually lost your love and affection so quickly.” 061, “k2026;k2026;” Chi Xiaochi sighed, “I’m no longer that Mister Chi whom you loved so much.” 061, “...;...;” I shouldn’t have bothered worrying about you. However, he also breathed a sigh of relief. Chi Xiaochi wasn’t quite the same as the rest of hosts he’d taken on before. Even though he spoke childishly, he acted independently and calmly. As this kind of person, even though he came up with a lot of weird ideas, he was very capable of understanding the pros and cons of his actions. His will to return to his original world was very strong. Even if they had to say goodbye in the future, it wouldn’t be too hard on them. After fulfilling his desire for drama, Chi Xiaochi fell back into his “silent sage mode”. He reached out a hand and groped around the head of the bed for his sleeping pills before realising that the bottle was empty. Chi Xiaochi got up, preparing to change his clothes. 061, “Where are you going? All the pharmacies are closed by now.” Chi Xiaochi said, “Then I’ll find a club to dance at. Dance until the pharmacies open again.” 061, “...;...;” Cheng Yuan’s body wasn’t made of iron. In order to finish the demos, he hadn’t slept for three consecutive days. Now he was going out to play. What if he danced himself to death? If that happened, how was he going to fill in his work report? “The host died from playing too hard”? 061 felt helpless. He said, “Lie down.” Chi Xiaochi said delightedly, “Liuliu, are you going to give me a free Hypnosis card?” 061, “...;...;” Who’s Liuliu. Chi Xiaochi guessed what 061 was thinking, “I’ve been mulling it over for a while, calling you Zero or One wouldn’t be very good since it would cause misunderstandings.” 061, “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi, “So in the end Liuliu sounds the best.” 061 let out a deep sigh. Fine, Liuliu it is then. He said, “You’re very dependent on pills, and it’s not good for your body. How about this, every night before you sleep, I’ll read to you. Who knows, it might help a bit. Even if you can’t fall asleep, listening to me read won’t be boring.” This time, Chi Xiaochi was truly silent. 061 asked, “Is this okay?” Chi Xiaochi placed the coat he picked up back into the wardrobe and sat back down on the bed. “This is some really good service. Have all your previous hosts enjoyed this kind of treatment?” 061 answered mildly, “You’re the only one I’ve met who can’t fall asleep.” Chi Xiaochi lay down on the bed, one hand behind his head. He said, “...;...;Alright.” “What book do you want to listen to? I’ll go back to the system lobby to download it and be back in five minutes.” “《Harry Potter》.” After saying the title of the book, Chi Xiaochi hesitated, “No, not 《Harry Potter》.” The system patiently waited for his response. Soon, Chi Xiaochi confidently articulated his book of choice, “People’s Education Press’ Senior Ideology and Politics for Students of China.” 061, “...;...;Wait a moment.” The system left for five minutes, before returning on time. He opened up the book, lightly coughed twice, and started reading out loud. 061’s voice was originally a very pleasant, youthful voice. His carefully softened voice was more like fresh vines coiled around a tree, its leaves and branches, lightly warmed by the light of the sun, forming a gentle embrace, wrapping up Chi Xiaochi’s consciousness. Chi Xiaochi closed his eyes, curling up into the blanket, “Teacher, which high school do you work at? If you teach me politics, I promise I won’t fall asleep.” 061 smiled softly, “You really won’t sleep?” Chi Xiaochi didn’t look at all like a well-behaved student. Chi Xiaochi smiled along with him, “Only if you can control me.” “How can I control you?” Chi Xiaochi said, “You just need to be good-looking.” 061 gently smiled. He himself didn’t know what he looked like. Systems’ self-perception abilities were shut off all year round. Even if he looked into a mirror, he would only be able to see a sheet of mosaic. Furthermore, he didn’t want to control Chi Xiaochi. As long as he was happy and the task was completed quickly, the progress on his side would also be accelerated. ——After completing 200 tasks, he would be able to terminate his contract with the main system. When that time came, he could finally catch that appointment. But it seemed like he was already late, many years late, late to the point that he had an accident and had his memories reformatted. However, it didn’t matter. As long as he returned to his original world, he would probably be able to remember. 061 connected to the indoor lighting system, dimmed the lights in the room, and corrected Chi Xiaochi’s sleeping posture, “Close your eyes and put your hand down, if you keep propping yourself up, you won’t be able to sleep well.” Chi Xiaochi closed his eyes, but his hand still stayed behind his head under the pillow. In a small voice, he said, “If it’s Lou Ying, that also works.” ——If someone wanted to control him, they needed to be good-looking or be Lou Ying, nothing else. 061 didn’t quite hear him and asked, “What?” Chi Xiaochi didn’t speak any further, and 061 just continued reading until Chi Xiaochi’s breathing slowly evened out and a slight flush returned to his pale, bloodless face. 061 didn’t disturb him. By checking his body data, he confirmed that Chi Xiaochi was indeed asleep. Gratified, 061 thought, seems like it works. Three seconds later, the lights went out. The next day, the well-rested Chi Xiaochi placed the master demos he’d recorded into a paper bag, prepared a meal, and brought them to Cheng Jian’s office. Seeing Chi Xiaochi with an apron tied neatly around his waist, expertly beating eggs in a bowl and pouring them into a pan, 061 was shocked. ...;...;He really did know how to cook. Cheng Jian, after seeing his secretary lead his younger brother who was carrying a lunchbox into his office, was just as shocked as 061. Hearing that the egg fried rice had been made by Cheng Yuan, he was even more shocked. Today’s weather was the lowest it had been since winter began. Cheng Yuan’s nose was red from the cold. The moment he entered, he pulled out a thermos of water and eagerly gulped it down. Cheng Jian opened up the lunchbox. Inside was rice and soup, pork trotter soybean soup and egg fried rice. Each grain of the fried rice was coated in golden yellow egg, and the ham was chopped into fine, even pieces. The pig trotters were stewed to perfection, soft and delicate, and with a gentle poke of the chopsticks, the meat would easily slide off the bone, piping hot and fresh, the fragrance of meat filling his nostrils. Cheng Yuan breathed on his hands, “Ge, it’s for you. It’s hot. This insulated lunchbox I bought is really good at retaining heat.” ...;...;A simple look at the substantial portion size showed that it wasn’t takeout from a restaurant. Cheng Jian said sourly, “You make such a good wife and loving mother. You took such good care of your precious, piano-playing fingers for so many years, was it just for you to use them for stir-frying?” Cheng Yuan smiled widely, “Stir-frying food for my brother makes me happy. Ge, aren’t you happy?” Cheng Jian, “...;...;Hmph.” Then he ate the lunchbox clean in one go. After waiting for him to finish his food, Cheng Yuan clearly let him know his intentions in coming. Cheng Jian pushed the lunchbox away, “You’re planning on sending out your songs?” Cheng Yuan hugged the paper bag to himself, his face full of anticipation, “Does ge know where I can send them?” “I have a few classmates working in entertainment companies, I’ll help you ask,” Cheng Jian didn’t know much about this field and naturally wouldn’t make any promises, “What are your own goals?” Cheng Yuan obediently shook his head. Cheng Jian hated iron for not becoming steel, “...;...;You’re like a stupid deer, not aware of anything.” Cheng Yuan smiled foolishly. “Still smiling,” Cheng Jian’s expression changed, “I have two friends who heard you sing before and asked me to ask you if you had any intentions of debuting as a singer but you refused. Right now one of them is working in Yundu Entertainment, and the other is in Xingyun Entertainment, which one do you want to try out? Or are both alright?” Cheng Yuan thought over it seriously, “Xingyun.” Cheng Jian, “...;...;You’re just choosing blindly, aren’t you?” Cheng Yuan, “The name Xingyun sounds nice.” Cheng Jian, “...;...;” He’s actually a stupid deer. Cheng Jian got up, took the paper bag from him, and opened it up to take a look inside, “Is this urgent?” Cheng Yuan lowered his head in embarrassment, “It’s a little urgent...;...; We need to pay the rent for Old Yang’s apartment soon.” Cheng Jian, “...;...;” He telegraphed a kick towards the butt of this younger brother of his who had basically become the Yang family maid. Cheng Yuan immediately wrapped his arms around Cheng Jian’s arm, an anxious look in his eyes as he whined, “Ge.” Cheng Jian was confused, having never thought that his younger brother, who was always beaten down even faster than a rabbit, would actually take initiative to get close to him. When he finally reacted, his face was a little hot, “What are you doing rubbing up against me, your face is so thick.” After Cheng Yuan ambled out of the office with the lunchbox, Cheng Jian took out the CD and inserted it into his computer. He didn’t know anything about music, but just as the song started up, a proud smile appeared on his face. ...;...;This was written by Cheng Yuan. However, when the melody moved forward a little and the chorus began, Cheng Jian was stunned. He hadn’t majored in music and couldn’t carry even a simple rhythm, but at least he knew what sounded good. After they left Cheng Jian’s office, 061 asked him, “Why did you choose Xingyun?” Chi Xiaochi answered, “Because I don’t want to enter Yundu.” Unlike Cheng Yuan, when Chi Xiaochi wanted to do something, he would definitely do some prior research. Giving Cheng Yuan’s songs to a little company to produce was really too much of a waste. But in his last life, he’d had no experience. In addition, given his older brother Cheng Jian’s widespread connections, including many contacts among the higher-ups of many big entertainment companies, if he sent his songs to those companies, his older brother would definitely hear about it. He was young and inexperienced, and under Yang Baihua’s encouragement he had drawn a clear line between him and his family. He thought that it would be inappropriate to, after having just broken ties with his family, come back and depend on the care of his family to make money. This time, Chi Xiaochi directly found Cheng Jian and unabashedly walked through the backdoor. He planned on entering a big entertainment company, but had no plans on entering Yundu Entertainment. Yundu was Tang Huan’s company, so entering it would be inconvenient for his plans. 061 still wanted to say something, but suddenly stopped, “...;...;He’s coming.” “Who?” 061 said, “Yang Baihua.” Chi Xiaochi, “...;...;En?” 061 said, “I connected to your new car’s inbuilt GPS. Just now, someone entered your new address into the GPS. It should be Yang Baihua coming to find you.” “His parents are here for the week. He’s not spending time with them?” 061 said, “It’s noon.” His parents might be taking a noon nap. ...;...;After giving him the cold shoulder for so many days, finally, he couldn’t sit still any longer? In these few days, Yang Baihua’s goodwill level had been constantly fluctuating, completely unstable. It was clear that his emotions were in utter turmoil and that he was quite concerned about that childhood friend “Lou Ying” that “Cheng Yuan” had told him about. Chi Xiaochi shrugged, “I’m not at home, he’ll just be wasting his time.” After that, he then added regretfully, “But it’d be great if there was really a Lou-ge at home. He’s so concerned about Lou-ge that he even made a trip over specifically to take a look. Letting him go back empty-handed would be such a pity.” 061, “...;...;That’s possible.” Chi XIaochi raised an eyebrow, “Ha?” 061 said, “I can make a copy of a physical body which will look exactly the same as any other person and can be tangible for a short period of time. Even though the main system bans us from using a physical body to interact with the outside world, but as long as hosts don’t report it to the main system, there’ll be no problem. ...;...;I can pretend to be Lou Ying.” Chi Xiaochi thought for a moment, “Alright.” 061, “En.” Chi Xiaochi, “Make it a little more handsome.” 061, “...;...;En.” 061 thought of if he should make an image based of a movie star, but firstly, it would be troublesome, and secondly, his original appearance had been constantly praised as handsome by a system co-worker. He thought for a moment, before deciding on using his own appearance after all. Soon, a 061 appeared in the apartment. He quietly sat on the bed. He looked at his hands and feet, then looked into the mirror, but all he could see was a big sheet of mosaic. As expected. Since he had nothing to do, he busied himself by neatly folding the clothes Chi Xiaochi had just tossed on the bed, and arranged them back into the wardrobe. After about half an hour, the door phone rang. It was the security guard, saying that there was a visitor here for Mister Cheng. 061 answered, “Here. Is it a Mister Yang? Let him in, please.” After five minutes, the doorbell rang. He got up and opened the door. Standing in the doorway was unmistakably Yang Baihua. 061 smiled and nodded at the stunned Yang Baihua, “Mister Yang? Xiao Yuan told me you’d be coming.” However, Yang Baihua, who had always been considerate when handling matters, just stood there stunned for quite a while after seeing 061’s face, and even ignored 061’s greeting. “...;...;Mister Yang?” He had no idea what Yang Baihua was seeing. The person in front of him was dressed in a white shirt and black pants, had an upright posture, and was taller than him by several centimeters. However, his clean temperament, especially his facial features, were actually not much different from Yang Baihua’s! The author has something to say: I edited some of the earlier chapters qwq Chi Xiaochi, who’s messed around in the entertainment industry for so long and seen all kinds of handsome men, was stunned when he first saw Yang Baihua√ Scum Yang immediately entered the self-doubt of “I’m a fucking replacement?” sere: yeet YBH gets upped baum: yaas it’s so nice to see him suffer for once. also, i think it’s cool that the author does foreshadowing, even if the foreshadowing is added after the fact haha <i>translator: baumkuchen editor: serefina</i>  Yang Baihua hesitated for quite a while, “Mister Lou?” “Yes. Mister Yang, would you like to come in and take a seat?” 061 wasn’t clear on his own appearance so naturally he didn’t have any reaction, but this kind of tranquility and calmness, in Yang Baihua’s eyes, took on a slightly different meaning. ...;...;He seemed to have been aware of his existence since a long time ago, and so he wasn’t at all surprised by how similar the two of them looked. But Yang Baihua didn’t know anything about the person standing in front of him. Yang Baihua wasn’t one who tended to think too much, but that face made it impossible for him to not overthink. 061 invited Yang Baihua into the house and informed him, “Xiao Yuan’s out right now. You can just wait a while for him here.” “I have something going on so I can only stay here for a bit before I have to leave.” “In a hurry? ...;...;Would you like some alcohol, or just tea?” “Plain water is fine.” 061 smiled slightly, “That isn’t the proper way to treat a guest. I’ll prepare some tea.” The apartment had a traditional tea set which had been bought back by Cheng Jian, but because preparing tea was too cumbersome, it probably had only been used two or three times before Cheng Jian abandoned it in a cabinet. 061 took out the tea set and a box of high-quality Phoenix Oolong tea leaves, started the fire, fanned the flames of the stove, then heated up the teapot, his actions graceful and relaxed, showing his calm, unhurried heart. He’d been through hundreds of worlds, so this bit of acting was no problem for him. 061 asked, “What are you looking for Xiao Yuan for?” Yang Baihua snapped out of his daze, “En?” This person in front of him looked very similar to himself, but his every feature perfectly surpassed his own, whether it was his nose, eyes, height, or legs. This did not even include his clean temperament that made it clear from a glance that he’d been tenderly raised by a good family. This feeling was both strange and stifling. 061 didn’t know what he was thinking and couldn’t be bothered to guess, simply repeating his question. Yang Baihua didn’t answer, merely replying with another question, “Where did Xiao Cheng go?” 061 said, “I don’t know.” Yang Baihua said, “He is living at your place, but you don’t know where he went?” 061 calmly replied, “I’m his friend. Not his guardian, nor his prison warden.” Yang Baihua suddenly became suspicious. He questioned doubtfully, “Did Xiao Cheng say something to you?” Could it be that Cheng Yuan complained about him? Said that he watched him too closely? But he did it for Cheng Yuan’s own good. When Cheng Yuan’s older brother, Cheng Jian, wasn’t beating him up, he was scolding him, simply not treating him at all like a brother. If he didn’t want Cheng Yuan to interact with him too often, was that wrong? Cheng Yuan’s friends were all utterly dissatisfied with him in every way. If he told Cheng Yuan to stay away from them, was that wrong? Other than music, Cheng Yuan didn’t know anything. Even when just buying vegetables, when the vegetable seller would haggle with him for price that was two or three mao higher, he would just smile happily and accept the price without question. If he told him to just stay at home and not run around outside, was that wrong? While Yang Baihua’s thoughts were running wild, 061 was as immovable as a mountain. 061 had travelled extensively, operated a mecha, battled zombies, and grown used to all kinds of scum, so at this moment his attitude was extremely calm. His movements didn’t falter. He smiled and said, “He hasn’t said anything to me. You should trust him.” Other than this, he didn’t say another word of explanation, but if Yang Baihua tried to ask any further, it would seem as if he had no class. Yang Baihua forcibly suppressed his inexplicable irritation, “When is he coming back?” “When he wants to.” “k2026;k2026;You’re his childhood friend?” 061 thought, so he finally asked. He had even started worrying for Yang Baihua. He poured out the cup of tea used to warm up the cup, and replied, “We grew up together, so I suppose that’s correct.” Yang Baihua forced himself to remain calm, “Are you two very close?” “We’re alright.” 061 pulled up a memory fragment from his vast sea of data and added, “When we were younger, he made a bet with me, saying that the person who lost would have to go out in a skirt for a day. Afterwards, he lost.” As he thought of that incident, the corners of his mouth unconsciously curled up in a smile. When putting on the skirt, that person had been very bold and totally unconcerned, but about fifteen minutes after he left the house, he became embarrassed, his face bright red as he clutched at the hem of the short skirt, unwilling to walk another step no matter what as he was scared of bumping into someone they knew. In the end, 061 had to carry him home. The entire trip back, he buried his face into 061’s back, too embarrassed to raise his head. Every time 061 entered this memory, he always wanted to clearly see that person’s face. However, with the reformatting, that person’s exact image had been shattered into broken fragments. Noticing 061’s faint, nostalgic smile, Yang Baihua clenched his back teeth for two seconds before relaxing. ...;...;It seemed like they really were quite close. Fortunately, he was very good at controlling his emotions, “Thank you for taking care of Xiao Cheng for the past two days. It’s really a pity that I didn’t get to know you before.” 061 put his mind back on track. He handed a cup of tea over to Yang Baihua and followed the ridiculous backstory Chi Xiaochi had casually made up, “I’ve been abroad for a long time. It’s only natural that we haven’t met before.” Yang Baihua brought the teacup to his mouth and gently blew on it, “But I’ve never seen Xiao Cheng contact you or heard him mention you before. So when I heard he was going over to your place to stay, I was really surprised.” ...;...;His words were barbed. 061 started to understand what he was thinking. If Yang Baihua had always been subtly influencing Cheng Yuan like this, cutting him off from his friend circle and making him into a doll that belonged to him and him alone, then it was no wonder that in his most difficult moments, Cheng Yuan couldn’t find even a single bosom friend with whom he could share his troubles. 061 rested his elbow on the armrest of the armchair, let out a smile as fresh as the spring breeze, and gave him a response filled with hidden meaning, “There’s no need to be surprised, all our associations were private.” Yang Baihua choked on a mouthful of tea. Approximately fifteen minutes later. Sitting in a shopping mall lounge chair and playing a mobile shooting game, Chi Xiaochi heard a soft, drawn-out sigh in his brain. Chi Xiaochi put down his phone, “You got him to leave?” 061, “He’s gone.” Chi Xiaochi, “It was effective?” 061 carefully thought back for a moment, then truthfully conveyed, “When he left, his face was green.” Chi Xiaochi sighed contentedly, “Ah, no wonder he called me six times just now.” 061, “Did you pick up? What did he say?” Chi Xiaochi, “My phone kept vibrating, affecting my gameplay, so I put the phone on mute.” 061, “...;...;” Okay then. Before his words fell, Chi Xiaochi slapped his thigh regretfully, “Aiya, if I had known beforehand, I’d have asked you to record your conversation.” 061 smiled, “Do you want to see it?” He uploaded a recorded video to the shared digital display. “You’re welcome.” Chi Xiaochi said affectionately, “Liuliu, you’re the best.” 061, “...;...;” Fine, Liuliu it is, Liuliu sounds very nice. Chi Xiaochi began to study the report 061 sent from the scene. 061 noticed that while Chi Xiaochi was excitedly watching the video, he was breathing into his cupped hands. Cheng Yuan’s body couldn’t take the cold. Although the department store had heating, his palms were still cold. Chi Xiaochi didn’t care too much about this, but as a system, 061 felt that he should be more conscious of serving his host. He adjusted and revised Chi Xiaochi’s internal temperature system, and in passing, recombined a series of data streams. Soon, an open thermos of tea, still piping hot, appeared in Chi Xiaochi’s right hand. The rich fragrance of tea filled his senses. Chi Xiaochi, “...;...;Where did you get this from?” “I made it at home. If I first digitised the tea cup, then restore it, I can bring it here. It wasn’t too difficult,” 061 explained, “This Phoenix Oolong is authentic, but he didn’t take more than two sips and wasting it would be such a pity. Also, this kind of tea is good for your liver and eyes, and since you have problems sleeping, drinking more of this kind of tea is good for your health.” Chi Xiaochi remained silent. 061 took it as him being moved, and kindly didn’t say anything else, instead turning his attention to the current point levels on the digital display. The goodwill level kept jumping between 75 to 55 points, incredibly unstable. 061 thought, understandable. After all, Yang Baihua constantly had the “First Love” halo over his head and Cheng Yuan would always obediently obey his every word, so he naturally thought of him as an object in the center of his palm that was his to mess around with and manipulate at his will. Now, a strong enemy with a “Childhood Friend” halo had suddenly appeared out of the blue and Yang Baihua’s feelings towards Cheng Yuan weren’t entirely fake, so naturally he would feel a sense of crisis. Hence, the constantly fluctuating goodwill level wasn’t surprising. But the regret level, the key to accomplishing the task, remained in the pitiful single-digits. 061 was a little worried. So he decided to watch some of Chi Xiaochi’s variety shows to calm himself down. He watched the variety shows, Chi Xiaochi watched the video, and the system and host were in perfect harmony. Chi Xiaochi held the cup of tea, taking the occasional sip as he watched the show, but his thoughts were still revolving around that sentence he heard. “When we were younger, he made a bet and lost, and had to accompany me for a day outside in a skirt.” Chi Xiaochi shrugged to himself, It seems like their investigation on me was really thorough, since they even dug up what Lou-ge and I did together when we were younger. But this couldn’t be considered anything serious, so Chi Xiaochi didn’t bother questioning the system about it. Chi Xiaochi studied this precious data with great interest. The video was shot from 061’s perspective, with the cameras being 061’s eyes. The recording started from when Yang Baihua rang the doorbell. From this angle, Chi Xiaochi judged that the body 061 materialised was at least 5 or 6 centimeters taller than Yang Baihua. Even though he couldn’t see his appearance, 061’s bearing was rather graceful. After making Yang Baihua choke on his drink, 061 also engaged in a discussion with him about software engineering. Obviously, in the field of specialized knowledge, Yang Baihua’s human brain had no way of competing with 061’s huge database of knowledge that he accumulated over many years. It could only be said that Yang Baihua tried his best. Like 061 had said, when Yang Baihua left, his face was indeed spinach-coloured. Chi Xiaochi decided to save this video to watch whenever he was bored. It would definitely never fail to amuse him. After Yang Baihua rushed home, his parents were still asleep, so he was met with thunderous snoring originating from the bedroom. His third sister had taken her children out to play with her sisters working in the city. Xiaoyan had been busy these past two days and so she also wasn’t home to accompany him. Yang Baihua, feeling a full on manic depression, tried to call Cheng Yuan again. On his end, Chi Xiaochi was engrossed in watching the video and didn’t pay him any attention. Yang Baihua paced several rounds around the living room like a caged beast. The more he looked at his fifty square meter rental apartment, the more he found it displeasing to the eye. When he turned and his gaze landed on the floor-length mirror, he saw the human figure reflected in it and erupted in fury, snatching the sofa cushion and ferociously throwing it at the wall. Didn’t Cheng Yuan say he was his first love? Then what was up with that surnamed Lou? If he was only a simple childhood friend, Yang Baihua might not have thought too much about it, but that face? That face! According to what surnamed Lou had said, he had left the country when Xiao Cheng was fourteen, and since then they hadn’t met, at most keeping in contact through the phone and video calls. But after having met him, why was it that Xiao Cheng had never once mentioned that person? That was too strange. Was he intentionally hiding something? Was he intentionally looking for someone’s shadow in him? The more Yang Baihua thought about it, the more aggrieved he became. If Cheng Yuan hadn’t appeared, chased after him, and bent him, he might have already married a city girl by now, like a normal person. Why would he have to tremble in the face of his parents? How could Cheng Yuan treat him like this? His thoughts were in a whirl. He trembled with anger as he wrote and rewrote a text message questioning Cheng Yuan, eventually just sending a text reading “Why aren’t you answering the phone”. He wanted to see how Cheng Yuan was going to explain this! After staring at his cell phone for about three hours, he finally received a reply: “Sorry, sorry Old Yang, I was out playing with my friends and wasn’t paying attention to my phone.” This explanation wasn’t enough to satisfy Yang Baihua. Just as he was about to start interrogating Cheng Yuan, his mother said, “You’ve stared at your phone for a whole afternoon now, don’t always look at that thing all the time. There’s radiation, and you’ll hurt your eyes.” Yang Baihua listened to her, simply leaving his phone to the side intending to ignore Cheng Yuan for a while. Cheng Yuan wasn’t someone who could keep his calm, so if he didn’t receive a reply he definitely wouldn’t be able to resist taking the initiative to contact him. Who knew that even up till late at night, as he laid in bed and stared at his phone, he still didn’t see any response from Cheng Yuan. Yang Baihua gritted his teeth and sent, “Why didn’t you call me back?” The text that was sent out disappeared like a clay ox entering the sea. Yang Baihua fell asleep, still clutching his mobile phone. It wasn’t until he was eating breakfast the next morning that his cell phone buzzed with a reply. Cheng Yuan’s response was perfunctory, “I thought you didn’t get my text.” Yang Baihua almost snapped his chopsticks in half. When his parents went back to the village, he definitely needed to have a good talk with Cheng Yuan! Since Yang Baihua wanted to ignore him, Chi Xiaochi didn’t mind playing a little game of time difference with him. But after he sent out the new text message, Yang Baihua didn’t reply. Having lost a “harassment target” x1, Chi Xiaochi felt as lonely as snow. However, two days later, Chi Xiaochi’s proper business found its way to his door. He received a phone call from an unfamiliar number. “May I ask if this is Mister Cheng?” The person calling asked, “I’m an employee of Xingyun Entertainment. It’s like this, we’ve received the demos you sent. May I confirm that the songs in the demos you sent are all your original works?” Chi Xiaochi calmly answered, “Yes.” “Then may I ask if you, sir, would be free to come by the Xingyuan Entertainment Office at 18 Jinsong Road, East District Three, at 9am this Friday? We’d like to assess your music.” The author has something to say: The scum Yang who was beaten black and blue by his own phone 【spreads hands】 TN: if anyone was confused over the memory fragment: 061 was talking about a fragment that he had in his own memory, so he couldn’t remember who the person wearing the skirt was, but he was the person who piggy-backed the skirt-wearer. XCX, on the other hand, remembers the same scene in his memory, so he thought that 061 did research into his memories with LY, thus resulting in his thoughts. sere: YASS 061 is so cuteeeee also omg hints for who 061 is!!! baum: 061 is the best &lt;3 <i>translator: baumkuchen editors: serefina, verywronganswer</i>  Cheng Yuan’s talent and ability were obvious to all, but Cheng Yuan’s advisors weren’t actually very fond of this student of theirs. This was because Cheng Yuan had quite a big problem. He suffered from stage fright. In private, Cheng Yuan could play incredibly high-level music with his classmates, his skill level on par with the best of the best. His advisor had given him the opportunity to perform before, but he brought with him a naturally terrified temperament whenever he went up on stage. Unintentional vibratos and off pitched sounds would often occur, and even during the graduation concert where every graduate had to perform in, his performance was mediocre. No wonder Cheng Yuan’s advisors didn’t take care of him. For a teacher, it was better to close their eyes than have to watch a piece of unpolished jade doom itself to become dusty, forever unable to shine. Fortunately, Cheng Yuan himself didn’t like standing out. Furthermore, he came from that kind of family background. If there was no Yang Baihua, he could have just spent the rest of his life hiding behind the scenes happily playing music with no problem. If it had been the real Cheng Yuan, upon hearing “test out your music”, he would definitely have been too nervous to sleep for half the night. In comparison, Chi Xiaochi calmly made himself a salad and casually called Cheng Jian to let him know that he’d received an audition notice. 061 asked him, “Not nervous?” “I have thick skin,” Chi Xiaochi said, “Also, I did debut as a model. You probably knew this already, right?” 061, “En.” “Being a model requires one to be able to improvise effectively,” Chi Xiaochi said, “The year I turned seventeen, I walked in a runway show. The theme was ‘fur clothing’, and I was the third model to walk down the runway. Some people from animal protection organisations somehow made their way in, and started a protest. They jumped up onto the runway with their banners, blocking the models. They were shouting and yelling, some even recited poems or gave speeches, it was incredibly lively. Their timing was just right, they were just in time for me to come on stage. Before I could take even a few steps down the runway, they’d all rushed up already.” 061 asked, “What happened then?” “I could have totally lost my head and ran back backstage, but if I did that, the subsequent rhythm would have been completely disrupted and the show would have fallen apart,” Chi Xiaochi stabbed a cherry tomato with his fork, “It’s good that these people have their own beliefs and ideals. But I accepted the organiser’s money, so I was obliged to help them finish the show. That’s professional ethics.” Immediately following that, he commented on tomorrow’s audition, “This isn’t a big event, but I’ll still take it seriously.” 061 thought, that sounds really marvellous. After he read Chi Xiaochi to sleep later, he could go visit 023 to see if there were any recordings from this event. That night, the book 061 read to Chi Xiaochi was on the geography of China. Before 061 could finish listing out all the names of places and rivers in China, Chi Xiaochi fell asleep. 061 smiled. On Chi Xiaochi’s report card, politics was ranked second, and geography was ranked first. The facts proved that this ranking was very scientific and logical, because listing out the the names of places made Chi Xiaochi fall asleep ten minutes faster than reciting about how “substance determines consciousness”. Chi Xiaochi’s sleep was still very shallow, but for him, that was enough. When he woke up, he felt as if he had unlimited energy, enough that he could help Cheng Yuan hold a concert. At half-past seven, Chi Xiaochi dressed himself up neatly, and went downstairs. Cheng Jian, who had volunteered to drive him to the audition, was leaning against his car, waiting for him. Seeing him dressed in an acid-washed denim jacket, showing off his long, neat hands and neck, he raised his eyebrows. Before he could make any trouble for him, Chi Xiaochi, rubbing his palms, slipped into the backseat, “So cold, so cold.” Cheng Jian “tch”-ed, then got into the driver’s seat, “You really know how to pick seats ah Mister Boss.” Chi Xiaochi pushed the back of his seat, “Driver Cheng, start the car.” Cheng Jian took off his coat and threw it towards the backseat, hitting Cheng Yuan in the face, “Help me hold that.” Chi Xiaochi bundled up his coat, using its residual warmth to warm his hands. Cheng Jian glanced at the rearview mirror, “Don’t you know how expensive that coat is?” Chi Xiaochi didn’t move an inch, continuing to warm his hands. He said shamelessly, “Just pretend I’m a coat hanger.” Cheng Jian, “Pfft...;...;cough.” He rarely saw his younger brother so lively. This was a good thing, but the minute he thought of the fact that this change had been due to Yang Baihua, Cheng Jian felt like he’d swallowed a fly. He had nothing against his brother’s sexuality. He did, however, have something against Yang Baihua. Yes, Yang Baihua was diligent, could work hard, and was gentle to his brother, but in his heart, his relatives were more important than Cheng Yuan. Cheng Jian admitted, having had to work hard to feed and support Yang Baihua all the way from the remote mountain recesses, the Yang family really must not have had it easy. However, because of this, to Yang Baihua, only the Yang family was considered “his people”, while Cheng Yuan who had offered him his sincere heart, and treated him so well, was an “outsider”. If there was no conflict, that would be fine, but the moment conflict occurred, it would be impossible for Yang Baihua to protect Cheng Yuan. It was just that bystanders had no way to lend their eyes to the people involved. Cheng Jian could provide endless arguments, but when said aloud, no one listened. It was inevitable that he’d get angry. Cheng Jian could only seize this short opportunity to sound him out, “How are you and Yang Baihua? Has he told his parents about the two of you?” Chi Xiaochi shook his head, his face unable to hide his desolation. Cheng Jian breathed out a long breath, managing to choke back his instinctual “fuck”. He said, “He’s unwilling to let his parents know about your existence. Don’t tell me you don’t know what that means.” Chi Xiaochi sniffled, not responding. Cheng Jian didn’t quite get it, “What’s even good about him?” Like Yang Baihua, this student of humble origins, Cheng Jian made a lot of money in his company. Although they were more or less influenced by their respective families, they were both men, they should be daring enough to act, and be courageous enough to take responsibility for it. Chi Xiaochi really wanted to say, ‘I also don’t really understand what’s good about him. Considering everything he’d done to Cheng Yuan, the only thing about him that amazes me is that a pile of garbage can actually be stacked as high as 1.8 meters.’ But the original Cheng Yuan loved him far too deeply, Chi Xiaochi couldn’t collapse his character settings. So he acted deeply impassioned, saying, “There’s a man, he makes ten thousand a month, but is only willing to spend one thousand for you; the other man makes one thousand a month, but is willing to spend 999 yuan for you. Ge, if it was you, which one would you choose?” Chi Xiaochi felt like there was a Holy Father halo shining above his head, like a power generator fuelled by love. Whilst quietly listening on the side, 061 shivered at this expired, rancid chicken soup. Cheng Jian had a face full of displeasure, “En, he has a thousand yuan, and he’ll spend nine hundred and ninety-nine on you, leaving just one yuan. You two can open your mouths and drink the northwest wind for a month then.” Chi Xiaochi thought, this comrade surnamed Cheng, even though I really agree with your way of thinking, but if I were Cheng Yuan, you’d have already killed the conversation. The moment the words left his mouth, Cheng Jian noticed that his younger brother’s mood wasn’t quite right and eased up his tone, “...;...;Have you had breakfast yet?” If it weren’t for the fact that he was worried that if he talked too much, he’d affect Cheng Yuan’s performance for his audition today, Cheng Jian reckoned that he wouldn’t have given up this opportunity to brainwash his younger brother into seeing sense. Chi Xiaochi remained listless until they reached Xingyuan Entertainment. From far away, he could see two people standing out in the freezing wind, waiting to receive them. From their age and the way they dressed, they definitely weren’t just any old assistant, at the very least they were at the level of deputy director. Chi Xiaochi chatted with the system, “This isn’t the type of treatment an ordinary singer coming for an audition would receive.” 061 said, “This is the treatment the second young master of the Cheng family would receive.” Cheng Jian also opened his mouth in time to encourage his younger brother, “Keep your spirits up, don’t be nervous.” Before Chi Xiaochi could thank Cheng Jian for his rare consideration, he then heard him continue, “I already talked to some people in advance. You can just sing however you like.” Cheng Jian was well aware of his brother’s stagefright in such situations, so he’d pulled some strings in advance. This “anxiety” pill he’d been fed was a little too high-quality and filling, and a bit choking. He could imagine, if the real Cheng Yuan were here, what his mood would be like. Chi Xiaochi sighed, “Teacher Liu, when can you give my brother a class on the study on language and the arts?” 061, “...;...;???” Who’s Teacher Liu. Chi Xiaochi said worriedly, “The way he talks makes people want to beat him up.” However, when he entered the audition room, Chi Xiaochi’s entire person calmed down. Like Tang Huan’s Yundu Entertainment, Xingyun Entertainment had weaved a vast entertainment network. It had numerous subsidiaries, covering all aspects of the entertainment industry, such as music, film, and television, etcetera. Flying Fox Music was its number one brand out of all its subsidiaries, and the people in charge of Chi Xiaochi’s interview were two deputy directors and a music producer from Flying Fox music. This lineup couldn’t be dismissed as insignificant. They first asked a few professional questions according to interview protocol. These few questions could even be answered by second-year students in music school, simple to the point of raising people’s hackles. Chi Xiaochi sighed to 061, “This is my first time experiencing the unspoken rules up close and personal.” 061 laughed. The situation seemed simple, but it was ultimately achieved through Chi Xiaochi’s own efforts. All his previous hosts had been scared of the timeline going wrong, simply honestly following the plot, so he hadn’t even had the chance to experience the unspoken rules. Soon, they reached the singing phase of the audition. Waiting outside, separated by only a glass wall, Cheng Jian gave the two deputy directors a meaningful look. They gave him a knowing nod, but the producer didn’t seem very keen on that. A cold expression appeared on his face, and he stared at Chi Xiaochi with crossed arms. If not for him having heard the demos, and becoming interested in Chi Xiaochi’s voice, Su Xiulun, the producer for Flying Fox Music, would not have specially made the trip here. However, the repeated urgings of the two deputy directors, as well as the trifling questions just now, had gradually made him lose interest in Chi Xiaochi. Being ‘live’ was the life of a performer. There were already far too many ‘recording studio singers’, they didn’t need another person in Cheng Yuan. Chi Xiaochi sat down in front of the piano and lifted the lid. His ten fingers fell on the black and white keys, his mind calm as a still pond. He thought, Cheng Yuan, I’ve done everything I could for you. Now, it’s your turn. The moment their minds met, an innumerable wave of emotions rushed into Chi Xiaochi’s mind. But before he completely succumbed to the control of those emotions, Chi Xiaochi spoke up, “061, use the ‘Single Skill Enhancement’ card.” 061 was slightly astonished, “There’s no need to...;...;” Chi Xiaochi stroked the piano with both hands, “Su Xiulun is here.” “Who?’ “Flying Fox Music’s gold medal producer. Right now, Cheng Yuan needs someone like him. So Cheng Yuan needs to perform his absolute best.” These words were incomparably rational and cold, but 061 noticed that Chi Xiaochi said “Cheng Yuan”, instead of “I”. ...;...;Cheng Yuan needed it, not Chi Xiaochi. He very clearly distinguished, that this talent, this glory, did not belong to himself, Chi Xiaochi. Chi Xiaochi said, “I want to let Cheng Yuan see, if he can make good use of the cards in his hands, how good his life will be.” 061 felt his heart move slightly, “Understood.” He opened up the shop, selected the skill card Chi Xiaochi needed, and clicked ‘Use’. Name: Single Skill Enhancement (Trial Edition) Duration: 10 minutes Quantity: 1 Quality: Excellent Type: Single use only Points required: 0 (Free trial) Description: The skill level of the abilities of the original host will be doubled, like adding tender tofu to fish head, a thousand rolls of tofu and ten thousand rolls of fish, they complement one another, creating an even more delicious taste. Chi Xiaochi, “...;...;” This description gave him a sudden craving for fish head. After collecting his thoughts, Chi Xiaochi then played the first chord. He was singing 《Innermost Thoughts》. It was Cheng Yuan’s favourite song, as well as the one that even had its title copied onto the cover of Tang Huan’s CD album cover. “I’m willing to become a book beside your pillow, read carefully by you...;...;” The moment Cheng Yuan opened his mouth, Su Xiulun jolted upright. The expressions of the two deputy directors also gradually changed. After listening for a while, one of them looked out towards the glass wall at Cheng Jian in astonishment, only to find that he was just as stupefied as he was. Cheng Yuan had incredible control over his voice. His vocal cords seemed as if they’d been miraculously blessed. This kind of abundant innate talent made it so that he didn’t have to expend any effort controlling his pitch and timbre, allowing him to focus on expressing the feelings he wanted to express. Not to mention that his voice was just like a top-notch musical instrument. Chi Xiaochi confidently left the musical side of the performance to Cheng Yuan, while the external emotions were expressed by him. Since the latter was Chi Xiaochi’s speciality. With any prior rehearsal, Cheng Yuan improvised three songs in sequence, making many on the spot revisions to the melody as he sang. 《Innermost Feelings》was melodic, 《Love You》was lively, and 《Autumn Thoughts》was sad. Cheng Yuan gradually progressed through the three types of songs, telling the tragic story of a teenager addicted to love. When the song was over, Chi Xiaochi closed the piano cover, looked up out of the glass wall, and gave Cheng Jian a small, tearful smile. Cheng Jian didn’t understand music, but his brother’s bitter smile made his heart ache inexplicably. Chi Xiaochi acted quickly, managing to wrestle his emotions back in order within a few blinks, and rose from the piano, “Thank you, teachers.” When Chi Xiaochi left the music room, Cheng Jian enveloped him in a hug, not saying a word, hugging him tightly to himself. He didn’t know why he did that, he just felt like he owed him this hug, as if...;...; if he didn’t do it while he still could, he might never get the chance to for the rest of his life. This type of intimate action was quite normal between brothers, but 061 noticed that upon being embraced, Chi Xiaochi’s muscles immediately stiffened, his body temperature suddenly rose, and his breathing became a little rushed, as if violently averse to this kind of contact. Thankfully, Cheng Jian only gave him a quick hug, and after being released, Chi Xiaochi quickly returned to normal. Su Xiulun was so excited that he was unable to sit still, pulling Chi Xiaochi off to the side with him to discuss their discipline, while the two deputy directors, knowing that they’d picked up a gem, smiled widely and said to Cheng Jian, “Mister Cheng, you’re really too modest.” Cheng Jian tried his best to push down the corners of his mouth. ...;...;He was really happy, but he needed to pretend he didn’t care. He tried to remain aloof as he replied modestly, “Cheng Yuan performed quite well this time.” During their conversation, Cheng Yuan’s phone, which had been placed into Cheng Jian’s pocket before the audition, buzzed. He took out the cell phone, and saw the two words “Old Yang” written in large font jumping out from the screen. Cheng Jian looked up at his younger brother, who was happily chatting with Su Xiulun. With a slam, Cheng Jian hung up. This was very reasonable, for Cheng Yuan, now was not a good time for him to answer Yang Baihua’s call. On the other side of the phone call, Yang Baihua held his phone which was buzzing with a ‘busy’ signal, the expression on his face incredibly ugly. He’d sent his parent, third sister, and nephew back home, and called Cheng Yuan to ask when he was moving back. ...;...;But he dared to hang up on him? The author has something to say: Scum Yang: Aren’t I the person you love the most? Why aren’t you saying anything? Xiaochi: No, fuck off. Also, the story of the protestors in the runway show was taken from the real life incident of the supermodel, Lady G. w Chi Xiaochi: The only thing about Yang Baihua that amazes me is that a pile of garbage can actually be stacked as high as 1.8 meters. baum: omg lmfao sere: same lmao very: thats not a trash bin, it’s a dumpster <i>translator: baumkuchen editor: serefina, wuxian</i>  Only after having lunch with Su Xiulun and taking back his cell phone from Cheng Jian did Chi Xiaochi find that he had more than 20 missed calls. Cheng Jian clearly didn’t plan on giving a good explanation. As he started the car and headed back home, he threw out a random excuse, “Your phone’s probably broken.” On the surface, Chi Xiaochi was sweating bullets. On the inside, he thought, I’ll believe your bullshit. He said to 061, “Intercept my cell phone signal.” 061, “...;...;?” Chi Xiaochi, “Do it.” 061, “En.” Cheng Jian watched his brother try to call back six or seven times, but no one answered. As he then started tapping at his phone and sending out text messages, a nameless emotion flared up in him, “He dares to not answer your calls??” Chi Xiaochi thought, Mister Cheng, aren’t your double standards a little too extreme. He gave Cheng Jian a plaintive look. Only after saying this did Cheng Jian realise who exactly was the cause of all this trouble. When he saw the listless look in his younger brother’s eyes, his temper waned and his tone became a lot softer, “Okay okay okay, after I send you back home later, I’ll call Yang Baihua and explain, alright?” Chi Xiaochi lightly rubbed his feet on the wool mat. The light of the afternoon sun was dazzling, illuminating his pale complexion, making it look more transparent. His eyelashes looked golden in the light. The tip of Cheng Jian’s eyebrows twitched. He thought of his younger brother who’d shone in front of the piano today. In those ten minutes, he had felt an unprecedented sense of pride. But during lunch, Cheng Jian kept thinking about from whom Cheng Yuan, who had always been timid and suffered from stage fright, had gotten the courage to sit in front of that piano. If Chi Xiaochi knew what Cheng Jian was thinking about, he definitely would have patted him on the shoulder and said, Bro, don’t think too much, I’m just doing this to make that surnamed Yang unworthy of your younger brother. He raised his head, and tugged at Cheng Jian’s clothes, “Ge, when driving, wear sunglasses. The sunlight will dazzle your eyes.” Cheng Jian pulled out a pair of sunglasses from the car’s in-built sunglasses box, “Oh, do you still have me in your eyes?” Cheng Yuan showed a smile that was uglier than crying, finding Cheng Jian’s smile difficult to bear. After driving for a little while longer, the district was not far ahead. Cheng Jian said, “Think about what you want to eat tonight. I’ll take you there.” But Cheng Yuan didn’t answer, his gaze locked onto something straight ahead of them. Cheng Jian also spotted the person who had made his brother fall silent in shock—— Yang Baihua stood in front of the west gate entrance, clad in a thick, heavy down coat, an extremely dark look on his face. The west gate was the closest to Cheng Jian’s apartment. If Cheng Yuan wanted to enter or exit, it was the most convenient way to go. Cheng Jian’s eyes turned cold. He wanted to drive straight past. Cheng Yuan quickly stopped Cheng Jian, saying in a small voice, “...;...;Ge.” Hearing the pleading in his younger brother’s voice, Cheng Jian’s expression darkened, but he still slowly stepped on the break. Cheng Yuan tugged hard at his clothes, “Ge, don’t get off the car, alright? ...;...;You two always end up fighting whenever you meet.” Cheng Jian sneered, “I think the one he’s come to fight with is you.” Cheng Yuan implored in a soft voice, “Please, ge.” Cheng Jian’s lip curled, but he didn’t move any further. He sat back, arms crossed, in the driver’s seat. Cheng Yuan felt as if he’d been granted amnesty. He quickly released the seatbelt and got off the car. He ran towards Yang Baihua, saying happily, “Old Yang!” But Yang Baihua remained silent, a heavy look on his face. Cheng Yuan shrank back in guilt . He tried to appease him by tugging at his hand, “Old Yang, I didn’t purposely ignore your calls. ...;...;I have some good news for you.” Yang Baihua slapped his hand away. The slap rang loud and clear in the silent surroundings. Hearing this, the face of Cheng Jian, who’d silently rolled down the window in order to eavesdrop on their conversation, abruptly changed. Cheng Yuan had never been treated like this before. He stared at Yang Baihua in a daze, then looked at the reddened back of his hand. Ignoring the tears prickling at his eyes, he still persevered in trying to grab his hand, “Old Yang, don’t be angry. I’ve been really busy these past few days, so I didn’t have any time to contact you. Also, I was scared that if I did, your parents would notice. Have your parents left already? Did they have a good time these past few days?” Yang Baihua brushed past his shoulder and spotted a Bentley. The person in the driver’s seat wore sunglasses that covered half of their face, making so he couldn’t see their face clearly. ...;...;Was it that surnamed Lou? Yang Baihua looked at Cheng Yuan with a sneer on his face, “I see you’ve had a really good time too. Now I’m afraid you can’t even remember which way the door of your home opens.” Cheng Yuan was really confused, “...;...;En?” In the past, when Cheng Yuan made such a face, Yang Baihua wouldn’t be able to resist pinching his cheeks, but now he only felt like Cheng Yuan was just pretending to understand when he really didn’t. The strong feeling of disgust that welled up in his chest mixed with the moodiness he had suppressed for the past few days and burst out like a flood, rushing at Cheng Yuan, pelting his head and covering his face. Yang Baihua didn’t get angry and simply ‘smiled’, “Cheng Yuan, do you know how much I’ve sacrificed for you, for our relationship?” Cheng Yuan was stunned. “For these past few days, when mom and dad were over, I didn’t eat well or sleep well, always stressing over how to tell them about the relationship between the two of us. My family has only one son, me. I’m my family’s only hope. Do you understand what my being with you means? It means the end of my Yang family! And you? Doesn’t your family at least have a Cheng Jian? Do you know how much psychological pressure that puts on me? Have you ever thought about that?!” The rims of Cheng Yuan’s eyes reddened, “I have. I’ve never pressured you to confess to your parents about the relationship between us...;...;” “You’ve never pressured me, it’s me who’s pressuring myself,” Yang Baihua smiled sadly, “I have no foundation, barely gaining a foothold in this city after great difficulty. I’m not worthy of you. But I’ve done my best to treat you well. When you had a fever in the second half of your third year of university and called me to tell me you were feeling sick and wanted to drink lotus seed porridge, I ran through three vegetable markets in the middle of winter to find raw lotus seeds, then personally made the porridge for you and sent it to your dormitory. In your fourth year, when you became more free, you often wanted me to spend time with you. Thus, as long as I could squeeze out some time, when did I not come and accompany you? Even though you had no job for the past half a year, had no income, and just spent all your time at home cooking and cleaning, have I ever once complained about that?” Cheng Yuan started to shake, “...;...;Old Yang, what’s wrong? Why are you so suddenly...;...;” Yang Baihua shot back with another question, “What’s up with you and Lou Ying?” Cheng Yuan choked, and unconsciously glanced over in the direction of the Bentley, “He’s my friend, he lent me a place to stay...;...;” This single glance made all the pent-up estrangement and resentment that had built up over the past few days suddenly erupt. He stripped off his gentle mask, and asked bitterly, “Did he also lend you a little something else?” Cheng Yuan’s expression changed greatly, “Yang Baihua!” Yang Baihua’s psyche was unbalanced. He pursued the question relentlessly, “You’ve probably compared me and him at least once, haven’t you? Then have you ever compared which one of us was better at satisfying you?” Cheng Yuan burst into tears, “Yang Baihua, don’t say anything more...;...; Don’t say anything more.” Cheng Yuan’s reaction only made Yang Baihua more certain of the veracity of his assumptions, “After comparison, you found me of no interest, right? I’m poor, I’m from a poor background, and I don’t understand your music.” Cheng Yuan trembled as he shook his head, “You’re too much...;...; If I didn’t like you, then why would I have gotten together with you in the beginning?” Cheng Jian couldn’t hold himself back anymore and swore. This stupid fucker. He slammed open the car door with enough force to rip it off its hinges and strode out of the car, taking off his sunglasses in passing. Seeing who exactly it was angrily rushing off the Bentley, Yang Baihua, who had just let out everything he wanted to say, almost choked on his saliva. ...;...;Why was the person in the car Cheng Jian? Cheng Jian didn’t play any of Yang Baihua’s games. The moment he walked up to him, he decked him. Cheng Yuan was shocked, “Ge!” He reached out to grab Cheng Jian’s suit like a little chick hiding behind its mother, but craftily didn’t try to hold back Cheng Jian’s arms or legs. Taking advantage of this gap, Yang Baihua received another kick and a punch. Cheng Jian pointed at his nose and scolded, “You’ve really religiously noted down every single instance you’ve been good to my brother, huh. Whether it was in third year or fourth year, and even the date and location. Did you fucking make a journal and read it three times a day? Then how about all the times my brother has been good to you? Should I help you make a list?” Cheng Yuan’s eyes welled up with hot tears, “Ge.” Yang Baihua suddenly felt like he’d misunderstood something. In a panic, he looked at the quivering Cheng Yuan. Cheng Jian spat out, “What’s your problem with my younger brother living in my house? Shut up with all your nonsense, if you have the ability then buy one for him yourself.” Yang Baihua became even more frantic, “...;...;Cheng Yuan? Didn’t you say this was Lou Ying’s house?” “What Lou Ying?” Cheng Jian pointed an accusatory finger, “Don’t try and intimidate my younger brother. If you’re still doubtful just go and check it yourself, check if this place’s resident is surnamed Cheng or surnamed something Lou.” “It was me, I lied...;...;” Cheng Yuan huddled behind Cheng Jian, and said tearfully, “I didn’t dare tell you that my older brother lent me a house, so I could only say that I borrowed a friend’s place to stay...;...;” Yang Baihua found it inconceivable, “...;...;Why lie?” Cheng Yuan said in a trembling voice, “When I used my brother’s car, you weren’t happy and said that my brother was interfering in my life. If I said I was going to stay over at his home for a while, would you have agreed?” Yang Baihua’s face turned white, “Then...; then who was the person I saw that day?” Cheng Yuan couldn’t stand any longer. He leaned against Cheng Jian and said in a small voice, “...;...;That was Lou Ying, my friend. After returning here he didn’t have the key to his house with him and there wasn’t anyone at home, so I let him rest at my place for a while to recover from jet lag.” Cheng Jian partially glanced back to look at him, “When was this?” Cheng Yuan’s eyes had lost all spirit, “The day I brought a meal over to you. ...;...;I hadn’t gotten your permission to casually let a friend stay over, so I didn’t dare bring it up.” Cheng Jian had never mixed with his younger brother’s circle of friends and naturally didn’t know who Lou Ying was or which family he was from, “No wonder the tea set had moved when I went to find you in the evening.” Yang Baihua was alarmed, “But Lou Ying clearly said...;...;” Cheng Yuan immediately asked, “What did he say?” Yang Baihua was at a loss for words, his face alternating between green and red. ——“Yes. Mister Yang, would you like to come in and take a seat?” ——“Xiao Yuan’s out right now. You can just wait a while for him here.” ——“I’m his friend. Not his guardian, nor his prison warden.” ——“There’s no need to be surprised, all our associations were private.” In retrospect, Yang Baihua realised that the Lou Ying he met that day had never admitted that he was the owner of the apartment. Even though Yang Baihua had mentioned it in his own speech, Lou Ying had never directly responded. Yang Baihua’s thoughts were in a whirl. That day Cheng Yuan had never answered his calls and said he was out playing with friends when actually he was with his big brother? That actually made sense. After all, he had made his stance clear to Cheng Yuan many times that he didn’t want Cheng Jian interfering in their lives. This was Cheng Jian’s property...;...; Lou Ying was just borrowing a place to stay, the two of them were just friends...;...; As for Lou Ying’s resemblance to himself, it was probably just a coincidence. Maybe when Cheng Yuan fell in love with him at first sight, it was because of his face that resembled his childhood friend’s that he first noticed him...;...; Love at first sight...;...; In the span of a moment, Yang Baihua’s rationality came back to him. He remembered the loveable appearance of that youth in casual clothes who would come running over to him, clumsily and sincerely trying to get closer to him. His memories and reality overlapped. The face before him was just as young, but now included confusion and tears of heartache. Hot blood flowed back through his veins, and only then did Yang Baihua start to feel burning pain from the places he had been hit. This apartment was clean and far away from other people, and there were obviously security guards. When they realised that there was a scuffle occurring over here, they sent over two people to check it out. After realising it was a private dispute, they then watched over it from afar, to ensure that no further physical conflict broke out. A mixture of shame and pain made Yang Baihua’s face burn purple. He took a step forward and tried to salvage the situation, “Xiao Cheng...;...;” Cheng Jian stretched out an arm, blocking him from coming any closer, “What are you doing? You were just scolding him a moment ago, yet you want to just wipe your face and brush over it?” Yang Baihua reached out a hand towards Cheng Yuan, “Xiao Cheng, I came to bring you back home...;...;” Cheng Jian ushered Cheng Yuan back a few steps, “Xiao Yuan has been busy all day with his music these past few days and finally gained some success after a lot of hard work. If you still consider yourself a person, then don’t make him have to worry about dealing with the matters between you and him right now.” Yang Baihua ignored Cheng Jian, just giving Cheng Yuan a pleading look, waiting for his response, “...;...;Xiao Cheng?” After a long silence. Cheng Yuan bowed his head, and said in a small voice, “Ge, I want to go home. I want to eat Auntie Chen’s Sichuan fish with pickled mustard greens.” Yang Baihua’s entire face stiffened into a sheet of iron. Cheng Jian’s heart hurt for him. He grabbed hold of his hand, “Okay. Let’s go.” After getting onto the car, Cheng Yuan seemed incredibly tired, hugging the seat cushion to himself and rubbing it, “Ge, I’m tired. I want to sleep.” Cheng Jian restarted the car, “I know what you’re like, the moment you have something going on, you can’t sit still. Today you had an audition, so you definitely didn’t get a good sleep yesterday. Just sleep, I’ll drive a little steadier for you.” Cheng Yuan buried his face in the cushion, “Thank you, ge.” He didn’t say anything else. In the silence, Cheng Jian dialled. He remembered that their parents were home today. As soon as his call was connected, Cheng Jian spoke, “Mom, Xiao Yuan was bullied. I’ll take him home tonight. I’ll tell you about it when I get back. Tell Auntie Chen to go buy a fish now.” Chi Xiaochi, quietly lying on the back seat, curled the corners of his mouth in a slight smile. ...;...;Success. sere: face-slapping both literally and physically but wow what a pile of shit baum: go Cheng Jian!! Beat the crap out of Trash Yang lol Also, there’ll be just one update for this week. Sorry, I’ve been a little busy lately Don’t Pick Up Boyfriends From the Trash Bin is also looking for editors! If you’re interested, please check out our thread here: https://forum.novelupdates.com/threads/chrysanthemum-garden-looking-for-editors-proofreaders.87316/ <i>translator: baumkuchen editors: serefina, glitterypanda</i>  Cheng Jian had given his parents a head’s up in advance, so Chi Xiaochi wasn’t met with an interrogation after returning home. He shut off his phone, and locked himself in his room with his Xbox to play Aircraft Wars. As far as he knew, Cheng Jian had the habit of playing games with Cheng Yuan. This young Mister President only played Aircraft Wars, so almost all the game files from Aircraft Wars in the game console had been left by the two brothers. If Cheng Jian had any free time, there was an 80% chance he would come find him to exchange pointers to help him relieve some stress. Even though there was the excuse of his mood affecting his playing, the sheer level of Chi Xiaochi’s ineptitude was clearly far beyond the scope of emotional influence. After playing for about an hour, Chi Xiaochi’s score was still hovering at about the fiftieth place. He couldn’t even squeeze into the rankings. His vision flashed with the spark-spitting special effects of the little planes exploding. He threw down the controller and complained to 061, “My eyes hurt.” 061 thought for a moment, then pulled up his audio library. Soon, an articulate female voice sounded by Chi Xiaochi’s ears, “For the Revolutionary Party, to protect your eyesight and prevent myopia, eye health exercises, begin.” Chi Xiaochi, “...;...;” Sir, please give me a break. 061 said, “I know you want to assimilate into Cheng Yuan’s life as soon as possible, but you don’t have to work so hard.” Chi Xiaochi remained unresigned, “When I was younger I was awesome at games.” 061, “...;...;Fine fine fine, awesome it is.” Chi Xiaochi then said, “This controller is too old.” 061, “En, it’s a little old. From the scanned factory information, it’s already two years old.” 061 was accommodating to the point where not only did he make a path for Chi Xiaochi out of the embarrassing situation, but also personally brought and rolled out a red carpet for him. But with him being like this, Chi Xiaochi felt like there was no point in continuing. He dispiritedly slumped back onto the floor, “Fine, I suck.” 061 gently said, “You can still do some eye health exercises.” Chi Xiaochi, “...;...;” Under the system’s guidance, Chi Xiaochi performed a set of eye exercises, then practised gaming a while longer, before obediently coming downstairs when it was just about time for dinner. His parents were already waiting for him downstairs. He stood on the stairs facing his mother, who was sitting at the table, and called, “Mom.” Then he turned towards his father, “Dad.” Cheng Yuan looked perfectly fine, as if he hadn’t cried, but his eyes were bloodshot from a lack of sleep, looking incredibly tired, dazed, and unable to focus. His mother’s eyes stung with tears, and she looked away. Cheng Yuan’s father pointed at the chair he usually sat in, “...;...;Sit.” At this moment, Auntie Chen carried out a pot of piping hot sliced fish from the kitchen covered with plump bean sprouts and crisp pickled mustard greens. The fish slices were shiny, soaking in the boiling-hot soup, its meat delicate and tender, the fresh soup golden yellow. Cheng Yuan’s eyes lit up. He rushed down the stairs and swiftly took the offered pot from her. Right after he settled the fish onto the table, he took a spoonful and shoved it into his mouth, burning his mouth and making him huff frantically. Cheng Jian strode out of the kitchen, “No one’s going to take it from you! How many years has it been since you last ate meat, huh?” Their mother once again felt distressed for him, “It’s alright, don’t worry. Sit down and eat slowly.” The fish had been cooked to perfection, practically melting in his mouth. Cheng Yuan smacked his lips, incredibly satisfied, “In the future, wherever I go, I’ll bring Auntie Chen with me.” Auntie Chen laughed, “Okay, after Xiao Yuan grows up, wherever Xiao Yuan goes, Auntie Chen will follow.” These words weren’t false. Not long after Cheng Yuan committed suicide, Auntie Chen, who’d worked as a nanny in the Cheng household for more than twenty years and had watched Cheng Yuan grow up, had a heart attack and went with him. At death’s door, her mind was no longer clear but her mouth kept repeating, “I’m going to go join Xiao Yuan. I’ll make some Sichuan fish for him. He hasn’t had it for years now.” Cheng Yuan rolled up the sleeves of his cotton pajamas, “Auntie Chen made fish for me, so I’ll return the favour. I’ll also prepare two dishes for Auntie Chen.” Auntie Chen hurried to stop him, “Aiyo young master! You’re so impulsive! The other dishes will be ready in a minute, so sit down. If you get the smell of cooking fumes on your body, you’ll have to go wash them off!” Cheng Yuan turned around to plead for assistance, “Ge.” The moment Cheng Jian thought of Cheng Yuan’s cooking skills, his mouth actually started watering. Ever since that time Cheng Yuan brought him a meal, when he went back to eating the food from the cafeteria afterwards, he often felt like it tasted weird. He waved a hand, “Go. There’s still some chicken and a bit of matsutake in the kitchen, do as you like.” With Cheng Jian’s order, Cheng Yuan immediately snatched Auntie Chen’s apron. Auntie Chen was a little worried, “Don’t burn the pot, okay?” Ten minutes later, Cheng Yuan brought his dishes out to the table. He’d stir-fried, then simmered the chicken with chillies till they were fragrant, golden-yellow, and tender, ladled them into a deep-bottomed pan, then poured the remaining boiling water on top; he’d roasted the matsutake with butter until they were overflowing with fresh juices, cut them into slices, then arranged them beautifully into an umbrella shape. When being eaten, they felt plump and fleshy, like meat. With the addition of some stir-fried Indian lettuce, they made a lively arrangement on the table. Seeing this, both his mother and Auntie Chen were stunned. Cheng Yuan wiped his hands off on his apron, then said to his father, “Dad, try some.” Since taking over Cheng Yuan’s body, Chi Xiaochi had never once made a meal for Yang Baihua. Firstly, everyone had different styles of cooking, so the taste of their dishes would definitely be different. Once Yang Baihua were to notice that the taste of his meals were different from before, it would be hard for him to not become suspicious. Secondly, Chi Xiaochi was only willing to cook for those who deserved it. The entire family sat in front of a table full of piping hot dishes. Cheng Jian and their father were discussing a recent company account. Their mother was asking, concerned, about what had happened during Cheng Yuan’s interview, and Auntie Chen kept picking out vegetables for Cheng Yuan, fearing that he wouldn’t eat his fill. Everyone’s faces became somewhat blurred in the steam from the home-cooked vegetables, but they still felt unusually warm. By the time they were done with their meal, there was almost no food left on the table. Cheng Jian even dipped his steamed buns into the leftover soup before eating them, still wanting to continue the dinner. After dinner, Auntie Chen chased Chi Xiaochi, who tried in vain to continue washing the dishes, back upstairs to his room. A moment after he returned to his room and picked his controller back up, Cheng Jian knocked on his door. Cheng Jian originally wasn’t here to play a game with him, but seeing the game starting screen on the TV that Chi Xiaochi hadn’t managed to close in time, he inevitably felt the urge to play and suggested, “Let’s play a round.” Chi Xiaochi, “Okay.” Chi Xiaochi looked as steady as an old dog on the surface, but on the inside he was in utter panic. Inwardly, he lamented to 061, “...;...;It’s over.” 061 said, “Don’t worry.” Chi Xiaochi didn’t pay any heed to 061’s reassurances and started to quietly think up some excuses. ...;...;The breakup made me sad and depressed, and my broken heart made me terminally handicapped. As the two people settled down in front of the TV, Chi Xiaochi suddenly heard 061 say, “Don’t be scared, it’s me.” Chi Xiaochi, “?” Soon, a warm and dry feeling covered Chi Xiaochi’s hands as if they were being held by another pair of hands, but he couldn’t see anything there with his naked eyes. Chi Xiaochi trembled, almost dropping his controller. The owner of that pair of hands was an expert at placating others, and he lightly pinched the area between Chi Xiaochi’s thumb and index finger, placing those slightly trembling hands in his. His voice was as gentle as water, “It’s alright, leave it to me.” When 061 said “leave it to me”, he meant “completely leave it to me”. Chi Xiaochi didn’t need to move at all, he just had to hold onto the controller. A pair of nonexistent but slender and soft hands held his, controlling them for him. That pair of hands were shockingly fast. Chi Xiaochi felt almost as if his hands were emitting a destruction beam under his lead, and the little plane 061 was controlling quickly weaved through the rain of bullets, precisely killing every single enemy. Eventually, those enemies and their aircrafts gradually turned into dense patches of colour, and the lights of the explosions in Chi Xiaochi’s eyes blurred into beautiful, multicoloured pools of oil paints. Chi Xiaochi’s expression looked normal, but his palms had started to become cold and sweaty. His hands that were held by 061 felt as if they’d exploded into a nest of ants, and were both itchy and uncomfortable. At the end of the match, Chi Xiaochi easily broke a new record. He turned to smile at Cheng Jian, “Ge, you’ve gotten rusty.” Cheng Jian was a very competitive person. Just as he was going to ask for a rematch to make a comeback, he turned and saw Cheng Yuan’s forehead beaded with sweat and paused, stunned, for a moment. He reached out a hand and touched it to his forehead, “What’s wrong?” Chi Xiaochi dodged backwards and whispered, “I might have eaten a bit too much. My stomach feels uncomfortable.” Cheng Jian immediately forgot about playing, “See, you’re so weak. I’ll get you some medicine.” Chi Xiaochi said, “It’s nothing, don’t make mom worried. I’ll be fine after a bit of rest.” Cheng Jian still wasn’t reassured. He helped him to the bed and immediately turned and left the room, saying he would get some digestive tablets. When he believed that Cheng Jian had reached downstairs, Chi Xiaochi got up, rushed into the toilet, and started puking violently. 061’s tone changed, “Mister Chi...;...;?” Chi Xiaochi couldn’t free his mouth to answer him. He vomited till his face turned pale. His stomach was like a glove that had been turned inside-out, overturning seas and rivers, and twitching spasmodically with each wave of pain. When he could finally catch his breath, the first thing Chi Xiaochi said was to express his regrets, “...;...;It’s rare for me to get the chance to eat like that, but now I’ve vomited it all up.” 061 was a little at a loss as to what to do. Truthfully, he didn’t need to use his hands to help Chi Xiaochi play. As long as he invaded the gaming system with a virus, even if Chi Xiaochi used his toes to play, he could give Chi Xiaochi a million points. But he’d wanted to test something. The facts showed that he was right, that Chi Xiaochi was touch-averse, but 061 hadn’t thought it’d be this serious. No wonder Chi Xiaochi had been like Sun Erniang of Cross Slope, drugging Yang Baihua without the slightest provocation, even at the expense of goodwill points. After he was finished vomiting, Chi Xiaochi rinsed out his mouth with water, leaning against the sink as he recovered. 061 apologised, “Sorry.” Chi Xiaochi wiped his mouth, “It’s alright, I saw that there was still some glutinous rice flour and rice wine. After everyone else goes to sleep, I’ll make myself some supper, tangyuan in fermented rice wine.” Despite knowing that Chi Xiaochi wasn’t feeling well, hearing this, 061 still couldn’t quite hold back a smile, “I wasn’t asking about that. ...;...;What happened for you to become like this?” They just touched hands, but he vomited until his stomach spasmed. It clearly was a psychological issue. Chi Xiaochi glossed over it, “It’s an old problem.” 061 asked, “When walking in runways and shooting movies, isn’t it hard to avoid coming into contact with others?” What’s more, there were usually scenes like kissing scenes and bed scenes. Chi Xiaochi said, “It’s no problem, I can usually hold it in until scene changes.” 061, “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi was even quite proud of himself, “I’ve vomited so much that I’ve gotten used to it.” 061 asked him, “How did that happen?” Chi Xiaochi looked up at Cheng Yuan in the mirror. His eyes were misted over with a thin layer of tears, making people feel sorry for him, but Chi Xiaochi’s utterly indifferent expression really diluted the effect of this pitiful loveliness. He walked out of the bathroom. Because he couldn’t find any cigarettes, he just dug out a box of pocky and held a stick in his mouth, “Other than reading to me, Liuliu-laoshi is even responsible for psychological counselling.” ...;...;That meant he wasn’t willing to talk. 061 sighed, “Sorry. In the future I’ll try my best to pick worlds where the host isn’t that close to the target.” Chi Xiaochi gave him some heartfelt praise, “Liuliu, you’re so cute.” 061, “...;...;” Fine fine fine, I’m cute, so be it. In order to comfort Chi Xiaochi, 061 said, “I saved the live footage of the game we played just now.” Chi Xiaochi immediately perked up and rubbed his hands together, “Quick quick, send it to me.” 061 thought, if you send it to Cheng Jian and get beat up, it has nothing to do with me. He then obediently sent the recording to Chi Xiaochi’s phone and a duplicate to the quantum computer terminal. Chi Xiaochi turned on his phone. He ignored the more than ninety messages and thirty phone calls from Yang Baihua, and in the midst of the annoying, constantly beeping notifications, downloaded the recording. He watched it happily, “That’s one small step for me, but one giant leap for the noobkind.” He continued, “When I return to my original world, make a copy of this recording for me.” 061, “Hmm? What for?” Chi Xiaochi said, “When I go to clean Lou-ge’s grave, I’ll burn this video onto a CD for him to see that with Liuliu-laoshi’s guidance, my hands are no longer handicapped.” 061 couldn’t help but laugh. Chi Xiaochi was a very strange man. He was rational beyond compare, meticulously planning out his every move when dealing with his tasks, but occasionally he displayed a stubborn childishness. 061 cherished this stubbornness. Chi Xiaochi might be the very first person in the hundred worlds he had been through who was likely to return to his original world. Just like that, Chi Xiaochi stayed at home, eating, drinking, and occasionally interacting with his fans on Weibo. He would send short videos of his daily compositions, and of him playing instruments and singing. Before, Cheng Yuan never showed his face on his Weibo. In Chi Xiaochi’s words, this was simply as much of a waste as sitting on a goldmine while gnawing on Chinese cornbread. He posted a video of himself playing the guitar, and the next day he got up to find that he had gained two thousand more followers, and this number was still growing. “!!! Mother! How can this blogger be this cute!” “Please marry me! Or please crossdress!” “...;...;What’s upstairs’ sexual orientation?” “I used to think @ChengYuan depended on his talent to eat, and now you’re telling me he could actually depend on his face? [doge face] [goodbye]” Chi Xiaochi picked out a few comments to respond to, then continued to periodically upload his daily compositions. But ever since he first showed his face, there was a large queue of all kinds of people asking for photos on his Weibo. Chi Xiaochi said to 061, “You see, a lot of people like to say that appearances don’t matter, that once you’ve seen a beautiful face, you’ve seen them all, and it’s the soul inside that matters. But without a good-looking appearance, who would be willing to waste their time to understand their unique soul.” 061 thought that these words were a little unreasonable. In the beginning, when he first took on Chi Xiaochi, he also didn’t know what he looked like, but still found him quite interesting, enough for him to go find 023 to look up more information on him. But seeing Chi Xiaochi’s steadily growing follower count, 061 felt like his words lacked any persuasiveness, and simply remained quiet. One day, when Chi Xiaochi came downstairs to grab some fruit, he heard Cheng Yuan’s mother in the living room excitedly chatting with her old friends on the phone, “They broke up, they broke up, they really broke up. That young man surnamed Yang, I always knew he wasn’t good enough for our Xiao Yuan. ...;...;It’s not that I look down on poor people, isn’t Old Cheng’s dad still farming fish? But the idiom “the families are well-matched in terms of social status” exists for a reason, Xiao Yuan and Yang Baihua aren’t even from the same world, so why should they insist on staying together?” Chi Xiaochi smiled. He quietly returned to his room, not disturbing Cheng Yuan’s mother from her “wanting to cover the entire world in flowers” happiness. But Yang Baihua didn’t want to break up with Cheng Yuan. After so many years, his feelings were already deep-rooted. They couldn’t just be dismissed so easily. Yang Baihua noticed that no matter what he tried, he couldn’t get contact Cheng Yuan and could only stalk Cheng Yuan’s Weibo. Whenever Cheng Yuan made a new post, he would always secretly give it a like and send out a constant barrage of messages asking him how he was and if he’d calmed down yet. Without Cheng Yuan’s cooking, without his meticulous care, and without the piano music and singing that would randomly start up around the house from time to time, Yang Baihua suddenly found that his days didn’t feel right anymore. Whenever he drifted off during work, there was often a little Cheng Yuan who would jump out to stir up trouble, making it impossible for him to focus. He started making lots of mistakes during work and was even pulled out by his supervisor for a round of scolding. In the beginning, Yang Baihua still had confidence in himself. This was just one of Cheng Yuan’s temporary fits. He loved him so much, so he definitely would come back. However, a week passed, and then half a month. After toughing it out for more than 20 days, Yang Baihua finally couldn’t take it anymore. How come he still hadn’t come back? Could it be that he was being trapped by his family? He couldn’t come out? sere: thanks for waiting sorry a week passed for us too ^-^” hopefully you guys could still take it. also look forward to the next chapter because it’s 15/10 &lt;333 baum: thanks for your patience! we’re back to the three times a week schedule again, don’t worry~ also let’s welcome our new editor, GlitteryPanda &lt;3 also, thanks to MiccieT and Somebody for the ko-fis! <i>translator: baumkuchen editors: serefina, glitterypanda</i>  Yang Baihua couldn’t bear having Cheng Yuan appear behind his eyelids every time he closed his eyes and couldn’t bear to guess at the endless possibilities of what had happened to him. But Cheng Yuan was staying in his parents’ mansion with the full security absolutely worthy of the incredibly expensive yearly property fees. Furthermore, Cheng Yuan was the type of person who wouldn’t go out the front door nor even take a step out into the yard. If given a piano, he could happily spend an entire month cooped up at home. Yang Baihua grit his teeth and went to find Cheng Jian. On his way home from work, Cheng Jian was stopped by Yang Baihua. Upon hearing his purpose for coming, Cheng Jian used a gaze he would use to look at inorganic compounds to give him a considering look, “You want Xiao Yuan to come back? Although Cheng Jian and Cheng Yuan’s temperaments were as different as night and day, they had similar features. Having that face stare at him with such contempt, Yang Baihua felt particularly uncomfortable. He took a deep breath and said, “I’ll treat Xiao Cheng well. I...;...;” Cheng Jian cut him off, “Tell your parents about the relationship between you two, and then I’ll let Xiao Yuan consider it.” Yang Baihua’s breath got stuck in his throat. Cheng Jian sneered, “What? Didn’t you say that you would treat Xiao Yuan well?” Cheng Jian’s aura was too domineering. Facing him, Yang Baihua couldn’t keep his voice from trembling, “Xiao Yuan agreed to...;...; he said that he would give me some time to deal with this matter, that he will face it together with me...;...;” Cheng Jian really wanted to say “give you a motherfucking pork leg”, but right now he already couldn’t be bothered to scold Yang Baihua. He’d be better off saving his breath. He waved a hand dismissively, “I don’t have the time to waste on you right now. Whenever you deal with it, come find me. But next time remember to make an appointment. Don’t jump out in front of my car like that. If I run you over then whose fault would that be?” He didn’t give Yang Baihua the chance to argue any further, slamming his foot on the accelerator. It was just too bad that this car was an eco-friendly vehicle, and so he had no way of hitting Yang Baihua with a full face of car exhaust fumes. It was truly regretful. After he let off some steam, Cheng Jian was slightly worried that Yang Baihua would smash the cracked pot since it was already broken and run over to his company to publicise all the matters between him and Cheng Yuan. But the facts showed that Yang Baihua was not only as quiet as a chicken, but practically as quiet as an egg. To this, Chi Xiaochi, who was cracking melon seeds on the sidelines, was completely calm. He drew blood at the first prick, saying to 061, “Yang Baihua really values saving face, much more than my brother does.” 061, even after a round of carefully examining this sentence, wasn’t clear for a while on who Chi Xiaochi was actually insulting. Chi Xiaochi then asked, “Liu-laoshi, Tang Huan’s new album should be coming out soon, right?” 061 had long since gotten used to this wonderful, “Tony-laoshi”-esque title. After a quick check, he answered, “Yes. The annual anniversary of Tang Huan’s debut is coming up in a week. She’ll be releasing her album then, like in the original timeline.” The entertainment industry here had developed in a similar way to the one in Chi Xiaochi’s original world. Because of widespread piracy and other such reasons, the record industry had inevitably been on the decline since ten years ago. Singers had no choice but to start up sideline careers, participate in variety shows, or simply go into business. Those focusing only on music were becoming fewer and fewer. A lot of refined EPs containing only 3 to 5 songs had started to appear, gradually replacing albums and becoming the main product of the music market. Specially “changing it up” for the fifth anniversary of her debut and giving it abundant advertising and publicity, Yundu Entertainment made the emphasis it placed on Tang Huan clear for all to see. Chi Xiaochi logged onto Cheng Yuan’s Weibo. Weibo’s loading page was filled with Tang Huan’s sweet, smiling face. He directly skipped the ad and was brought to his homepage. He’d been especially active on Weibo for the past few days, and his fancount had also broken through the ten thousands. Yesterday night, he’d made a post saying that in order to celebrate reaching ten thousand fans, he was going to have a livestream and would randomly pick three lucky users to send a song each to. These songs were all songs he’d adapted as practice, so they should please keep it to themselves, by no means use it for commercial purposes, and so on. 25 seconds after he posted, there was immediately a person replying, “Will Yuanyuan show his face in his livestream?” Chi Xiaochi replied, “Show show show.” In the end, the post got forwarded more than twenty thousand times, mostly for the purposes of ‘licking face’. Chi Xiaochi was very satisfied with number, “Perfect.” He started the giveaway and picked the winners. He picked a streaming site with relatively high user traffic and opened up a room. At 8pm at night, he started his stream. 061 asked, “What are you going to name the room?” Chi XIaochi didn’t need to think about it. He casually typed in a name, “How is it, isn’t it great?” 061 came up and took a look, “Terrace’s Reflection Enters the Pool”. 061, “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi was very proud, “All my social media accounts have this name.” 061, “...;...;” Chi Xiaochi asked, “Liu-laoshi, why are you ignoring me?” 061 thought, what do you want me to say? Should I advise you to not stay so attached to a dead person, or should I bring up the fact that the name is a little dirty? In the end, he still said, “It’s really good.” As they were waiting, Chi Xiaochi played a round of Aircraft Wars. Before he even reached the first boss, he was exploded into a firework by a little soldier. Overcome with boredom, he said, “I really miss my card game.” 061 laughed. The thing Chi Xiaochi liked most about 061 was his voice. His gentle voice had just the right amount of gravel. Especially before he slept, 061 would adjust the voice he used to read to Chi Xiaochi as his mind relaxed, making it hazier with a certain sleepiness to it. With that kind of voice, he was perfectly suited to becoming a midnight radio anchorman. Even Chi Xiaochi, this old who had went through ten years of arduous training in the entertainment circles, couldn’t keep his ears from going numb when hearing him laugh. He asked 061, “What are you laughing about?” 061 said, “Actually two days ago, 023 sent something over to me, but I was just hesitating over whether or not to give it to you. After a lot of thought, I think it’d be best if I gave it to you.” Chi Xiaochi, “What...;...;” He didn’t finish asking his question, because he noticed a familiar app appear on his phone screen. ...;...;Summoning Gods and Devils. Chi Xiaochi opened the app with a tap of his finger. The account was still his own. 507 heroes quietly lay in his storage, just 6 short of a full set. 061 said gently, “023 spent a lot of effort just to locate your phone. He captured its waveband and directly connected it to the system. Don’t worry, the server is still in your original world. However, the connection isn’t very good, so when battling it might lag a little and the friend function is blocked.” Chi Xiaochi was extremely moved, “Liuliu-laoshi, you really are my dear form teacher.” 061 coughed lightly, “Since entering my class, Chi Xiaochi-tongxue has been performing very well, so this is a reward.” Even though in theory, the more unfinished business Chi Xiaochi had left in his original world, the more likely he was to choose to go back, 061 had always believed that with rewards comes progress. Sure enough, after completing his daily tasks, Chi Xiaochi, now in a good mood, finally raised the subject of his plans to 061. “Remember how I told you before, that for breaking the plot I have plans A, B and C?” 061, “En.” “Plan C is to follow the original plotline, letting his younger cousin steal my songs and making Yang Baihua wrong me. Then I’ll act pitiful and make a fuss about committing suicide. Yang Baihua isn’t without his conscience, so like that piecing together one hundred regret points should be relatively easy.” 061, “...;...;” Putting it like that, out of all the ten hosts he had before, all ten of them had used the “worst” plan, C. After all, this was an unfamiliar world and this was about someone else’s life. The hosts didn’t dare to break away from the original timeline on their own initiative, only wanting stability. Chi Xiaochi assessed, “You can absolutely complete the task this way, I can also do it. But I wouldn’t feel good about it.” 061 completely agreed. As a system, having to watch his hosts get pushed around to the breaking point by the scum gongs all day long, and working themselves to the bone to earn goodwill points, just for the few seconds of catharsis of being able to see the scum gongs’ incredible expressions when they finally escaped through death, no matter how you looked at it, it was a loss. 061 asked, “Then plan B?” Chi Xiaochi checked his watch, “There’s no rush, we can take it slow.” At eight o’ clock, Chi Xiaochi punctually sat in front of the computer and greeted the audience, “Hello, everyone. Can you guys see me?” The people in the livestream room weren’t very many, but coupled with the traffic brought by the website itself, there were more than two thousand immediate clicks and more than three hundred people online watching. For a new streamer, this was a pretty good number already. Chi Xiaochi opened up the recording software, picked up his guitar, took a gulp of water to moisten his throat, and started singing. Just hearing the opening, 061, who thought that he’d managed to guess Chi Xiaochi’s strategy, was caught by surprise. Chi Xiaochi wasn’t singing any of the three songs from his demo, but rather the few tunes he had been constantly singing while still staying in Yang Baihua’s rental apartment. With the addition of some lyrics he’d quickly written, his singing was incredibly beautiful. ...;...;It really was like what he said in his Weibo post about the giveaway, it was just a few practice songs. 061 was rather perplexed. Chi Xiaochi having a livestream and asking about when Tang Huan’s new album was being released, was it not to release his music ahead of time and gain the upper hand, catching Tang Huan’s side by surprise?? No matter what 061 was thinking, Chi Xiaochi’s mind and hands remained steady. As he sang, he had a slight smile on his face and his instrument-like vocal cords vibrated with ease. Especially in the parts without lyrics, where he was just humming lowly and singing lightly as he pleased, his voice almost perfectly blended with the sound of the guitar. Even though 061 didn’t have a physical body, his 360 degree view with no dead angles through his image receiver allowed him to see everything. Cheng Yuan’s face was naturally handsome, but Chi Xiaochi’s self-confidence truly let his entire person glow with an enchanting brilliance. What kind of brilliance was it? ...;...;It was as if he didn’t need anything from anyone and didn’t need to please anyone. He didn’t even need anybody and could live well on his own, depending only on himself. 061 didn’t dwell on it any longer, just focusing on watching the young man perform in front of the camera. The livestream room was already filled with astounded exclamations. “What the fuck, he’s actually not part of the autotune association!” “66666.” “I was originally just here to eat watermelons, but right now I’ve just started envying the lucky giveaway winners...;...;” “I just came, which singing livestreamer is this? Are they really famous?” There were also quite a few people sending gifts. Though scattered, the number of people who couldn’t resist joining in became greater and greater, and ten minutes later, the number of people watching broke through the eight hundreds. Chi Xiaochi put down the guitar and drank tho mouthfuls of water. He said calmly, “Everyone’s welcome to pick songs for me.” 061 felt like Chi Xiaochi was rather strange. Whether it was when he went for his audition last time, or now when he was broadcasting, he didn’t speak much, not at all like the thick-skinned, foul-mouthed Chi Xiaochi’s style. If it was because Cheng Jian was there during the audition so he couldn’t go against Cheng Yuan’s shy character settings and let himself go too much, on the internet, no one knew him, so he should’ve been able to let loose a little. But he soon received an answer to his question. 061 casually scanned the user connections of the people watching, and found that currently watching Chi Xiaochi’s livestream was an IP address belonging to Yang Baihua, as well as one from downstairs. 061, “...;...;” Ermmmm. Yang Baihua’s username was “Japanese White Birch”. He hadn’t said anything, but after Chi Xiaochi finished singing three songs, he sent over a yacht. Users who sent gifts of yacht-level or higher would have their usernames appear in the reward information bar above the streamer’s screen. The more high-level gifts they received, the more livestreamers’ experience points and income would rise. Some were jealous, “What the fuck, is it so easy for all new streamers nowadays?” And there were some who reminded Chi Xiaochi, “The mod position is still empty, why not give it to ‘Japanese White Birch’?” Just as this message was posted, the person with the signal originating from downstairs started to act. “I Have a Stupid Younger Brother gave Terrace’s Reflection Enters the Pool a mansion x1.” “I Have a Stupid Younger Brother gave Terrace’s Reflection Enters the Pool a yacht x1.” “I Have a Stupid Younger Brother gave Terrace’s Reflection Enters the Pool a sports car x1.” This wasn’t just once, but ten times each. Suddenly, the reward information bar was entirely filled with news about “I Have a Stupid Younger Brother”. The entire livestream room fell into a brief silence. Following that, rows of question marks and exclamation marks dominated the screen. Chi Xiaochi sighed at 061, “Cheng Jian’s username is really straightforward.” 061 laughed lightly, “Ha.” Just as Chi Xiaochi was going to ask what 061 was laughing at, he then saw a new round of notifications. “061 gave Terrace’s Reflection Enters the Pool super rockets x50.” ...;...;A yacht was equivalent to 1314 RMB, a mansion 2000, and a super rocket 2222. The question marks and exclamation marks covered Cheng Yuan’s entire face, and covered up Chi Xiaochi’s momentary astonishment. 061 said, “Even though I don’t know what you’re planning, but since you’ve started this livestream, the more publicity and influence the better, probably.” Although he said this, 061 just thought Chi Xiaochi’s performance deserved this many gifts. Chi Xiaochi calmed down, “You’re playing with this much?” 061 replied honestly, “Either way, to me numbers are just numbers.” Chi Xiaochi, “...;...;” I give your pretentiousness full marks. System’s rich now, he can take me to eat my fill and dress warmly. For a while, Cheng Jian was also shaken by this number. For the first time in his life, he felt what it was like to be smashed in the face with money. Big Brother Cheng felt a little complicated. Chi Xiaochi explained to the audience, “It’s just a friend of mine and my brother messing around. Ge, don’t fuss.” Cheng Jian’s hands shook. What the fuck, how’d he notice? Cheng Jian immediately exited the livestream room, but felt that since he was already exposed, there was no point in hiding. Soon, he picked up his courage, reentered the livestream room, and officially issued his assessment, “En, your singing isn’t bad.” But with a nickname of “I Have a Stupid Younger Brother” over his head and his sending a big bundle of gifts in one breath, Big Brother Cheng’s cold, aloof image was utterly obliterated. Looking at the bullet screen of comments such as “Caught a pampering younger brother devil”, “The anchor really is Ms. Perfect”, “Wait a minute, above, shouldn’t it be Mr. Perfect?”, and “My Tyrannical Older Brother Fell in Love with Me” as far as the eye could see, Cheng Jian couldn’t take it any longer, and slipped away. Having been stirred up by the two men one after another, Yang Baihua, who had been the first to grit his teeth and send a yacht to try to get Cheng Yuan’s attention, had unexpectedly become passerby A. He had already stopped caring about the pain. The number ID of “061” seared Yang Baihua’s eyes, making them twinge with pain. Wasn’t “61” a homophone for Lou Ying?! When he wasn’t by Xiao Cheng’s side, what kind of people were accompanying Xiao Cheng? After ending the livestream, Chi Xiaochi stretched out his body and threw himself into his plush bed. He gave his heartfelt praise, “Liu-laoshi, you really are a good system.” 061 smiled and said, “Take it as a bribe.” “What are you bribing me for?” 061 said, “How about you explain your plans to me?” “Which plan?” As soon as he said that, Chi Xiaochi reacted, sitting up with his legs crossed, his two slender arms propping himself up from behind, “Ask, I’ll see if I want to answer.” “50 rockets still aren’t enough to buy a definite answer?” Chi Xiaochi had seen much of the world. He rested his cheek on a hand and said lazily, “My original appearance fee has a starting price of one million.” Since Chi Xiaochi had spoken this way, 061 just casually opened his mouth and asked, “What’s your plan A? I had believed you would be singing 《Innermost Words》today, announcing your new song in advance.” Chi Xiaochi smiled, “Liu-laoshi, you’re too sweet. I signed a first issue contract. If I were to announce my new songs in advance on another platform, Su Xiulun would rip me to shreds.” 061, “Then...;...;” Chi Xiaochi’s mouth was seriously shut so tight that even 50 rockets couldn’t pry it open, “...;...;You’ll understand in a week.” sere: I CALLED IT LOU YING = 61 ALSO 061 IS SO CUTE I WANT TO STEAL HIM AND CHENG JIAN. side note i read all the comments from the past few weeks and y’all are so cute 😉 baum: lmao I want someone like 061 or Cheng Jian too _(:3 」∠ )_ or Chi Xiaochi all these men (other than Trash Yang) are all so good haha